CHAPTER I.
O tierra suave de mi alma!
Where'er I roam, whatever lands I see,
My heart, untravelled, fondly turns to thee.
Goldsmith
.
In
the autumn of this year I set out from
Massachusetts
for the remote regions of the southwest on the
Spanish frontier, where I reside. When I entered the
steam-boat from Philadelphia to Baltimore, having taken
a general survey of the motley group, which is usually
seen in such places, my eye finally rested on a young
gentleman, apparently between twenty-five and thirty,
remarkable for his beauty of face, the symmetry of his
fine form, and for that uncommon union of interest,
benevolence, modesty, and manly thought, which are
so seldom seen united in a male countenance of great
beauty. The idea of animal magnetism, I know, is
exploded. I, however, retain my secret belief in the
invisible communication between minds, of something
like animal magnetism and repulsion. I admit that this
electric attraction of kindred minds at first sight, and
antecedent to acquaintance, is inexplicable. The world
may laugh at the impression, if it pleases. I have,
through life, found myself attracted, or repelled at first
sight, and oftentimes without being able to find in the
objects of these feelings any assignable reason, either
for the one or the other. I have experienced, too,
that, on after acquaintance, I have very seldom had
occasion to find these first impressions deceptive. It is
of no use to inquire, if these likes and dislikes be the
result of blind and unreasonable prejudice. I feel that
they are like to follow me through my course.
There was something in this young gentleman which
immediately and strongly enlisted my feelings in his
favor. It certainly was not his extraordinary beauty of
person, because I have so often seen such more vain
and insufferable than even an empty female beauty,
that this circumstance would rather have operated
against him. I accounted to myself for my strong liking
on my established theory; and I watched, during the
passage, to make such acquaintance with him, as such
places admit. No decorous opportunity for such
acquaintance
occurred, and I only learned from the way
book, that his name was Francis Berrian, for Durango
in New Mexico.
For the rest, there was on board the customary
samples
and assortments of all climes, characters, ages, and
conditions. There was the usual sprinkling of smirking
belles, and dandies with their inane and simpering faces.
There were the dignified personages, striding
backwards
and forwards, on whose brow and in whose port
were impressed the claims of homage and observance
on the score of wealth, family, or political importance.
It is a fine position, in which to observe the innate
workings
of vanity and self-importance. Mutual strangers,
wafted for a few hours on the same bottom, they part,
probably to meet no more on the earth; and yet it is
amusing to see what an anxiety they have to establish
their short-lived importance in each other's view. It is
no longer a marvel to me, that travellers will spend
time and trouble to engrave their names on a distant
rock which few have seen, or climb a pyramid to
inscribe
a name which will be read but three times in an
age; and the name of `a pigmy still, though placed on
Alps.'
Perhaps the circumstance, which so much fixed my
attention upon the young gentleman in question, was an
indescribable air of contentment and tranquillity, as
though satisfied from himself; a carelessness of the
observation and estimation of the rest, as entire, as
though he had been alone in the boat. Nothing
interests
me so much in a person, as to see him deriving
his resources from himself, and not drawing upon the
feverish stimulants of display, and the fancied figure
which he makes in the eye of another; but on the
reflections and enjoyments which spring up
spontaneously
within himself. His dress and his servants
indicated wealth, and his countenance wore the tinge
of a southern sun. I remarked that there was a
common
feeling of curiosity on board the boat to learn who
and what he was. This was particularly discernible
among the young ladies. But, though his manner
indicated
great courtesy and suavity, he seemed rather
shy of communication; and there were many who left
the steam-boat, probably, suffering more from the pain
of ungratified curiosity, than I did. In Baltimore I
lost sight of him amidst the crowd of porters, of busy,
or impertinent people, who rush on board a steam-boat
the moment of its landing.
I crossed the mountains on the national road to
Wheeling, and descended the Ohio to Louisville, at
which place I embarked on board a steam-boat bound
to the place of my final destination. My first look
upon my fellow-passengers discovered among them the
fine-looking and dignified stranger, that had interested
me so much on my passage to Baltimore. The Ohio
was unusually low. His course must be the same with
mine for at least a thousand miles. Our captain
calculated
that his boat would be frequently aground, and of
course did not think of running by night. The
passengers
were mostly young men of that empty and
boisterous
character, that is but too common on those waters;
men equally without ideas and without manners; who
know only to swear, play cards, and drink. I felt
pleased to think that the stranger could not escape my
acquaintance; that, in our assortment of passengers, a
man of his apparent character could not have a fellow
feeling with them, and that I should find in his society
a relief from the tedium of a long and tiresome passage,
and the impatience of a prolonged absence from my
family.
One would think, that the charm of congenial society
was no where less necessary than on a steam-boat,
which crowds so much life together, and wafts such a
variety of characters. But this, in the want of such
society, is soon found to be a bitter mistake. The
perpetual change of scenery, as you glide down such a
river, creates an unnatural craving in the eye, and an
anxious desire to find some person to whom we can
communicate the varied impressions; to whom we
look to see if the prospects, that are constantly shifting
under our eye, produce similar impressions to theirs.
If the passengers, as too commonly happens, are
boisterous
,
and enter into no amusements but cards and
drinking, and are utterly insensible to the pleasure of
contemplating nature, the mind recoils back on itself
with chagrin and disappointment; and a steam-boat,
under such circumstances, becomes a prison.
It is true, our passage was made under very pleasant
circumstances, apart from the character of the
passengers
.
We had a fine boat, a provident and obliging
captain, and excellent fare. Every one has heard,
that the French call the river itself
la belle rivire
. It
is a beautiful river, particularly in the autumn. Its
shores furnished us with plenty of game, and when we
lay by on its wide and clean sand-bars, we amused
ourselves with shooting among the countless multitudes
of ducks and geese. When the boat grounded, as it
often did, while the hands were getting her off, we had
our pleasant promenades in the wild woods, some in
pursuit of game, and some of the wild fruits. The
temperature of the air was delightful. There is no
where a milder azure of sky, or a more beautiful
autumnal
sun, than over this devious and noble stream.
Nature, too, was laying on the last mellow colouring
in her grand painting of the season, on the surface of
the forests, in all the hues of red, purple, and yellow,
to that of the sear and dropping leaf. When disengaged
from the bars, our boat swept swiftly and majestically
round the curves of the river. The rest raised their
reckless laugh, told their stale jest, and played their
cards, to their own satisfaction. Our mutual want of
taste for these enjoyments brought us together, and
acquaintance led to intimacy. Our communications
became frank and cordial, and we as naturally seated
ourselves under the awning on the deck to enjoy the
autumnal landscape, and taste the cooling breeze, and
to enter into these pleasant conversations, as the rest sat
down to their cards. Of course we mutually inquired the
place of each other's birth and residence, and were
naturally led, in the progress of this acquaintance, to go
into the color and events of our past lives. I
communicated
without reserve `the short and simple annals'
of my career, thus far on my pilgrimage; encouraged
by the promise, that this confidence should be repaid by
the history of his own.
It was commenced, laid aside, and resumed, as our
feelings, the temperature of the air, and circumstances
dictated. As his story advanced, my interest in it
became more intense. This story I now propose to
give to the reader, as I received it from him. If it
interest him half as much as it did me, he will not
complain that I have taken him along with me as
a companion. It will not be amiss to advertise him
here, that, in order to avoid distracting his attention by
bringing before him a multiplicity of characters, I have
left out many of the personages and minor events,
connected with his history, which were easily woven
into the copiousness and details of conversation.
He premised his narrative by observing, that he
should have to apologize for the frequent use of the
important pronoun of the first person in his discourse,
and the necessity of frequently recurring to his own
exploits, and his own praises. I insisted that he should
begin
ab ovo
, as Horace says, and that he should tell all.
`If,' he replied, `you find me considered in this
history
,
as a very pretty fellow, only ask yourself, how I could
help it? And when you hear extravagant and foolish
praise of this sort, or any other, we will both agree not
to look in each other's face, and you must suppose this
the idle exaggeration of a very partial third person.
`Besides, I forewarn you, that, although nothing will
be related but what did most certainly take place,
nothing but what is most strictly true, much of my story,
I am aware, will have in your eye the semblance of
being too wide from the common course of events, and
of drawing pretty largely on your readiness to believe
on the faith of the narrator. But if the whole story of
the Mexican revolution could be told, a thousand
adventures
,
a thousand whimsical turns of the wheel of
fortune would come to light, in comparison of which,
all my adventures would assume the air of common
occurrences. I forestall another charge. If I really
describe myself as I am and have been, and my
adventures
as they occurred, this true history will seem
to you little short of a romance. You matter-of-fact
people here in the States, are, I am sensible, inclined
either to ridicule romantic feeling and adventure, or,
still worse, to view it as having immortal tendencies, and
tending to unnerve the mind, and unfit it for the
severer
and more important duties of life.' `Have no fear
upon that score,' I cried, `for I, at least, am not one of
them. It is so long since I have heard of nothing but
dollars and cents, the mere mercenary details of
existence
,
that I languish to be introduced to another world.
I heartily despise the idle declamation against romances,
which I so often hear. Poesy and romance are the
higher and holier matters of the intellectual world. All
noble conceptions, all holy thoughts in the mind, are
undoubtedly connected with the qualified love and
indulgence
of romantic feeling. The Greeks and Romans,
the most chivalrous and noble people of the past ages,
were dear lovers of romances. The Arabians and the
Spanish, and generally the more sensible and
intellectual
people of the south were delighted with romances.
And where do we instinctively look for high and
generous
feeling, and dignified acting? among these people, or
among the Dutch in their happiest, money-getting days?
The best minds and the tenderest hearts may repress
their inward likings, through fear of ridicule; but
follow
them to the inmost sanctuary of their feelings, and I
VOL. I. 2
dare affirm, you will there find them giving way to this
innate propensity of such minds. Strike out the poetry
of existence, the romance of creation, and what remains
but the dull routine of eating and drinking, sleeping and
dying? You sear the feelings, bronze the heart, and
leave no other pursuit or hope, but miserable and
incessant
calculations of pounds, shillings, and pence.
The love of glory and of fame, the feelings of
benevolence
,
the thrill of affection and tenderness, are all
extinguished in the heart, as if they were in an
atmosphere
of choke damp. The dreams of patriotism,
the willingness to devote all, and die for our country,
become the idle extravagance of insanity.
God knows, the tendency of every thing in this
country
,
and in the world at this time, is just towards this
order of things. The first question of the marriageable
daughter, is just that of the sagacious father, How much
money has he? What are his expectations? We would
not have silly damsels pine over sickening and
everlasting
long-winded tales of love; but the more chivalrous,
high-minded, and romantic our young people are raised,
as I deem, the better. I should have little hope of a
young man, until I was persuaded that his bosom had
sometimes expanded with the dreams of romance. How
delightfully, and with what sweet
navet
, the sober
Addison lets us into his bosom in detailing one of his
day dreams, in which he tells us in a single walk he
conquered the whole world, not forgetting
Constantinople
,
and new moulded the condition of man, and
rendered
it better and happier. Away with the miserable
project of rendering men more selfish than they are.
I would much rather the eye of my child should kindle
at hearing the recitation of beautiful verses, than be
dazzled with the glitter of gold coins. Indiscriminate
avidity for romance may be a great evil. I contend
not for the abuse of any thing. I say again, deprive
life of its poesy, existence of the creations of the
imagination, and what do you leave us? A stale, flat,
and unprofitable world, with which, I should think, a
a reasonable appetite might be satisfied in one week.
I have heard many a good soul declaim, that he would
be glad if there was nothing of romance in the world.
I should regard him who could, and would, destroy the
illusions of fancy and the imagination, as I would the
evil genius, who would destroy foliage and flowers from
the trees, to give us fruit on the naked stem. You
need have no fear on the score of being romantic.
You have awakened curiosity from a new source; and
this is just the time and place to listen to a story of
that sort, and the sooner you begin, the less I shall
declaim
.'
He then commenced as follows. `I am happy to find
that we are natives of the same state. I was born in
a retired village, not far from Boston. I was the
youngest
but two, of eight children, and reared in the strictest
forms of puritan institution; and I remark, in passing,
that to commence with this discipline has one of two
terminations, when the subject of it leaves the land of
his birth, and becomes an inhabitant of foreign regions.
Either he receives from such early impressions the
rudiments of sobriety and good morals, which continue to
be developed through life, or he shakes off the influence
of early impressions, yields himself with more facility to
seductive and pernicious example, and finally transcends
in abandonment those, who never received good
impressions
.
I feel the benefit of this early discipline, and I
am sure that my early impressions were engraven too
deeply on my heart ever to be erased.
With what delight I retrace the remembrances of
my youth, in that dearest and best of all lands! Where
can be found on the earth better principled, better
nurtured
,
and happier families, than those of the substantial
yeomanry of that region? Even yet, after so many
wanderings and vicissitudes, I recall in my dreams the
hoary head and the venerable form of that father, who
used to bend the knee before us in family prayer, and
who taught my infant voice to pray. I find pictured on
my mind, that long range of meadows, which front our
village church. I see my father at the head, and my
mother and the rest of the family, according to their
ages, following each other's steps through those
delightful
meadows, as we went up to the house of God in
company. I see even now the brilliance of the
meadow-pink
,
and I seem to hear the note of the lark, startled
and soaring from our path. There is the slow and
limpid
stream, in which I have angled and bathed a
thousand
times. There was the hum of the bees on the
fragrant, white balls of the meadow button-wood, which
formed an impervious tangle on the verge of the steam.
Each of the boys had his nosegay of pond lilies, with
their brilliant white and yellow cups, their exquisite and
ambrosial fragrance, and their long and twined stems.
Each of the girls had her bonnet and breast decked
with a shower of roses. Well, too, do I remember the
venerable minister, with his huge white wig, his earnest
voice, and an authority, at once patriarchal and familiar.
The small and rustic church was filled to overflowing
with those, who had there received baptism, and who
expected to repose with their fathers in the adjoining
consecrated enclosure. And there, opposite to the
church, was the village schoolhouse, one of those
thousand
nurseries of New England's greatness. Dear
remembrances
!
How often ye visited my dreams in the
desolate land of the stranger.
Excuse digressions, which force themselves upon me,
whenever I compare the land of my birth with the
countries, in which I have since sojourned. I pass over
the events of my early years, observing only, that I was
the most limber and athletic, the best wrestler, swimmer,
and skaiter in the school, but was altogether too
good-natured
to fight, though I had sometimes my
provocations
to it. I was the favorite of my father and mother,
and was therefore selected to be the scholar of the
family; for it is well known that there every such
family is expected to furnish at least one scholar. I was
the favorite of the school, too, until it was divulged, that
I was to be sent to college. From that time I had to
encounter my full share of envy. I was sent to a
neighboring
academy, and thence in due process of time to
Harvard College, where I was graduated, after the
allotted
interval, with the usual honors.
2 *
Of the character that I formed, of the impressions
that I received at that rich and noble institution, I am
not, perhaps, an adequate judge. You were educated
at the same university, and will form your own opinion
of the correctness of my views. The arrangements of
that important institution are abundantly calculated to
call forth emulation, but I saw that emulation too often
accompanied with the baseness of envy. I well
remember
,
that here I first felt the whip of scorpions, of
disappointed ambition and mortified pride. My fellow
students sometimes received marks of approbation which
were denied me, and which, I had an inward
conviction
,
belonged to me, as justly as to them. My inward
tortures were increased by making the discovery, that I
was actually beginning to be envious. It was a most
self-abasing scrutiny, that taught me this. I made a
great effort, and I flatter myself, that I tore up this
pernicious
branch by the roots, and cast it from me for
ever.
I may remark in passing, that I was naturally studious
and sedentary in my habits, reading incessantly, and
devouring
every thing that came in my way. My reading
was of course what the better scholars called ill
arranged
and digested. A native and strong propensity
inclined
me to visionary musings, and dreaming with my
eyes open. I theorized, and speculated, and doubted,
and tasked my thoughts to penetrate the nature of mind,
and the region of possibilities; and I investigated with
a tormenting eagerness the evidences of an eventful
hereafter. I read the whole circle of the unbelieving
wits and historians, whose voluminous works are all
found in the alcoves of the library, and which were
sometimes read by the students, without the antidotes
furnished in the defences of natural and revealed
religion by those immortal men, whose names will last as
long as time. I read these profound works, and was
prepared by reading them for the perusal of the gospel.
I placed before my mind the simple grandeur of Him
of Calvary, and the sages, and Socrates, and Plato, and
Cicero, and Seneca hid their diminished heads. I was
deeply struck with the tender and affectionate spirit of the
apostles. In what a different world was the empire of
their thoughts and hopes! How wide in their views,
sentiments
,
and ultimate aims, from the men of the world!
Here were men, to whom riches, power, ambition,
destinction
were as nothing. All that the world hopes or
fears was to them a mere childish dream. With what
calm indifference they contemplated the purple and the
terrible power of the Csars! What a sweet and holy
repose of an energy of mind, prepared alike for any
event, runs through their epistles! What motives for
an unalterable resignation!
None had yet discovered these my inward
propensities
;
but I had been fond of display. I had kindled
with the dreams of ambition. Nothing had fed my
thoughts like our New England celebrations, and
gatherings
of the people upon solemn or festive occasions.
When the long and solemn procession was formed, when
all that was imposing and venerable in place and office
joined it, when the gorgeous ranks of the volunteer corps
displayed, and when the full band struck up, unobserved
tears would fill my eyes. My bosom swelled. Vague
and undefinable impulses, gleams of thought, half
formed
resolutions crowded upon me. I returned to the
loneliness of my study; and `Thou,' I said internally,
`art destined to poverty and obscurity. Every avenue to
wealth and fame has been preoccupied, and you must
count to make your grave with the countless, unnamed
millions, who are forgotten.' As I became conversant
with the gospel, these inward storms were gradually
dissipated
.
I became not only unambitious, but I even
thought of trying for the character of a quietest. I
thought with astonishment of those saints in the oriental
regions, who would sit for years immovable on a pillar.
A change became visible in my habits, and my parents
exulted in the change hoping, that they should now see
the first and favorite wish of their hearts gratified, and
that I should become a minister of the gospel. But I
had too high an estimate of the sacredness of those
functions, and too deep and just a sense of constitutional
disqualifications, to assume that profession.
I was graduated in my nineteenth year, and a little
before
that time, my mind had received that coloring, and
took that bent, which has determined my course, and
caused me to become what I am. I became
extravagantly
fond of books of voyages and travels. I became
dissatisfied with cities and crowded resorts, and the
haunts and the bustle of the multitude. I fancied
myself
on a floating island, and wafted into the depths of
unknown oceans. I delighted in the position of
Robinson
Crusoe and his Friday in their lonely isle. At
another time I imagined myself situated with my father's
family in one of the boundless prairies of the West.
Instead
of journeying through cultivated regions and
populous districts, I should have preferred to float down
from the head-spring of the Missouri to the ocean, or
to follow the intrepid Clark and Mackenzie over the
Rocky Mountains to the Western sea. I have introduced
this digression to account to you for those original
impulses
,
under the influence of which I have been a
wanderer in the distant regions where I now have my
home.
It pains me to remember the disappointment and
distress
of my parents, when they ascertained that my
mind had so strongly taken this new direction. Words
would fail me to describe the remonstrances and
disputes
which they held with me, to dissuade me from
my purpose. They were often bitter and severe, but,
I well knew, always founded in affectionate views for
my interest. How often did my mother paint to me
the desolation and sinking of heart which I should
experience
,
if cast on a sick bed in a strange land, and far
away from her affectionate nursing! When they
demanded
of me, what was my plan, and what ultimate
views I had in this new and boundless country, I could
give them but a lame account of my views, for the
good reason, that they were too vague and indefinite
for me to define. I knew only that I had a
presentiment
of future wealth, greatness, and happiness to befall
me somewhere in that region. I only knew that I
intended
to descend this river and the Mississippi, and
ascend Red River, of the beauty and wealth of which I
had formed the most extravagant ideas; and dim
outlines
of an Eden, somewhere in the Spanish country
beyond, filled out the back ground of the picture.
When they represented to me that I was not calculated
to be a land-jobber, speculator, merchant, or overseer,
and that they did not perceive that I had any notion of
fitting myself for any profession, I was compelled to
admit the justness of their representations, and I could
only reply, that there must be great chances there, and
that I intended to make my way as well as I could, and
follow the leading of events. When my resolutions
were once formed, I inherited from my father
inflexibility
of purpose. My father had so often applauded
this trait in my character, and with no small satisfaction
had so often traced the lineage of this virtue to himself,
that he could poorly blame me for the exercise of it in the
present case. He hinted to me, indeed, what a
glorious
prospect there was, that I might succeed the present
minister of our parish, who was old and infirm; or if I
would rather choose to be a lawyer, that when he
should become a justice, a dignity at which he had
been aiming for years, I might perhaps attend the
sessions
,
and plead before himself in the chair. He
touched upon the universal homage paid to a doctor,
his plump poney, his neat saddle-bags, and his glorious
long bills. All would not do; and my friends all
allowed
that I was a headstrong and stubborn dog, just
like my father before me; and that it was a fine genius,
a fine face, and college learning, all thrown away. My
mother's remonstrances were the most painful of all, for
I knew she loved me with her whole heart and soul.
With how much earnestness and affection she painted
to me the solid independence and greatness which I
should be sure to attain at home, all of which I was
throwing away on a romantic and visionary project in
the wildernesses of the West; all this I had but too
much cause afterwards to remember. Those who had
envied me, already took up a lamentation over me, as
though the predictions about me had actually been
accomplished
;
and took it for granted, that in poverty
and misery I should there end my days.
When they saw that I was actually making
arrangements
to set off for my El Dorado, my father and mother,
with the utmost consideration, made preparations of
whatever they thought would conduce to my comfort
and welfare. They furnished me with such a portion
of the property, as, added to my education, would equal
me with what my father supposed he might leave the
other children. The day in which I lost sight of the
paternal roof, was a sad day to me. Who can describe
the tenderness of the parting tears of such a mother as
mine? When I left the cheerful, industrious, and
happy
group, knowing, too, that they considered me as one
for ever lost to them, my resolution would have given
out, had not my established character of sticking to my
purpose come to my aid. I received a great deal of
excellent advice, and from the hands of my father a
bible, and earnest counsel to make a diligent and good
use of it. My mother and sisters had been provident
in furnishing my trunk with the comforts necessary for
a traveller; I received the parting blessing with
indescribable
emotions, and tore myself away.
CHAPTER II.
Happy the man, who has not seen the smoke ascending from the
cottage of the stranger.
Chateaubriand
.
I COMMENCED at Boston the route which we are now
travelling. Until I began to ascend the Alleghany hills,
I did not feel all the ties of kindred and country
completely
severed. I could connect, by the chain of
association, points that were distant, indeed, but not
sundered by mountains, and which were washed in their
whole extent by the same sea, and inhabited by men
substantially of the same character and pursuits. But
when the Ohio valley opened upon my view from the
summits of these mountains; when such a wide barrier,
and so difficult as it then was to be passed, was
interposed
between me and fader land; when I began
to descend among a people of a different character and
foreign pursuits, connected with New England's element
by an almost interminable river, then I began to
experience
misgiving of mind, and the dismal feeling of
home-sickness. Then the image of my mother visited
my dreams, and it was a dreary feeling to awake and
find that the visit was but a dream. These feelings
were not at all alleviated by my reception at the first
town to which I came on the Ohio. A keel-boat was
on the eve of starting for Alexandria on Red River. I
took passage in it, and was immediately introduced to
a new mode of existence, and not a little different, as
VOL. I. 3
you are aware, from the seclusion and meditation of my
studies at the University.
The degree of water did not admit the descent of
steam-boats. In fact there were but few on these
waters at that time, and I was compelled to take this
conveyance, or wait the rising of the river. At first the
novelty of this singular way of life, the freshness of the
scenery on this beautiful river, and the whimsical
character
of the boatmen amused me. Their strange
curses, it is true, grated on my ear. It was an order of
beings as different from any with which I had yet been
acquainted, as though they had descended from another
planet. Whenever we ran aground, which happened
very often, the difficulty of apportioning the labor and
exposure generally occasioned disputes, which
terminated
in a fist fight. Their dialect, too, made up in
equal proportions of an appropriate and peculiar slang
and profanity, is at the same time both ludicrous and
appalling. The motto with this singular and original
race is well known to be a `short life and a merry one.'
The reckless indifference with which they expose their
lives by throwing themselves, in places of difficulty, into
the furious and whirling current, or swimming amidst
the boiling foam among the sawyers, or exposing
themselves
for weeks together to the damp and sultry
atmosphere, and the musquitoes of the night, makes
their career generally short, and their death sudden.
Their discourse with each other, like their dialect,
strangely mixes a kind of coarse wit, ridicule,
irreverence
,
and impiety together. They talk of death with
the utmost indifference, and generally encounter it as
they talk of it. A thrill of horror mixes with the
involuntary
smile, as you hear the strange phrase in which
they discuss this subject.
The public has heard of some of the broad traits of
this curious race, who affirm themselves to be a mixture
of the horse and alligator. But the individuality, the
slight peculiarities that mark this race from all others,
are as yet indistinctly and but little known by any
but those who have actually been on these waters. At
the time of my descent, they constituted a distinct
community
of many thousands, who would fight for each
other, as well as with each other, to the death. They
had, in fact, more of the
esprit du corps
, than even
sailors. Death and the steam-boats are daily
diminishing
this peculiar race. Many of them pass indeed on
board the steam-boats; but the position and the duties
are so entirely different, that their characters receive a
new modification, and in this new order of things the
distinctness and peculiarity of this race will soon utterly
disappear.
At the time when I descended the river, the
inhabitants
of the Ganges were scarcely more different from
the watermen of the Mississippi, than these were from
the sailors of the Atlantic, or indeed from any class of
people that I had seen. They had, too, an acquired
dexterity, a cleverness in the discharge of their hard
and diversified duties, a generous intrepidity, and an
unbounded kindness towards each other, when they
were in good temper, which threw a moral interest
over their character. The long voyages on these rivers
have their daily incidents, dangers, and escapes from
storms, and sawyers, and falling-in banks and trees,
and dangers too numerous and anomalous to be classed.
These incidents, however little they might figure in
comparison with the records of a log-book at sea,
furnish
no inconsiderable occasion for exultation and
discussion
,
as the boat ties up to the willow, and the hands
kindle a bright fire among the huge piles of drift wood,
which blazes high, and illumines the deep forest, and
drives away the wolves and the owls, and the men seat
themselves round the fire for their filley of whiskey.
Then commence the long and marvellous stories of
what they have seen and adventured; and then follows
a sleep under the blue canopy, as profound as that of
the grave.
We had much fatigue, and encountered many
dangers
,
and there were many quarrels and reconciliations,
before we reached the mouth of Red River. That river
discharges its waters into the Mississippi by a broad
and creeping stream, through a vast and profound
swamp. It seems a deep canal, its dark surface ruffled
only by the darting of huge and strange fishes through
its sluggish waters; the foaming path of the monstrous
alligator gar, the shark of rivers, a thousand little
silver fishes leaping from the water, and sparkling like
diamonds; numberless alligators traversing the waters in
every direction, and seeming to be logs possessing the
power of self-direction; or occasionally these logs
sinking one end in the water, and raising the other in
the air, and making a deep and frightful bellow,
between
the hiss of a serpent and the roaring of a bull; the
lazy and droning flight of monstrous birds, slowly
flapping
their wings, and carelessly sailing along just over
the surface of these dark and mephitic waters, with a
savage and outlandish scream, apparently all neck,
legs, and feathers; a soil above the bank, greasy and
slippery with a deposit of slime; trees marked fourteen
feet high by an overflow of half the year; gullies
seventy
feet deep, and large enough to be the outlets of
rivers, covered at the bottom with putrefying logs, and
connecting the river with broad and sluggish lakes, too
thickly covered with a coat of green buff to be ruffled
by the winds which can scarcely find their way through
the dense forests; moccasin snakes, writhing their huge
and scaly backs at the bottom of these dark gullies;
such was the scenery that met my eye, as I advanced
through the first thirty miles of my entrance into that
region, which had been so embellished by my fancy. I
looked round me, and the trees, as far as I could see,
were festooned with the black and funereal drapery of
long moss. My eyes, my ears, and my nostrils joined
to admonish me that here Fever had erected his throne.
I went on board my boat at the approach of night; and
when, to get rid of my thoughts, I laid me down in my
narrow and sweltering birth, millions of musquetoes
raised their dismal hum, and settled on my face. Drive
away the first thousand, sated with blood, and another
thousand succeeds, and `in that war there is no
discharge
.'
A hundred owls, perched in the deep swamp,
3*
in all the tones of screaming, hooting, grunting, and in
every note, from the wail of an infant to the growl of a
bear, sing your requiem.
You rise from a sleep attained under such auspices,
and crawl up the greasy banks to the cabins of the
wood-cutters. You see here inhabitants of an
appearance
and countenance in full keeping with the
surrounding
scenery. There is scarcely one of them but
what has a monstrous protuberance in the stomach,
sufficiently obvious to the eye, vulgarly called an `
ague-cake
,'
a yellowish white complexion, finely described
in the language of the country, by the term `tallow
face.' There is an indercribable transparency of the
skin, which seems to indicate water between the cuticle
and the flesh. Eyes, preternaturally rolling and
brilliant
,
glare in the centre of a large, morbid circle, in
which the hues of red, black, and yellow are mixed.
The small children bear all these dismal markings of
the climate in miniature. Dirty and ragged, as
mischievous
as they are deformed, they roll about upon
the slippery clay with an agility and alertness, from
their appearance altogether incredible; for you would
suppose them too feeble and clumsy to move. There
is something unique, chilling, and cadaverous in the
persons of both old and young. You would suppose
that the grave was dug for them. But the more
slender
and uncertain their hold to life, the more gaily they
seem to enjoy it. They laugh and shout, and drink and
blaspheme, and utter their tale of obscenity, or, it may
be, of murder, with bacchanalian joyousness. Shut
your eyes, and you would suppose yourself in the midst
of the merriest group in the world. Open them, and
look upon the laughers, and see the strange fire of their
eye, and you will almost believe the chilling stories of
Vampyres.
The first evening of my arrival in these waters found
us at the point where the Black, Red, and Tensas rivers
mingle their waters in an immense swamp, cheered by
the note of no bird of song, unenlivened by the flocks
of healthful and edible fowls, as the geese, ducks, and
swans, and only vocal with the shrill notes of the jay,
the cawing of crows, and the wheeling flight of
numberless
carrion vultures, that prey on the dead fish that
float to the shores. On the verge of the bank above
where we lay, and with a little opening in the dead
forest, was a family such as I have described. An
inhabitant
of such a cabin who lasts two years, may be
thought fortunate and long-lived. They gave me
thrilling
anecdotes, if such they may be called, of the tenants
of two fresh graves that I noticed in the little melon
garden by the cabin. They were of that class of
outlawed
and homeless strangers, of hich there are
thousands
up and down the course of the Mississppi. The
owner of the cabin was a wood-cutter for the
steamboats
,
and had employed these men to aid him. They
had cut wood, drunk whiskey, gambled, and fought, and
gouged; and the woman told us, that they had been
`charming funny men.' But, I use her words, they
took the ague, had the fever, and the ague-cake, and
grew sullen, and would not eat, and did not care for
their whiskey. We sent for an old French hunter,
to bring them some good herbs, but before he come,
they would not live any longer, and so they died.
The wife and the mother in this family had once, I
dare say, been pretty. She had had the ague four
years in succession, and now had the swelling, the
filthiness, the brilliant eye, the flippant tongue, and ran
on from story to story with more than the garrulity of an
old French woman. On an emergency, I presume,
she could have handled the dirk with dexterity. She
informed me, that for a month in the preceding spring
they had been overflowed, and she was in the midst of
a flooded swamp, thirty miles in diameter. They built
a house on a raft of logs fastened together, and secured
from floating away with grape vines. On this raft was
stationed the family oxen, pigs, dogs, chickens, and all.
They had a barrel of whiskey to keep up their spirits.
Each of these logs was covered with red slime, and as
slippery as if greased. And she told us that the logs
often brought up the big stomachs of her clumsy
children
,
and that it was hard to keep their shirts clean, as
they were the only article of dress they wore. She took
me for a cotton-planter, and said, Now, you planters
have but one house, and we wood-cutters have two.
We have our floating house on the raft, and when the
river falls, and that grounds, we build us another on
the bank. Look you there, only three paces from my
door used to lie of a sunny morning a couple of
thundering
alligators, and my Franky there, pointing to a boy,
who seemed about four years, who had the customary
prominence in front, and was otherwise as mischievous
and as ugly an urchin as you would wish to see, that
there boy with half a shirt, would needs be playing
some of his `rusty shines,' the funny dog, and so he
crawled out, and gave one of them a rap on the snout
with the broomstick. The monstrous devil curled his
tail, and gave Franky a slap, which tossed him in the
air like a bat-ball; and the beast would have had the
eating of Franky in a trice. But I heard Franky
scream, as the alligator struck him. I seized a kettle
of boiling water, and threw it on the horrid creature,
just as he showed his white teeth to eat Franky, and
this drove my gentleman into the water.
The well remembered song of my infancy rung in
my ears,
No more shall the horn call me out in the morn,
and a chill, as of death, came over me, when I thought
that this was the reality of that picture, which to my
imagination had been so delightful. I felt, too, the
truth and application of the trite New England proverb,
that one half the world does not know how the other
half lives. The comforting prediction of my friends
rung in my ears, In that savage country you will lay
your bones. Certainly, thought I, the assignment of
your bounds must be the sport of a blind destiny.
There are hills, and dales, and mountain streams, and
healthful breezes, and cheerful scenery, and millions of
unoccupied acres of fertile country, where the means of
subsistence even are at least as easy as here. How
could voluntary agents, with the power of locomotion,
ever have fixed themselves from choice, in these dire
abodes? And yet there are always people enough
found ready to occupy these positions. The philosophy
of a boatman is quick, and near the surface. The
boatmen accounted for their choice of such places by
saying, that it required every sort of people to make a
world. For my part, I almost fancied, that I could feel
the first pains of a commencing ague-cake. At night I
actually caught myself making a search, if nothing
of the kind was to be felt. Had there been a good
boat returning to Pittsburg, and had I not been so proud
of possessing at home that high reputation for
perseverance
,
I should, probably, have whistled back again.
But I imagined the salutation, with which, I was aware,
I should be greeted in my native village on my return,
I told you so. It is hard for a young man to be
cheered home in this way. Pride came in aid of my
sinking courage and perseverance; and with a heavy
heart I continued to mount against the stream.
I made my first residence in these regions, and my
first acquaintance with southern men, manners, and
things, at Alexandria on Red river. It may be
supposed
from my peculiar character and propensities, that I
studied the country and the men with an intense
interest
.
I had many things to unlearn, to prepare me for
this study, and many things to learn anew. I was at
once aware, that much of what had been said of the
country abroad, was founded either in ignorance or
misrepresentation. This town is the centre of a new
and rich cotton-planting country, where small fortunes,
and in some instances large ones have been very
rapidly
acquired. The planters are, with few exceptions,
honorable and high-minded men, with very peculiar
ideas and manners, indeed, naturally resulting from
their peculiar situation and condition in life. They are
all in the highest degree hospitable. Acquiring their
money easily, they spend it with reckless profusion. I
was invited with great courteousness to their balls, of
which they are extremely fond, shared their
amusements
,
as far as my habits of life would allow me, and
more than all I joined them in their hunting parties, of
which I was almost as fond as they were themselves.
Their favorite chase, and I may add mine too, is
fire-hunting
,
or hunting by night. They have leashes of
hounds tethered together, and one of these hounds, an
old and experienced one, the patriarch of the
establishment
,
carries a bell. When they want sure information
where the game is, they let him loose, and by the
tinkling
of his bell, they know where he is. Some black
people carry fire-pans, in which they put fat and blazing
torches of pine, which creates a brilliant and dazzling
glare. When they come upon the deer, lying
peaceably
in his nightly covert, he raises himself to
contemplate
all this brilliance, and his eyes dilated with his
intense
curiosity, glare like little balls of fire. These
become most striking marks for the aim of the rifle.
The huntsman takes aim between these two balls of
fire, and the stupid animal stands still in gazing
astonishment
to receive the shot. The whole group of
huntsmen in their hunting-shirts, the blacks with their
fire-pans and white eyes, the yelping hounds, all eager
for the chase, the very horses, snorting and pawing the
ground with impatience to start, make, all taken
together
,
a striking picture. It becomes still more
striking
as you observe the procession moving along the
deep forests, the glaring lights casting their peculiar and
shadowy brilliance upon the trees. But amidst these
sports and pursuits, and in my earnest and delighted
study of southern men and manners, an evil was
impending
over my head, one of the terrible things, which
my dear mother had most often rung in my ears, as my
probable lot in a sickly and a strange land. I had
inhaled
sufficient miasma to give me the fever of the
country
.
I was seized so suddenly and violently, as to
become
unconscious for some hours. When I regained
consciousness, I found myself in bed surrounded with
strange faces, and so extremely weak, as to be unable
to turn myself in bed. The people were as kind to
me as I had any right to expect. But a great many
unfriended
strangers come here, sicken, and die; many of
them bringing their diseases upon themselves by their
own imprudence and intemperance. The people,
accustomed
to see many cases of the kind, and not used
to make much discrimination, consider all cases as one
thing. They are too much in the habit of regarding
death as Peter Pindar says, the king did, who asked,
What's death? What's death? Nothing but a little
loss of breath. A frightful ringing was in my ears.
The continued uproar of the place where I was, became
confounded in my head with this ringing, the effect of
disease. From the united influence of these things
added to the progress of my disease, I fell into the
wildest delirium. Frightful circles of light glared
before
my eyes, especially in the night. At one time I
imagined myself an inhabitant of the infernal regions.
I saw the fiends about me, heard their exulting shouts,
and felt them pouring baskets of burning coals upon my
head. Then, in a moment, I was transported to the
church-yard, back of the church in my native village,
and I was laboriously engaged there in digging up
skulls. Then the scene would shift, and become
pleasant
to a certain degree. The scene would present the
beautiful meadow in front of my father's house, and my
father and the family moving to church, as they had been
wont in times past, and chiding me for lingering behind.
In these paroxysms, one thought was always uppermost,
that I was away from home, and struggling to disengage
myself from something, that detained me, that I might
escape, and get home. Unknown to the people of
the house, I had my lucid intervals, in which I lay in a
state of infantine weakness, but of perfect consciousness
and repose. Sick as I was, and apparently on the
verge of death, and given out, as the phrase of the
country is, by the people, I yet felt a kind of strange
pleasure in hearing them discuss the subject of my
death and burial. If any body wishes to know exactly
of how much consequence he is in the eyes of
people, who have no concern in him, and no motive to
induce them to manifest what they have not, let that
person be sick, apparently unto death, in a strange
VOL. I. 4
place, and hear the people discuss his case with all the
recklessness of persons, who think that they are neither
heard nor understood. We should then discover at
once that there are many people in the world, who
deem that it will go on very well without us. We might
then have striking foretastes how little they will disturb
themselves about our exit, after we are actually gone.
There were other times, in which I felt keenly and
bitterly
the dread of death, the unwillingness to leave
the precincts of this cheerful clay, and earnest
desires
,
that I might recover. I have reason to think, that
I received great and uncommon attention; for although
they were people, who subsisted by such cases as mine,
they appeared to take great care of me. I lay long
sick, and even after my fever had formed a salutary
crisis, it was not expected, for many days, that I should
recover. But, as it happened, the event disappointed
all their calculations with respect to me. The Author
of my being had more for me to do and to suffer on the
earth. I regained perfect consciousness, though in such
extreme weakness, as not to be able to turn myself in
bed. My first feelings were those of devout
thankfulness
.
My first lucid thoughts expressed themselves in
a question from the Bible, What doest thou here,
Elijah
?
Why had I wandered away from a peaceful and
religious home, and from tender and endeared relatives
to a place like this? The anxiety, the tenderness, the
maternal nursing of my mother in a fever, which I had
had at home, visited my remembrance. Oh! I thought
all their evil omens fell far short of the actual state of
things, that I had experienced. I earnestly wished,
that all those unfortunates that had the wandering bump
in their skulls, could know what I did, without knowing
it at the same expense; that they could be taken up and
carried through mid air, and see and comprehend all that
a sick and unfriended stranger has to hope under such
circumstances. How quietly afterwards would they set
themselves down to any honest pursuit, that would
preclude
the necessity of wandering. I much fear that the
close of my adventures, if you have patience to listen
to the close, may inculcate different feelings. But be
it remembered, that to one fortunate termination, like
mine, there are fifty, whose uniform color is the same
with that of the beginning of my adventures.
But I perceive I am digressing, and drawing too
largely on your patience. I have been deeply affected,
and my heart has bled to witness the end of so many
of my compatriots in this extreme desertion and misery,
and with the evils of wandering in new and wild
countries
.
My feelings and my recollections have betrayed
me into these details, which, I would hope, however,
will not be without their use. I resume the thread of
events. About the time that I regained my strength,
a party of young men were establishing a partnership
to travel into the Spanish country, to traffic with the
Spanish and Indians for mules. Their project was
such as would gratify my favorite propensity to travel
into that region. They appeared to be young men of
standing, and had the appearance and manners of
gentlemen
.
I joined myself to them as a partner. There
were eight of us in all, well armed and equipped, and
furnished with as much merchandise as our means and
funds would enable us to purchase. They laughed
heartily at one part of my outfits, which was a small,
but choice collection of books. We packed our
merchandise
,
provisions, tents, ammunition, and our outfits
generally, on sumpter mules, and started with gay hearts
to enter the Spanish country by the sources of the
Arkansas.
We closed our arrangements at Natchitoches, the
last village in Louisiana towards the Spanish frontier.
I had occasion to experiment the truth of the remark,
that in travelling towards the frontier, the decreasing
scale of civilization and improvement exhibits an
accurate
illustration of inverted history. Improvements
decrease in the order of distance, as they have increased
in the order of time. We travelled down six centuries
in as many days. First, we lost sight of handsome and
commodious houses, residences of builders, who often
saw good models. We gradually lost sight of the
mansions of the opulent cotton-planters, who are noted
for their hospitality. We lost sight of men dressed in
articles of imported fabric. Then we traversed the
belt of
vachers
and shepherds, with their
blanket-capotes
and their comfortable, but rustic log
establishments
.
Then we traversed the region of the half savage
white inhabitants, the intermediate race between savage
and civilized man. On the Kiamesia we passed the
American garrison, and saw the cheering sight of the
spirit-stirring stars and stripes, waving above the rude
fortress and the comfortable quarters, three hundred
leagues from the compact population of the country.
We joined to admire the genius of a country yet so
young, and which has thus early learned to stretch her
maternal arms to these remote deserts, in token of
efficient protection to the frontier people from the
terrors
of the ruthless savages.
It was not far from this garrison that my eye dilated,
and my heart expanded, as we opened upon one of
those boundless grassy plains that stretch beyond the
horizon, and almost beyond the imagination. Such a
view presents to me the image of infinitude and eternity
still more strongly, than a distant view of the ocean.
We entered with the rising sun. One part of the disk
of that glorious orb seemed to touch the verdure, and
the other the sky. Here we met a company of Spanish
muleteers descending with a drove of horses and mules
to Louisiana. They were a new and striking variety
of the species. They inhabit an arid soil, a dry climate,
elevated table land, a plain, which is ventilated in its
southern extremity by the unchangeable gales of the
tropical sea, and on the north by breezes brought down
from snow-capped mountains. They subsist on flesh
and milk, and unfortunately of late, from their
connexion
with our country, they have added whiskey to their
beverage. They almost live on horseback. The
training and managing of horses and mules, and the
noosing
of them and of cattle by throwing the noosed rope,
at which they acquire an incredible dexterity, constitute
their employment. In this dry atmosphere, and under
4 *
this burning sun, their skin almost dries to the
consistency
of parchment. They have little flesh or fat to
become the seat of disease. Living, as they do, there
seems to be no vulnerable point upon which death may
assail them. Of course they generally live to extreme
old age, and die the death of nature. They are simple
and timid, and seem less capable of combination of
thought than the savages. Their most definite
directions
of places to us were towards the rising or the
setting sun; and their most accurate measures of
distance
were
grande distancia
, or
poca distancia
, a great
or a little distance. They have a peculiar physiognomy,
repulsive at first sight, but on closer inspection amiable.
I found them in fact, in the general, an extremely
affectionate and amiable people. They are dressed in
the tanned skins of their cattle and game, and their
costume
differs considerably in appearance from that of their
neighbours, the French and the savages. For boots
they wear a kind of leather leggings, which they call
buccarees, with huge silver spurs. They have a
singular-shaped
wooden saddle, covered with some kind
of skins, with a circular and painted elevation of wood
in front, and very large wooden stirrups. The hat is
of great weight, and tapers in the crown like the apex
of a cone. About the horse's neck they carry a great
length of coiled rope of buffaloe's hair, ready for the
operation of noosing any animal that shall come in their
way. They have also appended to the horse's neck a
gourd or bottle, ready to drop into the stream or
branch, through the channel of which they may pass,
and dip up their water for drinking. When the
carabine
and spear are added to these equipments, and laid
across the saddle at right angles to the horse's path,
the rider, the horse, and the furnishing, taken together,
afford a most uncouth and ludicrous figure. These
cavaliers of parchment, with lantern jaws, and nose and
chin almost touching, reminded us strongly of the
ancient Spanish plates of Don Quixote astride of
Rosinante
.
The women, on the contrary, seemed generally
en bon point
, short, plump, and full fed, and, for the
most part, with eyes of great brilliancy and blackness.
In preparing the bread, called
tortillas
, the preparation
of which seemed their chief employment, they have a
couple of oblong stones, the one concave, and the other
convex, to match it. With these stones the women
grind the maize, after it has been prepared by lye, to an
impalpable paste, which they made into cakes by
patting
in the palms of their hands, keeping time, as they
do it, to a brisk and not unpleasant tune. They carried
their hospitality to extremes, sharing their
tortillas,
tasajo
, bear's oil, and coffee, with us to the last point
of division.
On these level plains some of my dreams of the
pleasures of wandering were realized. We were all in
the morning of life, full of health and spirits, on
horseback
,
and breathing a most salubrious air, with a
boundless
horizon open before us, and shaping our future
fortune and success in the elastic mould of youthful
hope and imagination, wue could herdly be other than
happy. Sometimes we saw, scouring away from our
path, horses, asses, mules, buffaloes, and wolves, in
countless multitudes, and we took, almost with too much
ease to give pleasure in the chase, whatever we needed
for luxurious subsistence. The passage of creeks and
brooks across the prairies is marked, to the utmost
extent
of vision, by a fringe of wood and countless
flowering
shrubs. Sometimes we ascended an elevation of
some height, swelling gently from the plain. Here the
eye traces, as on an immense map, the formation and
gradual enlargement of these rivulets, and sees them
curving their meandering lines to a point of union with
another of the same kind. The broadened fringe of
wood indicates the enlargement of the stream, and the
ey takes in at one glance the gradual formation of
rivers. The night brought us up on the edge of one
of these streams. Our beasts are turned loose to stretch
themselves on the short and tender grass, to feed and
repose. The riders collect round a fire in the centre.
Supper is prepared with bread, coffee, and the
tenderest
parts of the buffalo, venison, and other game.
The appetite, sharpened by exercise on horseback, and
by the salubrious air, is devouring. The story
circulates
.
Past adventures are recounted, and if they
receive something of the coloring of romance, it may
be traced to feelings that grow out of the occasion.
The projects and the mode of journeying on the morrow
are discussed and settled. The fire flickers in the
midst. The wild horses neigh, and the prairie wolves
howl, in the distance. Except the weather threatens
storm, the tents are not pitched. The temperature of
the night air is both salutary and delightful. The
blankets are spread upon the tender grass, and under
a canopy of the softest blue, decked with all the
visible lights of the sky. The party sink to a repose,
which the exercise of the preceding day renders as
unbroken and dreamless, as that of the grave. I awoke
more than once unconscious that a moment had elapsed,
between the time of my lying down and my rising.
The day before we came in view of the Rocky
mountains
,
I saw in the greatest perfection that impressive,
and, to me, almost sublime spectacle, an immense drove
of wild horses, for a long time hovering round our path
across the prairie. I had often seen great numbers of
them before, mixed with other animals, apparently quiet,
and grazing like the rest. Here there were thousands
unmixed, unemployed; their motions, if such a
comparison
might be allowed, as darting and as wild as those
of humming-birds on the flowers. The tremendous
snorts with which the front columns of the phalanx
made known their approach to us, seemed to be their
wild and energetic way of expressing their pity and
disdain for the servile lot of our horses, of which they
appeared to be taking a survey. They were of all
colors, mixed, spotted, and diversified with every hue,
from the brightest white to clear and shining black;
and of every form and structure, from the long and
slender racer, to those of firmer limbs and heavier
mould; and of all ages, from the curvetting colt to the
range of patriarchal steeds, drawn up in a line, and
holding their high heads for a survey of us, in the rear.
Sometimes they curved their necks, and made no more
progress than just enongh to keep pace with our
advance
.
Then there was a kind of slow and walking
minuet, in which they performed various evolutions
with the precision of the figures of a country dance.
Then a rapid movement shifted the front to the rear.
But still, in all their evolutions and movements, like
the flight of sea-fowl, their lines were regular, and free
from all indications of confusion. At times a
spontaneous
and sudden movement towards us, almost inspired
the apprehension of an united attack upon us. After
a moment's advance, a snort and a rapid retrograde
movement seemed to testify their proud estimate of
their wild independence. The infinite variety of their
rapid movements, their tamperings, and manuvres
were of such a wild and almost terrific character, that
it required but a moderate stretch of fancy to suppose
them the genii of these grassy plains. At one period
they were formed for an immense depth in front of us.
A wheel, executed almost with the rapidity of thought,
presented them hovering on our flanks. Then, again,
the cloud of dust that enveloped their movements,
cleared away, and presented them in our rear. They
evidently operated as a great annoyance to the horses
and mules of our cavalcade. The frighted movements,
the increased indications of fatigue, sufficiently
evidenced
,
with their frequent neighings, what unpleasant
neighbours they considered their wild compatriots to be.
So much did our horses appear to suffer from fatigue
and terror in consequence of their vicinity, that we
were thinking of some way in which to drive them off;
when on a sudden a patient and laborious donkey of
the establishment, who appeared to have regarded all
their movements with philosophic indifference, pricked
up his long ears, and gave a loud and most sonorous
bray from his vocal shells. Instantly this prodigious
multitude, and there were thousands of them, took
what the Spanish call the stompado. With a
trampling
like the noise of thunder, or still more like that of
an earthquake, a noise that was absolutely appalling,
they took to their heels, and were all in a few moments
invisible in the verdant depths of the plains, and we
saw them no more.
It was in the first opening of spring, after a slow
and easy journey of five weeks from Natchitoches, that
we arrived at last in view of that immense chain of
mountains, commonly denominated the Rocky
Mountains
,
at the point where the Arkansas finds its way
from among them to the plain. No time will erase
from my mind the impressions of awe and grandeur,
excited by the distant view and the gradual approach
to this sublime chain of mountains. We had been
prepared for this impression by an approach of two
hundred leagues, through a level plain of short and
soft grass, seldom able to discover in our whole
horizon, a tree, a shrub, an eminence, or any other
object but herds of animals, to diversify the scene.
The soil itself is a fine and reddish-colored sand, and
the whole landscape has an appearance of
monotonous
amenity.
Amidst snowy mountains the Arkansas collects a
cold, broad, and rushing stream, which seems to pour
itself with the joy of emancipation upon the thirsty and
absorbent plain, which, in the passage of a few leagues,
seems to have swallowed up these abundant waters,
and the river chafes upon the sand and pebbles a
shallow
and fordable stream. The soft and level nature
of the landscape continues quite up to the point, where
the earth is covered with the massive fragments of the
mountain disengaged by the rush of cascades, by
earthquakes
,
and time. With such contrast, and from such
a pedestal, rises Mount Pike into mid air. His
blackening
sides, and hoary summit, are a kind of sea-mark
at immense distances over the plain. He elevates his
gigantic head, and frowns upon the sea of verdure
below
him, taking his everlasting repose, solitary and
detached from the hundred mountains, apparently
younger members of the family, which shrink with
filial awe at a distance from him. Clouds and storms
hang their drapery round his sides. The rains pour,
and the cascades dash far below his conical head,
which reflects the sun-beams from the snow of ages.
CHAPTER III.
And thou, sweet flower,
Once more shalt flourish in thy parent soil.
La primera
Flor, que ha osado fiar de los colores
Recien nacidas hojas y colores,
Aventurando el precio  la ribera.
Quevedo
.
At
the foot of Mount Pike it was arranged that each
one of the party should proceed to a different point
among the Indians, to purchase horses and mules, and
that we should reunite with our acquisitions at Santa
Fe. For my part, I now began to exercise
self-scrutiny
,
and to feel myself disqualified in every point of
view for this kind of traffic. A certain per-centage
was ultimately to be awarded me, according to the
profits and losses, and in proportion to my contribution
to the common stock. As I frankly confessed my
disinclination
to the active labors of the partnership, it
was stipulated that on these conditions I should be a
kind of sleeping partner, and might find my way
as I chose to the common point of meeting, at an
assigned time in Santa Fe. I was thus left at
liberty
to gratify my curiosity in my own way, and was
esteemed a kind of good-natured scholar, with my head
too much turned by books to understand the value or
use of money, or to enter into the pleasure of making
it. One of the company, a young man from New York,
VOL. I. 5
had been educated in a considerable degree, and was in
other respects a man of a different order of thought and
manners from the rest. Between him and me there
existed a certain kind of companionship. He understood
a smattering of French, and enough of the language of
the Commanches to converse with them. To him, as
one of the most important personages of the expedition,
was assigned a central village of the Commanches
among the mountains, as the place where he was to
commence his traffic. He represented his place as
being singularly romantic and beautiful, for he had
been there before, and the Indians as the most noble
and interesting people of all that region. He requested
me to accompany him, holding forth all the usual
inducements
which operate with most force upon such
adventurers. From very different motives from those
which he held out, I consented to follow him.
The morning after our arrival at the mountains, we
made our final arrangements, and each member of the
partnership separated to his assigned place. My
companion
and myself began to scramble up the rocky and
precipitous banks of the Arkansas, as it foams along
from cliff to cliff in its descent to the plains. The
progress
was both laborious and dangerous. After
climbing
this way for two days, we left the course of the
Arkansas, and made our way towards the waters of the
Rio del Norte. We were often obliged to dismount,
and lead our horses through the defiles, and we found
great difficulty in getting them along, although we
were on the track by which the savages come down to
the plains. We came to the bank of a torrent, and
wound along in a trace, barely wide enough for one
horse to pass, and with perpendicular points of the
mountains often hanging a thousand feet above our
heads. On the evening of the third day a moment
before sunset, we entered a long and very narrow
gorge
between two stupendous elevations, with a narrow path
of smooth blue limestone, washed on the edge by the
foaming waters of this torrent, which was a
considerable
branch of the Rio del Norte. We threaded this
gorge, perhaps two miles, and just as twilight was
fading, we entered the most beautiful valley, that I
have seen before or since. Dusky as it was in the
depths of the valley, the last rays of the sun still
glittered
on the eternal ices of the summits of the
mountains
.
The bells of cattle and horses tinkled. Dogs
bayed. The chanticleers were crowing a parting salute
to the day. A compact village of Indian cabins, like
an extended cluster of beehives, dotted the opposite
extremity of the valley. The smoke streamed aloft in
perpendicular columns to the sky. The dun mist of
Indian summer, conspired with the fading light to give
a shadowy form to every object. The squaws were
crossing each other's path, carrying water on their
heads, and performing the other kitchen duties in the
open air. Naked boys were shooting arrows at a
mark, or evincing the incipient cockatrice spirit of
fondness for battles, by mimic quarrels of scratching
and biting. My companion, who knew the village,
walked forward with the confidence of an acquaintance.
He approached the sentinels, two of whom always
guarded the point, where the gorge opened into the
valley. Knowing their customs, my companion
approached
them with a firm step and a fearless
countenance
,
and offered them his hand. They gave a sharp
cry of recognition, followed by a gentle grunt, and a
cordial shake of his hand in return. A phrase
introduced
me to them, and I, too, received my shake of
the hand. One of them went with us to introduce us
to the village. The chiefs and warriors thronged
around us. My companion explained his object and
mine in this visit. As far as I could judge, our
reception
was cordial, and we were welcome. A vacant
cabin, fitted up with Indian magnificence, and its floor
spread with skins, was assigned us. There seemed to
be almost a contest among them, who should be the
first to entertain us. I did not much admire Indian
viands and cookery, which consisted principally of
venison and boiled corn seasoned with native spices,
and cooked with bear's grease. The rough but
obvious
kindness of the entertainers, however, made amends
for the unsavory character of the feast. Extreme
fatigue
made us welcome that early repose to which we
were invited.
I arose early in the morning to make the circuit of
this lovely vale. At the extremity of the village,
the torrent, whose sources were in the mountains,
poured down, from a prodigious elevation, a white and
perpendicular cascade, which seemed a sheet
suspended
in the air. It falls into a circular basin, paved with
blue limestone of some rods in circuit. The dash near
at hand has a startling effect upon the ear. But at a
little distance, it is just the murmur to inspire repose,
and it spreads a delicious coolness all around the place.
From the basin the stream seems to partake of the
repose of the valley; for it broadens into a transparent
and quiet water, whose banks are fringed with pawpaw,
persimon, laurel, and catalpa shrubs and trees,
interlaced
with vines, under which the green carpet is
rendered
gay with flowers of every scent and hue. The
soil is black, tender and exuberantly fertile. The
coolness of the vale and the shade together with the
irrigation of the stream cover the whole valley with a
vivid verdure. The beautiful red-bird with its
crimsontufted
crest, and the nightingale sparrow, pouring from a
body scarcely larger than an acorn, a continued stream
of sound, a prolonged, plaintive, and sweetly modulated
harmony, that might be heard at the distance of half
a mile, had commenced their morning voluntary. The
mocking bird, the buffoon of songsters, was parodying
the songs of all the rest. Its short and jerking notes, at
times, imitated bursts of laughter. Sometimes, laying
aside its habitual levity, it shows, that it knows the
notes of seriousness, and trills a sweetly melancholy
strain. Above the summits of these frowning
mountains
,
that mortal foot had never yet trodden, soared
the mountain eagle, drinking the sunbeam in the pride
of his native independence. Other birds of prey,
apparently
poised on their wings, swam slowly round in
easy curves, and seemed to look with delight upon the
5*
green spot embosomed in the mountains. They sailed
back and forwards, as though they could not tire of
the view. The sun, which had burnished all the tops
of the mountains with gold, and here and there glistened
on banks of snow, would not shine into the valley, until
he had almost gained his meridian height. The natives,
fleet as the deer when on expeditions abroad, and at
home lazy and yawning, were just issuing from their
cabins, and stretching their limbs supinely in the cool
of the morning. The smoke of their cabin fires had
begun to undulate and whiten in horizontal pillars
athwart the valley. The distant roar of the cascade,
like the gong in Chinese music, seemed to mingle and
harmonize all other sounds in the valley. It was a
charming assemblage of strong contrasts, rocky and
inaccessible mountains, the deep and incessant roar of
the stream, a valley that seemed to sleep between these
impregnable ramparts of nature, a little region of
landscape
surrounded by black and ragged cliffs, on every
side dotted thick with brilliant and beautiful
vegetation
,
and fragrant with hundreds of acacias and catalpas
in full flower, a spot sequestered like a lonely isle in
the midst of the ocean; in the midst of it a busy,
simple
,
and undescribed people, whose forefathers had
been born and had died here for uncounted generations:
a people, who could record wars, loves, and all the
changes of fortune, if they had had their historian.
Such was the valley of the Commanches.
There are places where I am at once at home with
nature, and where she seems to take me to her bosom
with all the fondness of a mother. I forget at once
that I am a stranger in a strange land; and this was
one of those places. I cannot describe the soothing
sensations that I felt. I listened to the mingled sounds
of a hundred birds, the barking of the dogs on the
acclivities of the hills, the cheerful sounds of the
domestic
animals, and the busy hum of the savages. The
morning was fresh and balmy. The sublime nature
above me, and the quiet and happy animated nature on
my own level, seemed to be occupied in morning
orisons to the Creator. I, too, felt the glad thrill of
devotion come over my mind. These are thy works,
Parent of good. Here, thought I, in this delightful
vale, with a few friends, is the place where one would
choose to dream away his short day and night,
forgetting
and forgotten.
Here would I live, unnotic'd and unknown,
Here unlamented would I die;
Steal from the world, and not a stone
Tell where I lie.
Having sauntered about in different parts of the
valley
for an hour, one spot struck me as peculiarly inviting
to meditation, study, and repose. It was a peninsula
made by a bend in the stream, which almost curved
back upon its path, leaving an entrance scarcely three
paces across, and the islet including an area of two
acres. Even the Indians had taste to feel the
pleasantness
of this place, for their devious paths had
checquered
out walks worn smooth in the living turf. Even the
Indian girls felt that here was the place to own their
`dusky loves.' Weeping willows and magnolias rendered
it a perfect alcove. In the midst of the verdure above
were seen the brilliant wings of the parroquet and the
red-bird, as they darted from branch to branch. Here,
thought I, shall be my study, while I reside in this
sweet place. When I cast my eye around, I applauded
that forecast, which had drawn so much ridicule from
my companions, in having brought along with our
supply
of provisions for the body, so select a supply of
food for the mind. Here I proposed to take up my
residence through the day, and read, and meditate, and
botanize, and study the natives; and here, I thought,
in this balmy air, if I were not exiled from every thing
but the copper-colored daughters of the savages, one
might learn to love. I had a kind of inkling for the
muse, and it would be easy to imagine a Laura to my
mind. In this pleasantest spot of the earth a couple of
months could not but pass cheerfully, as well as
usefully
.
After breakfast a council-fire was kindled in the
public
wigwam. The council chiefs, the warriors, the
women and children assembled round the council-fire,
to welcome us to the village with the customary
solemnities
.
The calumet went round. The savages all
smoked, and passed it to us to smoke. A speech of
welcome to us, and of invitation to our partners to visit
them, was uttered by the most aged council chief.
The elocution was strong, significant, and emphatic;
and at the close of every sentence the interpreter, a
half-blood Frenchman, translated it into French, a
a language which my companion and myself both
understood
.
I felt thankful that, among some useful
acquirements at college, I had gained the mastery of
this language, so generally understood abroad. I
entered
into the speech with intense interest, for I had
heard much of Indian eloquence. The gesture was
vehement. An arm, which had once been muscular
and brawny, waved with graceful motion from under a
buffaloe robe, thrown half across the shoulder. To
give emphasis to the close of every sentence, the
speaker raised himself, and poised the weight of his
body on his toes. It was garnished with the usual
figures of the clouds, the winds, thunder, and generally
images drawn from the most striking phenomena of
nature. In the name of the tribe the usual promises
of hospitality and protection were given, in return for
which we were to furnish them with a suitable portion
of beads, knives, looking-glasses, and, more than all,
vermilion. On these terms I was to be considered as
under the special protection of the tribe for two months,
and my companion was to have every facility for
purchasing
and noosing horses and mules.
The sitting terminated with a religious ceremony.
The chief actor in that part of the welcome was a tall,
meagre savage in extreme old age, and his eyes, sunk
in his head, rolled their grey orbs with all the
earnestness
of the assumed spirit of divination. He had on
the centre of his crown a single lock of dirty grey hair.
The rest of his bald head was painted high with
vermilion
.
Both of his long and sunken cheeks were
painted
black. About the waist he wore a bandage of scarlet
cloth, and the tails of two panthers flourished behind.
The rest of his body was naked, and on his back were
painted, with sufficient accuracy, alligators and
rattlesnakes
.
This personage was one of the first importance
in the village, uniting the functions of priest, physician,
and conjurer. There was something in his person,
which united the ludicrous and the terrible in a strange
degree. His prayer was a long monotonous note,
occasionally
dropping, by a number of tones at once, to a
low and unearthly murmur. The being invoked in this
prayer in their behalf and ours, was denominated
master of life. It was understood, that this prayer
was to be paid for in whiskey and tobacco.
Then came the dancing. Two old chiefs held a
parchment drum, and two aged squaws shook with
great gravity and labor a couple of gourds which
were hollow, and contained a number of pebbles.
The chiefs just murmured a deep note, and beat
with great solemnity upon the little drums, and the
squaws kept time by shaking the pebbles. Six young
warriors, highly painted, bent forward, so that their
noses almost touched. They began to dance slowly,
and to sing the accustomed and universal song of the
savages from Mexico to the St. Lawrence;
He-aw-aw
.
He-aw-aw. He-aw-hum. Their eyes kindled in
the progress of the dance. They wagged their heads,
and increased the vigor of their movements, and the
song grew louder, until they sprang from the ground,
and stamped their feet furiously upon the earth. The
sweat trickled down their naked backs, marking devious
channels through thick coating of black and red paint.
After this dance it was understood that we were
medicined
,
charmed, or under the pledged protection of
their household divinities.
The tribe of the Commanches, of which this was the
chief town, inhabited the valleys at the sources of Red,
Arkansas, and the Rio del Norte rivers, which all rise
near each other. These were their winter and
permanent
habitations. In the summer they encamped, and
hunted the buffalo and other game, on the subjacent
plains. To diversify their mode of life a little, they often
made incursions into New Spain, sometimes for a kind
of forced traffic in horses, mules, and pelts, but much
oftener with the avowed purpose of war and plunder.
They kept up in this way a kind of border warfare
with the Spaniards, sometimes practising open hostilities,
but generally maintaining a kind of armed neutrality,
throwing their weight into the scale of the Appaches, a
neighbouring tribe of savages, with whom the Spaniards
maintained continual war, or of the Spaniards
themselves
,
as their interest, their policy, or their ambition
dictated. Their presentt relation with the Spaniards
was a kind of hollow truce, which had not, however,
prevented a recent excursion to Santa Fe with a select
force of the young warriors, in which they had brought
off a rich plunder, a number of captives of the lower
orders, and with them the only daughter and child of
the Conde Alvaro, governor of Durango, and
superintendant
general of the Mexican mines. A deputation
from the tribe was now at Santa Fe, to treat with the
governor for the ransom of his daughter, which they
put at an exorbitant sum of money, proportioned to the
vast wealth of the father, and his known affection for
his daughter. This circumstance showed, more than
any other, that they held the Spaniards at entire
defiance
.
Circumstances, that will explain themselves as
I proceed, will show why they felt such a peculiar
confidence
at this point of time. The governor, with all
his resources, power, and thousands of tenants, appeared
to think of no other resource for regaining this
daughter
,
but a ransom. The savages spoke of her with a
kind of mysterious reverence, remarking, that she was
never seen abroad, sometimes designating her with the
sacred name of medicine, and at other times by the
name of a flower, which is the garnish of Indian figure
for whatever they deem most beautiful. This valley,
that contained the chief town and the central position
of the tribe, evinced no little wisdom in those who
selected it as a place of residence. The fortifications
of Vauban were works of mere ginger-bread, compared
with these inaccessible and everlasting battlements of
nature. A gorge, or defile of two miles in length, just
wide enough to admit a single horse, and walled in by
hanging mountains of slate and granite, barred all
approach
,
except of a single person at a time. A cabin,
constructed rudely, but with great strength of massive
rocks, and inhabited by select warriors, the most
trustworthy
of the tribe, was built at the point where the
gorge opened into the valley, and every one who
entered
must pass through this cabin, and by these
warriors. So situated, and so guarded, it might be
considered, as they considered it, impregnable to any
force which, in the present fermenting and distracted
state of the Spanish provinces, they could bring against
it.
The Commanches bear a general resemblance to the
rest of the North American Indians. Inhabiting a
healthful and temperate climate, living in constant
abundance from their inexhaustible supplies of game,
and having vast herds of cattle, horses, and mules, and
constantly exercising in the open air, they attain the
most perfect and entire developement of the human
form. They are of fine persons, large, muscular, and
athletic. They are courageous, fierce, and
independent
,
knowing no law, but their own proud wills. I saw
manifest proofs of their having put the Spaniards under
frequent and heavy contributions. For, besides that
their trade with the Americans supplied them with
rifles and yagers, they had levied from the Spaniards
carabines, powder, and lead; and quantities of bullion,
silver, gold, and massive plate appeared in the cabins
of the principal war chiefs. There were also cumbrous
articles of mahogany furniture, splendid dresses and
trappings, and crosses of gold, decked with gems,
among them. The Creole captives from the Spaniards
were retained as slaves, and performed menial
drudgery
.
Some of them were intermarried among the
savages, and there were numbers of children of this
mixed race.
VOL. I. 6
I had every chance to study this singular people, for
my companion was so constantly and laboriously
employed
in collecting horses, mules, pelts, and silver, that he
left me almost continually alone among a people of
whose language I knew not a word. The stranger's
cabin, which I inhabited, was superintended, by the
appointment of the tribe, by Arci, or The Red Heifer, a
young, stout, and finely formed squaw. She was
active
,
assiduous, and shrewd. She knew every thing
that was passing in the village, especially as regarded
the concerns of the younger members of it. From the
rapid advancement which I made in her good graces, I
drew presages of the havoc which I was afterwards to
make among hearts in this region. She was of course
often with me, for she was cook, steward, and
manage-general
for the cabin in which I dwelt. She delighted
to teach me her language, and she made at least as
rapid progress in learning mine. It was some time
before my vanity had made the discovery, that I was
in the progress of subduing the heart of this fierce
damsel. I was at first rather astonished at the assiduity
with which she waited on me, and the rapidity with
which she mastered words and sentences in my
language
.
She did not long leave me in doubt about the
real motive of her diligence. It became palpable to
me, and, notwithstanding she practised some
awkward
attempts at concealment, to all the tribe, that she
viewed me with eyes of partiality. I soon found myself
involved in difficulties from this quarter. If I could
manage this regard without either affront or too much
encouragement, it would insure me much attention, an
excellent teacher, and the most accurate intelligence.
If I affronted her by a direct rejection of her kindnesses,
she was the daughter of the second council chief, and
of so much importance, as to have been recently on
the brink of marriage with Menko, or The Torrent, the
young, fierce, and principal war-chief of the tribe.
The marriage had been recently broken off by that
chief, without assigning any reason. It was clear that
she entertained deadly revenge towards him, and no
little jealousy for the young and beautiful Spanish
captive
in his keeping. She attributed the breaking off
her marriage with Menko to his growing love for his
fair charge, and had no backwardness to do an ill office
for both, if occasion offered.
I saw at once that it would require no little
management
to preserve the right medium in my intercourse with
this tender virago, so as to commit myself with no party.
It was but a few days before this apt pupil and myself
had words enough in common in our two languages, in
which to bring me acquainted with much of the secret
and interior history of the tribe. I began with great
caution to hint some curiosity about the Spanish captive,
for whom I began to feel rather a vexatious interest.
However indirectly I approached that subject, The Red
Heifer instantly proved, against all gainsayers of our
common origin, that she was a lineal descendant from
Eve. She drew up at once, manifested temper, and
only let me know that this proud danghter of the white
people was a medicine, and was then sullenly silent
upon the subject.
In other respects I was delighted with my abode.
Here was the very spot so sweetly described by the
Mantuan; Muscosi fontes, et somno mollior herba.
I botanized, and read, and walked, and inhaled the
ambrosial atmosphere, and studied the natives, and began
the first lines of a sonnet to the locks of Laura;
but found my easily besetting sin, of dreaming with my
eyes open, carrying it over all other inclinations. I
spent the greater part of every fine day in the cool
peninsula under the shade of the catalpas. Here were
my books, and my materials for writing and drawing.
I had erected a sod seat, and rude shelves, and a table,
and gave into my dreaming existence in ample style.
I made daily progress in becoming acquainted with the
people, and my way of amusing myself, so entirely
different from theirs, seemed rather to render me an
object of curiosity, and to propitiate their good will.
The only unpleasant circumstances of my condition
were the inability to learn any thing about the captive,
who dwelt within a hundred paces of me, except enough
to stimulate a vexatious curiosity, and the difficulty of
sustaining, without either encouragement or offence, the
purrings of my enamoured panther. The captive was
retained in studied seclusion in the cabin of the mother
of Menko, and was seen by no other man, and by him
only by day, and in presence of his mother. I was
sufficiently
warned, that for me to attempt to enter that
cabin, would have given mortal offence. Apart from the
restraint which savage customs generally impose upon
intercourse with women, the high rank, and
probably
the personal beauty, and, more than all, the
exorbitant
ransom demanded for her, dictated this mystery
and forbearance in relation to this captive.
In this way elapsed my first week, and I was
beginning
to feel myself domesticated in the valley. On the
seventh morning of my residence there, I repaired to
my accustomed haunt, and was both surprised and
delighted
to see it occupied by a very young and beautiful
lady. The first glance showed me, that here all my
fairy dreams were out; and all my imaginings of the
beau idal
were here actually before me. To exempt
me from the charge of enthusiasm and extravagance, it
will be only necessary to consider the circumstances of
this meeting. An ordinary young woman, so situated,
would probably have seemed an approach towards
angelic
beauty and excellence. I had seen all women in
my own country with equal indifference, but one. That
one was the youngest daughter of our minister. I
confess
that her black eyes, ruddy cheeks, and curling locks,
had given me a few transient pangs, which I passed off
at the time as attacks of heart-burn, and for which
chalk and magnesia had been prescribed. Judge, then,
what passed within me, when I saw my seat occupied
by a vision, as fair as the poet's dream; a very young
lady, whom my imagination had pictured as disheveled,
subdued, the image of terror and despair, sitting rather
stately and erect, with buoyant hope and spirit in her
eye, and self-estimation and command impressed upon
her whole person. I am naturally awkward at
descriptions
of this sort, but I will attempt to convey some
6*
idea of my first impressions. She seemed not more
than fourteen, but tall, finely formed, with an Italian
face, an almost imperceptible shade of olive softening
the glow of health and freshness in her cheek; eyes of
that black and lustrous brilliancy, that so struck Lord
Byron, as the peculiar trait of a fine Spanish woman.
Raven tresses curled luxuriantly upon a head,
moulded
in the finest form for intelligence. The effect of
her condition seemed to have produced a cast of
melancholy, with which native dignity and youthful
vivacity maintained a constant struggle. Her costume
was, according to my impressions from reading,
European Spanishthe most striking part of it a
velvet mantilla, with a belt sparkling with gems,and
for the rest, it appeared a riding dress; the whole
wearing an air of splendor and fte unaccountable in
her condition, upon any other supposition than, what I
afterwards learned was the fact, that it was the very
dress in which she was taken on horseback, and
conveyed
here as a prisoner.
So complete was the screen of verdure in my alcove,
that I was within four paces of her, before I saw that
my seat was occupied. Astonishment arrested my steps,
and I must have looked particularly foolish. I bowed
low; my cheeks burned, and I was awkwardly retiring.
She partly arose, slightly inclined her head, and, in a
manner in which
navet
pride and confusion
contended
,
asked me in French, Pourquoi fuyiez-vous? I
turned, and stammered something in the same language
about my unwillingness to interrupt or disturb her.
But, she answered, you do not interrupt me. I
came here expressly to meet you. Stranger! I have
but a moment with you. The rules of my
captivity
,
and the cruel circumstances of my confinement,
allow me very seldom to go abroad. This is one of
the times allowed. It is precious, and I must make
the most of it. I have done you the justice to suppose
that you could enter into my situation, and that you
would at once comprehend that it excludes observance,
and the forms of society, which should be so inviolable
under other circumstances. Your honor and your pity
will alike prevent you from thinking me forward, or
acting unworthily, when I tell you, that I have inquired
about you, and sought this meeting. Your companion
is generally away, and you are the only being in this
valley to whom I could have a thought of appealing,
under my deplorable circumstances, for protection.
Upon inquiry of Arci about you, I made so much from
her information, as to assure myself that you were not
a man of the rough and common mould. I am an
unhappy
captive, torn from a father and mother
inexpressibly
dear, and who have no other child. I had been
on an invited party to the house of a friend of my
father, who resided two leagues from Santa Fe. I was
returning in the evening in the midst of my servants.
In a moment we were surrounded by these ruthless
savages. A few shots were fired upon us, and my
servants, and the gentleman that accompanied me,
dispersed
in different directions. They seized the bridle
of my horse, and surrounded me with their warriors.
Resistance and cries were equally unavailing. They
brought me to this valley. I have already been
confined
in this prison, which, under other circumstances,
would be so delightful, six weeks. The chief, who
headed the party that took me, is called Menko. The
tribe understood the value of their prize. They placed
me under the protection of his mother, and I have been
treated with consideration. A few days since I made
an effort to escape, was apprehended, and brought
back. Since that, the visits of Menko have been more
frequent, and his manner less restrained. There is
something terrible to me in his regards, and in his
whole deportment. Think, Sir, that this fierce and
horrible being expresses to me, in his way, that he
loves me. As she said this she crossed herself, half
kneeled, and looked towards the sky for a few moments,
seemingly engaged in intense devotion. Her flashing
eyes were dimmed with tears. She slowly regained
her composure, and resumed, as follows. My only
comfort now is, that you are here, and that this dreaded
being is absent. He went with a deputation from the
tribe to Santa Fe, to treat with my father concerning
my ransom. The deputation should have arrived two
days since. I should have trusted to this mode of
deliverance, and should not have troubled you with my
story; but from the frequent visits of Menko before he
started, from his mother, my keeper, and, more than
all, from Arci, I gather that something secret and
terrible
is about to befall me. Sleep flies from me. I sit
at the little opening in the place where I sleep, and
strain my vision in the direction in which the deputation
should arrive. And yet I have a horrible presentiment,
that if it should arrive with the price of my ransom, I
am not to be liberated. Dear, dear parents! Pitying
mother of Jesus! And you, compassionate stranger,
aid me in this extreme distress. A burst of
irrepressible
grief here cut short her communication for some
moments.
After this pause she seemed to struggle for
composure
,
as she brushed away the fresh starting tears.
Stranger! you are of our race. You are instructed,
and must be a man of humanity. Surely my
confidence
in you cannot be misplaced. Should it appear,
after the arrival of the deputation,' that I am not to
be set at liberty, or in any event, if I am to be
persecuted
by that being, I put every thing dear into your
hands, and appeal to you to aid me to escape to my
parents. Whatever motives detain one of your pursuits
in this place, they could not but operate to induce you
to such an act of honor and humanity; and there is
nothing of reward, or gratitude, that such an act would
not claim from my parents.
She paused, as if for my reply. You cannot doubt
what reply I would have made to any woman under
such circumstances. Add, that this was the very scene
for the visions of romance, and that this lovely girl, in
such extreme distress, seemed more interesting, the
more closely I considered her; that she threw herself
with such a simple and dignified confidence, which
circumstances
seemed so well to justify, upon my honor and
my protection; and I must have been stupid and
unfeeling
,
not to have been ample in protestations of aid and
protection to the utmost extent of my power. I have a
surmise
,
that I was rather eager and eloquent in advancing
these pledges; for, as I made them, a transient blush
succeeded to the paleness of her previous distress.
There was earnestness and sweetness in her mode of
thanking me. And now, she continued, to the
manner of aiding me. I take you at your word. You
will place it to anxiety about inventing the means of
this escape, that I have learned that Arci, so influential
among the young warriors, loves you; and we are both
pursued by these savage fires. I will not trifle with
you, by supposing that such a regard from such a
person
could have any influence with you. She, in her
turn, is beloved by the warrior who commands the
entrance
to this valley, and who arrested me in my attempt
to escape. You will easily account for the interest
with which I have studied into this secret history.
Calculate
,
and manage rightly your influence upon these
two persons, and you may furnish me, through that
influence, the means of escape. Through the warrior,
the egress from this valley may be left unguarded.
Through Arci this may be obtained of him, and horses
may be in readiness, and we may fly, I, from a condition
worse than death, and to a family, of which I am the
only hope; and you, to a compensation exceeding my
ransom, if wealth be your object here; and, if I have
rightly interpreted your character, to the applauses of
your own heart, a still higher compensation.
You may be sure that I disavowed mercenary views,
for, in fact, I had none. Motives of another sort thrilled
through me, and I was again voluble, if not eloquent,
even in French. Having exhausted all that I had to
say on the score of promise, I intreated that she would
so far confide in me, as to meet me often, until the
means of escape could be devised. To this she
returned
,
That nothing but the emergency of the case
could have justified advances like the present. Future
interviews could not further the means of escape. Were
they proper in themselves, they would only be observed,
and excite jealousy, and retard the object in view.
She earnestly conjured me to think of her case with
compassion, and that if any chance offered to aid her,
Arci would inform her; for, that she suspected, that
Arci was jealous of her supposed influence with Menko,
her former lover, and that very circumstance, she
hoped, would induce her to communicate any
intelligence
,
or aid any plan, that would facilitate her escape.
But she closed, You will see, stranger, that I can
have no object in future interviews, except so far as
they might aid our escape. They would be useless to
you, and unfitting to me. Upon this point I have
deliberated
,
and resolved. Remember me. All is
confided
to your prudence. Saying this, she arose and
retired, and I followed her with my eyes, until the
cabin excluded her from my sight.
I had now matter enough for rumination, and no
further need of an imaginary Laura. One simple
thought took possession of my whole mind, and that
was, to meditate through the day, and to dream through
the night, upon the means by which this interesting
captive might fly from her savage prisoners. I went
this day more than once to the bower, to see if she had
not altered her resolution, and come there to meet me
again. I am not sure, that I did not give so far into
the illusions of my imagination, as to suppose her
present
,
and to make a suitable speech upon that
supposition
.
In the evening I had an interview of a very
different character and interest. The Red Heifer
lingered
after supper, and I saw clearly that I must prepare
myself for an explanation. In fact, she let me know,
without circumlocution, that the honor she intended me
was no other, than to offer me all her wealth, consisting
in a large quantity of vermilion, a complete assortment
of Indian finery, a rifle, a yager, dogs, mules, horses,
cows, and that, upon which she seemed to have affixed
the least value, some ingots of silver; and all this, only
with the incumbrance of a fine athletic squaw, six feet
and an inch in height, and with broad copper-colored
cheeks, painted as red as vermillion could make them.
She gave me to understand that her husband would, by
the customs of the tribe, be entitled to the same rank
with her father. Her offer of her substantial person
was in English, and was a curiosity in its kind, and ran
nearly in this form. You silly. You weak. You
baby-hands. No catch horse. No kill buffalo. No
good, but for sit stillread book. Never mind. Me
like. Me make rich. Me make big man. Me your
squaw. The caution of the fair captive, to turn the
affection of this tender heroine to account, struck me
with great force. I knew too little of the workings of
the savage heart, to judge exactly of the medium I
ought to pursue. I made up my reply, however, on
the presumption of her descent from our common
mother, and said every civil thing that I could,
particularly
thanking her for her good opinion of me, and my
sense of my unworthiness of such a prize. I begged
her to wait on me, until I should have learned
something
more of their ways, and rendered myself more
worthy of the honor, by performing some exploit. The
idea of waiting struck her unpleasantly, but the unction
of soothing words anointed that sore. She continued
to hang round me, and to deal out to me the little
stories and slanders of the tribe. I endeavoured, with
as much address as I could command, to turn the
conversation upon the subject of the Spanish
captive
,
and to draw from her what she knew about the
final views of Menko, in regard to her ransom and
liberation
.
A flash of indignation and fierceness kindled
in her eye, and she eagerly replied; You bad. You
same, like Menko. She white. You love. Never
mind. She no love back. Her father big man, rich
no like your people. You no believe great spirit
Never mind. Me hate Menko bad. Me glad she go
away. Nobody love Arci. She here. This was just
the string I wished to harp. I told her, as well as
could explain myself, that I pitied the poor captive
greatly; that, like her, I wished to see her away, and
to know that she was among her friends; that, in wishing
VOL. I. 7
this, I was influenced by no other motive, than
compassion
,
and that she could do nothing for me for which I
should be so thankful, as to give me any information
about her, or any assistance in attempting to enable her
to escape. I imperceptibly approached my wishes with
respect to her interference with the warrior, who
commanded
the approach to the valley; that through her
he might be gained to allow the captive to escape. I
told her, that of course I expected all this to be a
profound
secret. Yes. Me love, she replied; me
no tell. Me tellMenko kill you. But her notions
of fidelity to the tribe were of the most trusty and
high-minded
cast. She could not contemplate the idea of
tempting the sentinel to desert, though she took care to
let me know, that she did not doubt her influence with
him to that point. I then informed her, that I had seen
and conversed with the captive, and that she had
apprehensions
that Menko was not in good faith in regard
to her ransom. She answered, as it appeared, with
entire confidence, that Menko was a bad man, with
great power, but that he would not dare to injure a
person under the sacred protection of the tribe; and
that all the members had too great an interest in their
share of the ransom, to allow him to think of any
dangerous
practices upon her. She promised, however,
that she would watch every motion of Menko, and give
me certain and timely intelligence, if there should be
any real ground of apprehension.
Though disappointed in my attempts to influence
Arci to furnish the direct means of escape, I flattered
myself that another time her heart or her passions
might be so moved, as to bring it about. I spent the
remainder of the day in painful efforts to imagine some
other means of her escape. All my inventions were
heavy, or attended with some insuperable difficulties.
I wandered to the pass, and conversed with the sentinel,
using all the words that I knew, and striving to win his
confidence. I gained all the information that I could
glean from him, respecting the road from that point to
Santa Fe. I returned and sauntered round the cabin,
where the captive, who occupied all my thoughts, was
concealed. Access was forbidden; but there are no
barriers to the imagination, and I busied myself in
supposing
her position, and her thoughts, under the covert
of the rude tenement, and I made most fervent vows,
that no effort should be wanting to free this mistress of
my thoughts.
As the sun began to decline, I heard a' shout,
apparently
of joy, in the direction of the pass. It was
echoed back again by the whole tribe. The old men,
the warriors, the women and children, set up such
piercing yells of joy, as none can imagine but those
that have heard. Thirty warriors, with Menko at
their head, accompanied by a Spanish officer and six
soldiers, came riding up the valley towards the village.
Arci told me it was the return of the deputation from
Santa Fe; that they had stipulated the ransom of the
captive, and that she was to depart the next morning,
under the guard of the Spanish officer and soldiers.
I had been painfully engaged in straining my thoughts
to devise the means of her liberation. It appeared,
that she was now like to be liberated without any effort
of mine. I confess that I felt a selfish feeling of
regret
,
that there was no chance of my having any agency
in the business. The Spanish officer spoke French. I
introduced myself to him, and he courteously detailed
to me all the circumstances of the ransom. From him I
learned the name of the captive. She was called Doa
Martha Miguela d'Alvaro. Her father had been on a
visit to Santa Fe, to quell the dawning spirit of
insurrection
in the province, of which that place was the
capital. He spoke with great feeling of the beauty
and accomplishments of the lovely captive, and the
desolation of her parents at her loss, adding, that
immediately
on regaining the daughter, having succeeded
in the objects of his visit, he should set out with her for
her father's residence at Durango.
Here, then, was the vanishing of all my fairy visions.
A single interview, extorted only by the extreme
pressure
of her condition, was no ground on which to seek
an introduction to her father, even if I accompanied the
escort on its return with her, as the Spanish officer
invited me to do. None but voluntary engagements
detained me here, and I painfully felt that when she
should be gone, my interest in the valley would be
at an end. The pleasure of contemplating beautiful
scenery is soothing, without much excitement, and fades
at once before the higher excitements of the feelings
and the heart. But on what pretext could I follow
her? Certainly not on the slight ground of one casual
meeting, where circumstances compelled her to make
me a confidant, in want of all others. The thought of
never seeing the fair prisoner again was a bitter one.
While I was thus chewing the cud of sweet and bitter
fancies, my cabin door opened, and the tall and fierce
figure of The Red Heifer was before me. It was not the
time for her coming to discharge her usual functions.
I was aware that she must have communications which
she deemed important, and I waited in breathless
impatience
to hear what she had to say. She first made
a motion to enjoin secrecy; adding the emphatic word,
Hush! You tell,me die, you die. I promised to
be hush, as death. In her laconic dialect, which only
gave the leading words, and left all the rest to be
supplied
by looks and gestures, she informed me, that the
warrior, who guarded the pass, her lover, had just been
telling her, that Menko was a bad and treacherous
warrior
,
who meditated the basest treason against the tribe;
which was no other, than to run away with all the
money which was the ransom of the captive, and which
had been entrusted to his care, and to carry her off
with it, that night, and fly to the Appaches, a numerous
and fierce tribe of savages, then at open war with the
Spaniards. He proposed to offer himself as a warrior,
who for ever renounced the Commanches, and wished
to join himself to them. Such elopements from one
tribe to another were common; and a warrior, of such
high fame as Menko, with so much money in his hands,
could have no doubt of his reception among them.
Menko proposed to her lover to leave the pass
unoccupied
,
7*
and to accompany his flight, with the promise
of one half of the ransom as a bride. The sum was
thirty thousand
pesos
in gold, an immense bribe. But,
said she, he no white, like you. But he good. He
no run off to Appaches. He had not, however, been
blind to a motive among savages the most powerful of
all, that if Menko were away, himself would of course
become the head war-chief of the tribe. All chances
too that he would renew his claims upon The Red Heifer,
on which score her lover had jealous fears, would be
obviated. With these views, although he would not
consent to fly to the Appaches, for half the ransom, he
had stipulated to allow Menko to escape with the
captive
,
and had invented a plausible story, which would
account for the escape without implicating himself. She
closed by saying, Me glad white woman go. Glad
Menko go. Me good. Me tell all. Me your squaw
now.
The moment I received this intelligence, it confirmed
the ground of the apprehensions of the captive. I was
impatient to get rid of Arci, who still lingered about
me, expecting some marks of regard, proportioned to
the importance of her communications. I imagined a
pretext, and sent her away on it. As soon as I was
alone, a confusion of thoughts came over my mind.
What was to be done? I could make no communications
to the Spanish officer, nor to the chiefs without
committing
Arci, and violating the most solemn promise of
secrecy. Besides, her deliverance, on which I was
determined, was a thing in which I wished for no
coadjutors
.
I wished to achieve the exploit unaided and
alone. My resolutions and my plan were quickly
formed
.
I had been simply a student, and all my pursuits
and habits had disqualified me for enterprises of the
sort I meditated. But I had never felt the least lack
of personal courage. I was muscular and nimble, in
an unusual degree. I was in perfect health, and had
at command a spirited horse, and a complete equipment
of arms, and my recent undertaking had put me in
daily training for the use of them. I placed this lovely
girl, in all the beauty of her interview with me, full
before
my eyes. I imagined the agony and despair of the
helpless victim completely in the power of the lawless
and brutal savage. His powers were indeed gigantic,
but I much excelled him in agility. I felt myself nerved
to any point of daring, and there was not a particle of
apprehension in my mind. As soon as the twilight
disappeared
,
I stole out to the little stable, where my
horse was penned every night. I saddled him
unobserved
,
and carried out my holster of pistols. I then
returned, took my supper as usual, and despatched
Arci from the cabin, complaining that I was ill, and
wished to retire early to rest. The moment she was
gone, I was out and mounted, and riding under the
covert of the trees and shrubs to the entrance of the
valley. Fortunately, it was a night peculiarly
favorable
to my purpose. It was sultry and thick with
smoky mist. Fleecy pillars of clouds were spread over
the sky, that emitted frequent and brilliant flashes of
lightning. I was stationed under a thick shade, that
entirely concealed both me and my horse, and yet so
near the pass, that, when the sentinel moved, I could
see his whole figure by the lightning, and even its
gleams upon his tomahawk. I waited in this position
until nearly midnight, when I saw the sentinel move off
in the direction of the village. Shortly after I heard
the trample of two horses, rapidly approaching the pass.
The lightning still gleamed in the distance, and my
heart palpitated so loudly, that other sounds became
indistinct to my ear. It was only a moment before I
saw, by the lightning, the gigantic and terrible figure of
Menko, and a female figure, apparently bound fast to
to her horse, and seemingly struggling to disengage
herself, and to speak. He had the bridle of her
horse in his hand, and both horses disappeared beyond
the cabin of the pass. My blood boiled, and the
glow at my heart seemed to endow me with gigantic
prowess. It occurred to me, that it was prudent to
follow them at such a distance, as neither to be seen
nor heard. Accordingly I waited until I supposed they
were half a mile in advance of me. I then followed
them, not meaning to overtake them, until both they
and myself were beyond the apprehension of any
interference
from any of the inmates of the valley. I
continued to ride on behind them, sometimes so near,
that, by the diminishing flashes of lightning, I could
barely distinguish their figures in the obscurity, and
then falling back, through fear of being myself observed,
until I judged that we were ten miles from the valley.
I there came upon a prairie, a level table plain, a little
as the highest earthly boon. His feelings would
have been consulted with the most careful delicacy.
Could he have had even his father's house dog for
a companion, he would have felt comparatively
happy.
He had wandered, perhaps, two leagues from the
point where he was cast ashore. He had seen in
all the distance, no animals of any size, but
kangaroos
;
and the timid manner in which they
avoided him, evidenced that he had nothing to
apprehend
from them. But he was not sufficiently
acquainted with the natural history of this region
to judge, whether there might not still be beasts of
prey. His fears would naturally suggest, that there
were. He had seen serpents, but they seemed
rather of the harmless class, than those deadly ones,
that generally inhabit tropical regions. The place
might be inhabited, though he no where saw the
trace of human footstep. The dews of the night
were like rains; and he well understood, how
adverse
they were to life in such climates. He made
his way to the foot of the mountains, and employed
the fading twilight in searching along their bases
for some cavern of retirement and shelter. But he
sought in vain. The first bench of ascent was, for
the most part, a smooth, shining and perpendicular
wall of three hundred feet in height, without fissure,
or interstice. He found a somewhat thicker shade
where a number of small trees interlaced their
branches, and wove together a thickness of foliage,
which looked as if it would exclude the dew, and
to entangle his arms, and parry his efforts to draw his
dirk, until he should exhaust himself in putting forth his
brute strength. I received severe bruises, and felt his
horrid teeth fixed in my arms and elsewhere, but I still
held to the defensive, and let him struggle on. He
some how contrived to disengage his dirk from his
bosom, and gave me a cut in the arm; but I had soon
the satisfaction to discover that his strength was sinking
in exhaustion, and that his efforts were growing more
feeble. I availed myself of a momentary slackening of
his hold of me, and summoning my yet unwasted
powers
,
I threw him off me, and was uppermost in my turn.
In a moment he received my dirk in his bosom. He
uttered the yell of a fury, and disengaged himself from
me, as though I had been but an infant. He made a
deadly thrust, which, had I not parried, would have
been mortal. As it was, I was severely wounded in
the arm by which I warded off the thrust. This was
his expiring effort. He fell with a convulsive sob, and
was still.
I was covered with blood, both his and my own. I
felt it trickling from my wounds, but equally felt
that they were not mortal. I ran to the captive, who
sat on her horse at a little distance from the
combat
.
A handkerchief was so passed over her face, that
she was only able to utter the hoarse and scarcely
audible sounds of distress. I tore away the
handkerchief
,
unbound her pinioned arms, cut away the rope
by which she was bound to the horse, and made
myself
known to her. Her terror and the agony of her
situation took from her for some moments the power
of reply. I placed her gently on the grass, and made
all the efforts that the case admitted, to calm her
terrors
and her agitation; and I made her comprehend
the danger of pursuit from the valley, and that no time
was to be lost. Her first words were scarcely
articulate
thanks to the Virgin for her deliverance, and her
next were inquiries if I had received wounds in the
affray. I answered that I was slightly wounded, but
begged her to think of nothing but escape; and as soon
as she was able, to mount her horse and fly towards
Santa Fe. To be in preparation for this flight, I took
the horse of the savage that I had slain, and brought him
to mine. The horse was literally loaded with the money
of the ransom, and with bars of bullion. I apportioned
this among the three horses, and encouraged the young
lady to mount her horse again. She uttered earnest
and vehement exclamations, indicating mingled terror
and thankfulness, and promised to exert her best
strength to fly. To mount and be off was but the work
of a moment, and I felt no compunction to leave the
wretch that I had slain, to the burial of the carrion
vultures
.
It was not long before my fair companion regained
her powers, the use of words, and a sufficient degree of
composure to talk of her wonderful escape, and to find
those artless, but powerful expressions of gratitude,
which indicated at once strong feeling and a quick sense
of delicacy and propriety. I shudder to think of the
condition, said she, from which you have rescued
me. Death were but a
trisle
, in comparison of what I
had to apprehend. Oh! what words could describe
what I felt, while you were engaged in the mortal
struggle
.
I cannot imagine how you could have triumphed
over such a terrible and gigantic enemy. Your voice
is faint, and I much fear that you have deceived me as
to the severity of your wounds. I endeavoured to
quiet her apprehensions by assuring her, that my
exertions
and powers of horsemanship would show her that
I was not dangerously wounded; that for the rest, I
waved all thanks, if so that she would put her horse to
his utmost speed, and render the deliverance effectual,
by getting too far in advance of pursuit to be
overtaken
.
But, in truth, I felt myself weak and exhausted.
I had, indeed, achieved a considerable victory, had
won back an immense booty, had shown some
daring
,
and had delivered a distressed damsel of
exquisite
beauty, and under circumstances which must call
forth grateful feelings, and render me something of a
hero in her eye. All these invigorating motives did not
hinder nature from asserting her claims. I felt my
exhaustion
increase with every mile of advance. I
frequently
and anxiously looked back towards the regions
of the morning. But it seemed, in my weakness and
impatience, as though the sun had forgotten to rise. I
trembled from the chill of the morning air, the pain of
my wounds, and the apprehension of pursuit; and my
companion discovered increasing fears about my wounds.
Her apprehension rose to terror, as the increasing
twilight disclosed my whole dress covered with blood
and the paleness of my countenance.
At length the sun arose, and in his glory, from the
rolling mists which curled above the snowy mountains,
down the green slopes of which we had been winding.
At the distance of half a league below us on the plain
appeared a village, inhabited partly by Spanish, and
partly by civilized Indians. Their flat-roofed and
whitewashed
dwellings resembled, in the distance, little square
towers, and the smokes of their fires streamed aloft
from the peaceful hamlet. I welcomed the prospect as
the omen of repose and protection. Weak as I was
my heart exulted. Elysian prospects danced
before
my imagination. I had fabricated in fancy the
last act of my drama, and the catastrophe was most
delightful. I turned to my fair companion. Courage!
said I; we are free. This is the first prospect that
guarantees us against the danger of your being
recaptured
,
and carried back again. I have not dared to
believe in the reality of your deliverance until now.
She surveyed me as I was, all stained with blood, and
tears of tenderness and joy started into her eyes
How much I fear, she replied, that I have
purchased
this deliverance by suffering, and sickness, and
danger to you! I tremble to see how pale you are.
We entered the village, and were soon surrounded
by a crowd of villagers, proposing to me and the young
lady a thousand questions. She waved them to retire,
and to send for the village surgeon. I did not
understand
what she said, for she addressed them in Spanish
But I saw their grateful and glistening eyes turned upon
me, and comprehended that they could not retire
satisfied
,
until she had given them the substance of our
story. The authorities of the village attended us
directly
,
and we were conducted with homage and
observance
to the little
meson
, and to the best apartment
in it. Nothing could have been more opportune than
this repose. I was almost fainting, before a mattress
could be prepared. But I retained consciousness
enough to observe, that my fair companion discovered
as much alarm and sensibility, as vanity itself could
have desired. When the sapient personage came, who
operated both as surgeon and physician of the village,
taken.
But, in truth, I felt myself weak and exhausted.
I had, indeed, achieved a considerable victory, had
won back an immense booty, had shown some
daring
,
and had delivered a distressed damsel of
exquisite
beauty, and under circumstances which must call
forth grateful feelings, and render me something of a
hero in her eye. All these invigorating motives did not
hinder nature from asserting her claims. I felt my
exhaustion
increase with every mile of advance. I
frequently
and anxiously looked back towards the regions
of the morning. But it seemed, in my weakness and
impatience, as though the sun had forgotten to rise. I
trembled from the chill of the morning air, the pain of
my wounds, and the apprehension of pursuit; and my
companion discovered increasing fears about my wounds.
Her apprehension rose to terror, as the increasing
Here commenced between me and the young lady a
kind of contest, whose interests of the two should yield
to the other's. It was evidently dangerous for her to
remain. This village was near the Commanches, and
they could easily send such a force against it, as would
enable them to regain their captive, and at least the
price of her ransom would be demanded. She must
certainly dread the thought of being in any way in their
power again. This was an unanswerable argument, why
she at least ought to go on without delay. I, on my
part, insisted on this, and assured her that all I wanted
was breakfast and a glass of wine to be able to follow
her. She, on the contrary, insisted that the physician
must know best, whether it was safe for me to proceed;
that she apprehended no other danger from being
pursued
by the savages, than being obliged to refund the
ransoma matter to which she attached no
consequence
;
that, however anxious to return to her parents,
no consideration could induce her to leave me in such
a miserable place, and with such attendants, as long as
there was any danger in the case; peremptorily
affirming
,
that she should not depart until it was deemed safe
for me to accompany her. I believe that the first
gallant
remark which I had ever made to any one, was,
that she was placing temptations before me in such
case, to affect to be sick, and thus prolong my stay.
To this she replied, slightly blushing, that there was no
call for remarks of that sort; that she proffered no
more than the simplest offices of humanity; that my
paleness sufficiently confirmed all that the physician
said; and that she better knew her duties, than to leave
one who had so nobly exposed himself, and so severely
suffered for her sake, from selfish considerations.
Well, then, I replied, if you are peremptory, so
also will I be. I will have breakfast, and I will take a
glass of wine, and then, if my strength admits, I will
proceed on my way towards Santa Fe alone, if you will
not accompany me. For I am perfectly aware that this
doctor is a blockhead, and that all I need is
refreshment
.
If I have exposed myself, and suffered, I will
not consent that it shall all be unavailing, by allowing
you to remain here until you are overtaken, and carried
back to the valley. So saying, I made signs to the
host that I wanted wine and breakfast. A fowl and
venison was soon placed before us, and a bottle of
exquisite Parso. I had to encounter the tender
remonstrances
of my companion, and the grave
assurances
of the physician, that this conduct would prove my
death. I ate, and drank, and was refreshed, and felt
no other inconvenience than a certain degree of stiffness
and soreness in my wounds, and weakness from the loss
of blood. When she saw it was of no further use to
remonstrate, the young lady took refreshment too. Our
bills were discharged, and I assisted her on horseback,
and mounted myself. The Alcalde of the village was
in attendance, offering any escort that the village could
furnish for guarding to her home so considerable a
personage
,
as the only daughter of the Conde Alvaro. For
my part, I felt happier, if not safer, to be alone, and
felt glad to hear her decline the proffered aid, wisely
remarking, that whatever force the savages should send
against us, would pass by the village, and that he could
make a more efficient resistance there, than with us.
The force that was offered us, had actually been
collected
and put in array, in less than two hours that we
staid in the village. It was sufficiently formidable in
numbers, and in appearance not unlike the regiment of
Falstaff. I did not doubt that they would all have
scampered away in view of twenty Commanches. As
it was, they accompanied us with great parade a league
on our way.
I was refreshed and invigorated by the food and wine
that I had taken. Once more on horseback, and alone
with my fair
protege
, my wounds, my recent peril, and
all the past was forgotten, and the future opened upon
me in all the rich coloring of hope. I contemplated
nearer and with a more intense interest my companion,
on whose fine countenance the buoyancy of youth,
intelligence
,
and spirit were gleaming again She
admitted
that the physician must have mistook my case,
for that I had regained the same countenance in which
she had seen me at first. Her apprehensions on this
score relieved, and her native flow of spirits returning,
her conversation became frank and delightful. I was
astonished at a display of talent and acquirements,
premature
in any place for a lady apparently so young,
and particularly unexpected from a young lady of that
country, whose inhabitants in general we have been
taught to consider so uneducated. The prematurity of
8*
attainment might be accounted for by the well known
fact, that the mind, as well as the form of females is
developed earlier in southern, than in northern countries.
She informed me that she had been educated with
great care at a convent in Seville, in Old Spain, of
which city her father was an ancient grandee. He had
served with distinction in his early years on the coast
of Morocco against the Moors, and had sustained
various offices and honors there. Just before the
invasion of his country by Napoleon, he had been
appointed
to the high and lucrative trust which he now
held in New Spain. Wisely foreseeing in the distance
the approaching distractions of the mother country, he
had in his own mind renounced it for ever as a home,
and had, on receiving the appointment in question,
transferred
the proceeds of his immense estates to the new
world. He lived in dignified and princely retirement
near the seat of his government, Durango, in New
Spain. It was not long since he had sent for his
daughter.
At this part of her history her voice faltered. Her
countenance was suffused with the crimson of
consciousness
,
and she seemed to hesitate about proceeding any
farther in her narrative. But, apparently the
navet
of youth, perhaps a wish to prepare me for an
acquaintance
with her father's family by some previous
knowledge
of its situation and members, possibly some little
interest in a young man, who might be supposed to
have some estimation in her mind, seemed to urge her
on. She went on to observe, that on arriving at her
father's house, she was introduced to a young
gentleman
,
called Don Pedro Guttierez, son of a nobleman
of Old Spain, who had been a compatriot and
fellow-soldier
with her father, and who now discharged a
lucrative and important trust at Mexico. She instantly
perceived that there were particular views in his being
there at the juncture of her arrival; that, for her part,
she was ready to admit his prospects, rank, and dignity,
but that he had always been unamiable in her view;
that she might possibly come in time to esteem him as a
friend, or a relative, but in any nearer connexion never;
that she had expressed as much to her father, when he
intimated a wish that she might look at him with other
feelings; that events were proceeding in this train at
her father's house, until the preceding winter; that
then her father had been compelled, by the duties of
his office, to visit the frontier provinces, to quell the
spirit of insurrection against the existing government;
that she had accompanied her father, his family,
and Don Pedro in their journey to Santa Fe; that,
after having resided there for some time, she had been
invited to the fatal party of her father's friend; and that,
in returning from it, as has been related, she was
captured
by the Commanches. She recurred to the
forebodings
,
of which she had spoken to me in the valley.
She perceived that Menko entertained for her
sentiments
,
for which she had no other name, than love;
that he had insinuated in his way, how much more
independent and happy the wife of a Commanche chief
would be, than the wife of a feeble and cowardly
Spaniard; that his mother often talked in the same
strain, and began finally to intimate to her the
necessity
of making up her mind to receive Menko as a
husband, and to be adopted into the tribe, as so many
other captives were. To all this she had considered it
the part of policy to make no reply. Up to this time
she had trembled, indeed, to find herself a captive
among them; but it was a case that had frequently
happened, to be carried captive among them. Such
stories were familiar to her ear. She had never
supposed
,
for a moment, that any thing worse was likely to
come of it, than a heavy ransom, which she well knew
would be no consideration with her father. For they
made no secret, that they detained her simply with a
view to her ransom; that after Menko had arrived the
preceding day with the Spanish guard, her suspicions
of his intended treachery were first excited, by finding
that the Spanish guard was not allowed to visit her,
Menko
pretending that all the preliminaries of the ransom
were not yet settled; that as soon as the evening came,
she found herself watched, and not permitted to leave
her cabin; that Menko then came in, and told her that
he was a much greater man than her father; that the
Spaniards were no better than squaws; that he was
determined to make her his squaw, as many of the
tribe had Spanish squaws; that he knew how to love
better than a pitiful white man; and that she should
have plenty of servants, horses, money, and vermilion,
and want nothing, if she would go willingly with him
among the Appaches. But that, if she made any
difficulty
,
he was not, like a white skin, to be turned
from his purpose, and that he would bind her fast,
and carry her off by force. He then insisted upon a
direct answer. She watched an opportunity, and made
an effort to get abroad, and reveal his intended
treachery
,
and claim the protection of the tribe; that Menko
and his mother brought her back by force, and bound
her, and placed a handkerchief over her face, as has
been related; and that not far from midnight they had
placed her on horseback, and bound her so firmly, that
all her struggles to disengage herself had been
unavailing
.
Such was the brief story of her captivity. From
this story she digressed to the history of her father's
family. It was sufficiently obvious, amidst all the
delicacy
and circumspection of these details, that she
counted upon me for a while at least, as likely to
become
a member of her father's family, and that she
wished me to have a full view of the ground before me,
with the benevolent wish, that understanding the
different
characters, I might calculate best how to propitiate
them. She spoke of her father as honorable,
high-minded
,
ambitious, loving her more than any thing,
except power; but flexible and unsteady in his purpose.
In her eulogy of her mother, she was unsparing and
unqualified. She represented her as educated, gifted,
gentle, and affectionate in the extreme, and receiving
from her the entireness of filial affection. In speaking
of the father confessor, her views of the sanctity of his
office forbade her from describing him in terms of
reprehension. But I could perceive that she wished to
put me on my guard against him. It was clear, too,
that in her account of her admirer, whom she expected
to find with her father, more was meant than met the
ear, and that she wished me to see that it was out of
the question for me to think of any thing beyond the
claims of simple gratitude; and to caution me against
entertaining any aspiring views in my own case. At
least she wished me to take a full and entire survey of
the premises, and of all the rocks and quicksands, that
I might know how to steer my little skiff among them.
For the rest, with a great deal of spirit and vivacity,
she was all truth and simplicity. There was a laconic
force in her expressions, and a delightful Spanish
accent
in her French, which rendered her conversation
singularly interesting. I was flattered by the pains
which she took to enable me to understand the bearings
of things in her father's family, and notwithstanding I
had requested her to recur no more to the subject of
her obligations to me, and though she seemed to wish
to avoid the theme, artless expressions of grateful
feeling, and anxiety that I might find it consistent to fix
myself in her father's family, escaped her in spite of
herself. I will fairly confess to you, that I did not at all
regret my loss of blood, nor the anguish of wounds,
which received such amiable and considerate sympathy.
I was a young man, and, to avail myself of the old
Latin saw, you could expect nothing of me foreign to
my age and feelings. It was to me a most delightful
journey, and, from the kindling brightness of her eye,
and the growing frankness of her conversation, I had
reason to believe not unpleasant to her. She
listened
with the most flattering attention to my short
recital of the passages of my history up to the present,
and seemed as much astonished at the possibility of
such an education as mine being obtained in the States,
as I had been that she should have been so well
instructed
in New Spain. She informed me, that a
thought occurred to her of an employment, as she
judged, suited to my character and pursuits, that would
offer in her father's family, which she hoped might
induce
me to settle there. She did not, indeed, name it,
but stated that she would suggest it to her father, and
hoped that through him it would be offered and made
acceptable to me.
In these conversations, and in occasional stops at the
haciendas
and
mesons
, the time passed rapidly. As
soon as we were free from the fear of pursuit, I could
have wished the distance to Santa Fe twice as great
as it was. The country was delightfully interesting,
and every prospect brightened in my eye. The people
all seemed good, obliging, and happy. I had not been
much used to the society of ladies, and, with one slight
exception, had seen all hitherto with the same
indifference
.
But I used every effort in this case to stand on my
best. Either joy exalted my imagination, or the
country
was more beautiful, and the scenery more inspiring
than any I had seen, or the slight fever of my wounds
created a fermenting excitement in my brain. Be the
cause what it might, I felt myself a new man in point of
eloquence. I smiled internally at my own volubility.
Every thing seemed to suggest thoughts and words to
me. I was thorough in my French, but had never
been in habits of speaking it. But it appeared as if
the occasion had transformed me into a Parisian. I
remarked, more than once, that my energy of language
and fluency of expression brought a smile into her face,
in which there seemed to be a kind of arch
consciousness
.
Every thing on the earth, both joy and sorrow, have
their term, and this journey was too pleasant to last
long. The evening of the second day was drawing on,
when, in the direction of the setting sun, we saw the
glittering of the towers of Santa Fe. A peasant had
been sent in advance to advertise the Conde of the
approach of his daughter. Yonder, said she,
turning
her melting and thankful eye to Heaven, is the
house where reside my dear parents. What words
could convey the emotions of my heart, as I return to
them? And what do not I and they owe to you,
generous
deliverer? The chill of death must be on this
heart, before it forgets its obligations. Saying this,
her folded hands were clasped, and she appeared to be
devoutly occupied in thanksgiving, until we entered the
town. We were admonished that the news of her
deliverance and return had been spread, for we entered
amidst the ringing of bells, the discharge of cannon,
and an universal illumination of the town. The whole
population poured into the streets, and the welkin rung
with
vivas
, and acclamations. The
canaille
of the
streets thronged round us, and she was nearly stifled
with kisses and embraces; and I also had my share.
For immediately on entering the town, she admonished
me that it would be necessary for us both to dismount.
Our horses were led, and we conducted amidst these
acclamations to the public square, the place of the
palace, which the Conde occupied as his temporary
residence. Around this square was paraded all the
military of the town and vicinity, in sufficient numbers,
it seemed, to have blotted out the nation of the
Commanches
,
and to have obtained the release of the
returned
captive by force.
At the gate that opened into the public square
appeared
the Conde, surrounded by his officers. He
was a stout and venerable looking man, enveloped in a
flowing Spanish cloak, a broad drooping hat with white
plumes, and armed with a sword of portentous length
and size. His countenance was noble, but stern and
inflexible. The
tout ensemble
, with his air and manner,
strongly called up the remembrance of the prints of the
Spanish, in the times of Charles V. As soon as the
father and daughter saw each other, the state of the
grandoe gave place to the tenderness of the father.
Nature asserted all her claims. It was one of those
meetings which the imagination only can paint. At
the entrance of the great stair-case of the palace, the
daughter exchanged the arms of the father for those of
the mother, and the rapturous tears and sobbings were
from a motive the direct opposite of that which caused
the lamentations heard in Ramah. I had never
witnessed
VOL. I. 9
such a scene, nor such a cause for rejoicing.
The dogs barked for joy. Domestics, Indians, negroes,
mestizos, samboes, male and female, old and young,
crowded round the restored daughter. Clapping of
hands, kisses and embraces, tears and exclamations,
were seen and heard on every side. No language has
so many terms of fondness as the Spanish, and this
occasion seemed to exhaust them. Never did I see a
more affectionate, and apparently a more happy family.
After the salutations of the family, she received those
of the tall, whiskered, and stately Don Pedro, who
appeared to eye me from the first moment with the
lowering looks of distrust. Then she was welcomed
home by the duea, and last of all by the father
confessor
.
Some minutes elapsed before there was sufficient
composure for my introduction. I was then introduced
by the daughter to her parents, with a concise, but
energetic statement of what I had done, and of her
obligations, in French. In the joyous burst of the
feelings called forth by the occasion, I went through
this formidable introduction with more confidence and
composure than I had expected. The speaking and
encouraging countenance of the daughter followed me
through it; and it was sufficiently visible to me, that
she wished me to make a favorable impression. The
Spanish are known for the strength and earnestness of
their feelings, when a great occasion excites them. I
could not have wished more ardent expressions of
admiration and gratitude, than I received from all.
I was the hero of the hour. Deep and unaffected
concern
was manifested about my wounds and visible
paleness. My country, my religion, every thing was
overlooked, in contemplating my exposure, and its
joyous
termination. It was a full hour before the restored
daughter had told enough of her story, and endured
enough of caresses, to be allowed to sit down in quiet.
We were then seated to chocolate, a supper, a gisado,
and confectionary. The daughter was seated between
the father and the mother, with a hand in the hand of
each. On one side was the father confessor, and on
the other Don Pedro. So seated, she gave a brief
narrative of her captivity and release in Spanish, and
so loud and distinct, that the assembled family could
hear. At every pause in her story, although I could
not comprehend the language, I could easily discern,
by the grateful and glistening eyes of the hearers turned
upon me, that I had my full meed of praise. If I ever
saw cause for envy, it was the feelings of the parents
and the child on this joyous occasion. From the supper
table we were ushered into the chapel. It was hung with
black, decorated with religious paintings, and lighted
with waxen tapers. The daughter turned upon me an
imploring look, the purport of which I understood to
be, to go as far as I could in imitating the observances
of the rest. High mass was celebrated by the father
confessor with great solemnity, and a Te Deum
performed
on the organ. My views of religious obligation,
and my principles, allowed me to go certain, but not
all lengths, in joining in the ceremonies of their church.
A single look from the daughter, as I came from the
chapel, told me that, in her judgment, I had kept the
right medium in this observance.
I retired for rest, but, much as I needed repose, not
to sleep. The adventures of the three last days had
crowded upon me too rapidly, to allow my mind
easily to return to its natural level of repose. Its
agitation was that of the waves, just after the fury of
the storm has been suspended. I threw myself on the
stately and downy couch assigned me, and wished the
calm which sleep gives, before I took a view of my
actual position, and attempted to arrange my plans for
the future. But the more I courted sleep, the more
tumultuously thoughts crowded upon me. The old
question returned, What doest thou, and what wilt thou
do here? A youth, from the land of undeviating
industry
and regular pursuits, in the wild regions west of
the Mississippi, then among savages, and soon after his
hands red with the blood of a fellow creature stretched
at his feet, a knight-errant, a deliverer of a beautiful
and distressed damsel; and finally in the palace of a
grandee of Spain, among Catholics, a people of other
manners, another language, and another religion. What
have I to do here? On what proper pretext stay?
Shall I accept a compensation which I have fairly won
with my sword? I came to this country with mixed
motives, not distinctly known to myself; but to acquire
a fair and honest fortune was, undoubtedly, one of my
hopes. Should I accept this compensation, and take my
leave, will not a certain image be painfully present to my
remembrance? At least there appears at present no
assignable ground for my remaining here. Because I
have delivered the daughter, shall I fix myself on her
family? What was the employment of which she spake?
And then, had she manifested no symptoms of flattering
partiality for me? None at all. That she had, was
the dictate of mere inexperienced vanity. She had
been simply grateful, and had taken pains to put an
extinguisher upon any such idle notions, by letting me
know that, by the family, all the elements of such a
calculation had been previously arranged and settled.
To look upon all sides of all these subjects was
employment
enough for one night. I probably turned in my
bed at least a hundred times, and revolved as many
projects. I came in the end to no fixed resolution, but
this; I will follow the leading of circumstances. They
shall see that a well principled, and well educated young
man will never swerve, for a moment, from the conduct
prompted by integrity and self-respect. If these will
not allow me to remain here, I will join my company
when they come to this place of our union, and return
to my own country. On this resolution I fell asleep. I
am not sure of my dreams; but I think that I fancied
Doa Martha telling her parents that I was much to be
preferred to Don Pedro.
9*
CHAPTER IV.
Todo paxaro en su nido
Natural canto mantiene.
Lope de Vega
.
As soon as I was placed in a state of complete
repose
,
I began to feel all my weakness and exhaustion.
The next morning I found that my wounds were
inflamed
,
and that I was labouring with fever. I arose
and went below, but I painfully felt that I must remain
here for some time at least, for the healing of my
wounds, and the restoration of my exhausted strength.
My increased paleness and indisposition drew from the
family assembled in the morning for breakfast,
expressions
of apprehension and concern. It was insisted that
I should put myself under the care of the family
physician
.
The Condesa manifested a maternal interest in
my case, and they drew from me a promise that I would
confine myself, for the present, to the house. Every
member of the family, and all the strangers who had
come in to congratulate the Conde on the arrival of his
daughter, vied with each other in demonstrations of the
most flattering regard and concern. The family
physician
prescribed. My wounds were dressed anew. The
chamber of my confinement was contiguous to the
library
,
and connected with it. In it was a very
considerable
collection of books, and no small portion of
them in French. The Conde, his lady, Don Pedro,
occasionally distinguished guests that were on terms of
intimacy with the family, and the daughter, whom I
shall designate, as she was called in the family, Doa
Martha, were frequently with me, that I might not
suffer, as they kindly said, from loneliness; and as all
these spoke French, I could enter at once into the
pleasures of conversation. I was allowed every day
to descend to the parlor, and then Doa Martha, and
sometimes other young ladies, her visitants, amused us
with songs, of which they seemed to possess an
inexhaustible
variety, accompanied generally by the guitar,
and sometimes by the piano-forte. I sometimes saw one
person among them looking upon me, as if by stealth,
with an anxiety more flattering, than all the rest. The
only unpleasant circumstance of the case was, that I
felt myself completely trammelled by the positive and
pedantic rules of the physician; and had to swallow
ptisans, and teas, and vulnerary balsams in somewhat
greater profusion than I could have wished; but Doa
Martha said it was necessary, and I shut my eyes, and
hardened my heart, and swallowed according to the
prescription.
The conversations often turned upon the geography
and history of Old Spain, and the revolution, which was
then raging in all its fury. It was a natural transition
from that to the physical and moral resources of the
Spanish colonies in the new world, countries so vast and
diversified, and of such magnificent and sublime features
of natural grandeur, that the very description of them
was poetry. The Mexican empire they represented as
richer in natural and moral resources, than any other
country; and they dwelt with gloomy forebodings upon
its ulterior prospects. They asserted that the seeds of
disorganization and rebellion were thickly sown over its
whole surface, and they anticipated a terrible harvest,
similar to that which was reaping in Old Spain, and
in Spanish South America. It was obvious that they
were all, and Martha among the rest, staunch royalists,
thorough Gauchu pines, instinctive enemies to every
form of republican government, and contemplating with
horror and disgust the development of republican
principles
.
It may well be supposed, that they could not
be so ignorant of my country, its institutions, the spirit
of its government, and its present condition, as not to
view it with no small portion of jealousy. They rightly
appreciated its growing greatness, resources, and power,
and had a suitable respect for its prowess, and its
capacity either for offence or defence. But they
evidently
had more dread of our disposition to spread
our principles among their people, than the case
warranted. For the rest, they had been accustomed to
consider us as a nation of pedlars and sharpers,
immoderately
addicted to gain, and sordid in the last
degree; that we were a kind of atheistic
canaille
, on
an entire level, without models of noble and chivalrous
feeling; in short, a kind of fierce and polished savages,
whose laws and institutions were graduated solely with
a view to gain. They were pleased to consider me as
one of those anomalous exceptions from general rules,
which sometimes occur every where. In short, they
contemplated me as a kind of
lusus natur
, a tamed
Orson. They expressed an earnest hope that a man,
who could have been reared, as they supposed, with no
settled principles in morals, politics, or religion, might,
without abandoning preconceived opinions, be imbued
with the dogmas of the Spanish regime and the Catholic
church, and become an adopted son of the country.
For a man to know the force of his patriotism, it is
necessary that he should be in a foreign country, and
hear his own vilified. I felt the rising warmth, and was
obliged to repress it, in order to answer with
moderation
and decorum. I said to them, that the less
informed classes in our country thought of the Spanish
in the old and new world, not precisely as they appeared
to think of us, but, if possible, with more and deeper
contempt; but that all the informed classes felt and
appreciated the Spanish character. I was sorry to see
the same prejudices here, which, in our country, only
existed among the lowest of the people. I am not
going, I observed, to answer and refute in detail all
the charges which you have brought against us. It is
true, in reply to the sweeping charge of avarice, that
we are a money-getting people; and, unfortunately,
your country has taken, as samples of ours, only the
people whose sole business abroad is to make money.
These men, perhaps, carry the desire of acquisition to
avarice and a passion. But it is by no means, as you
suppose, an universal trait. No country, according to
its wealth, much less according to its age, has so many
noble public and private charities. There is no
country
in which so much indulgence is shown to beggars, in
which the poor have so much consideration, and whose
regulations furnish them with so much comfort. Acts
of private generosity are not so apt to be blazoned
there, for the very reason that they are common, and
that they who perform them feel that they are only
acting in common with a multitude of others, and shrink
from public applause. If you would know whether we
have the spirit of public munificence among us, you
must see, as I have seen, our public buildings, and
our works of public utility and comfort in our cities.
To know if we have public enterprise, you must
see those canals that wed the lakes with the ocean,
and the commencement of those projects that are to
unite the long courses of the western streams with the
Atlantic waters. To judge if we are a happy
people
,
you must traverse, as I have done, the Union
from one extreme to the other, and see every where
the increasing comfort, knowledge, and opulence of
ten millions of people, among whom property, equal
rights, comfortable existence, contentment, cheerfulness,
and hope are, as I believe, more generally and plentifully
diffused, than among any other people of the same
numbers on our globe. You suppose that there are
among us no pursuits, but those dictated by avarice.
If my books were here from the Commanche valley, I
would read to you a thousand manifest proofs from our
history to the contrary. I would refer you to the great
mass of that very class of people that has given you such
impressions of our sordidness and avarice, the sailors.
The annals of no age or country, I dare affirm, can
furnish a more general and striking contempt of money,
and of every thing but glory, a more entire disregard
of every mean and sordid motive, and even of life
itself
,
than the history of our marine in our late war
with Great Britain. In the history of what other
country will you find authenticated reports of wounded
sailors voluntarily dropping into the sea after battle, and
alleging as a reason for doing so, that they were
wounded
past the hope of cure, and could do nothing more
for their country? There is, I believe, no country where
a miser is regarded with more contempt, and a rich
man, merely as such, with less respect. Nothing blasts
the reputation sooner, than to be reputed the slave of
avarice. We are reputed, beyond the seas, and by
many of the bigoted and prejudiced of the parent
country, to be destitute of all taste for the fine arts and
for literature, and even the dawning of patronage and
literary munificence. As it regards the first, I say
nothing of the models in the fine arts, which are
already
collected in Philadelphia and the other cities.
That we produce our full share of the materials of
excellence in the fine arts, let the fact attest, that more
than an equal proportion of the distinguished British
painters of the last age, and the promising geniuses of
the present, were, and are natives of the United States.
Literature receives in our country a more ample
patronage
,
than it did in the parent country half a century
ago. As it regards our growing improvement in another
point of view, the facilities of travel and
communication
,
it would be invidious to compare our country with
yours. But in this respect, even in our incipient
existence
we may boldly challenge comparison with any
country on the globe. Steam-boats connect in easy,
rapid, and pleasant communication, a thousand leagues
of our western waters. There are more than a
hundred
that traverse them in every direction. The lateral
streams, the lakes, the arms of the sea, the different
points along the Atlantic shore are all traversed by
steam-boats. These boats, the canals, the public roads,
the places of resort for amusement or health, present a
moving mass of well dressed, civil, and apparently
happy
travellers. You deem us all
canaille
. On the
contrary
,
compared with the
leperos
and the rabble of your
cities, as all agree in describing them, the whole
population
of the cities and the country with us, would be
deemed of the higher orders. It is true, we have no
nobility, no titled and privileged class. These things
rest with us upon the base, where nature, reason,
common
sense, and wise arrangement have placed them,
upon personal merit. But if you imagine we have no
scale by which to estimate the difference between the
wise and good, and the ignorant and vile, you deeply
mistake. The homage which we pay to talents, virtue,
and public services is heart-felt, and paid so much the
more cheerfully, as it is not levied as a tax, and is very
different from the forced observance which is awarded
to titled rank on the claims of prescription. In presence
of the father confessor it would, perhaps, be considered
indecorous to compare our worship with yours. I will
only remark, that, in that region where I was bred, it
has been generally conceded, that a greater proportion
of the people attend public worship, as a habit, than in
any other country. Religion has a more general
influence
upon morals and sentiments. Of consequence,
fewer crimes are committed, and there are fewer public
executions, than elsewhere. In short, the whole
country
,
with some very limited regions excepted, presents
such a spectacle of order, quiet, and peaceable industry,
and regular advancement in comfort and improvement
of every kind, as, I firmly believe, is not to be seen in
an equal degree in any other country. You should
see, before you condemn us. I regret to find among
the highest and the most intelligent here, the same
prejudices and unfounded impressions, which only exist
with us among the lower orders of the people.
The boldness and the hardihood of my harangue, if
not its eloquence and truth, astonished them. If it did
not produce conviction, and a higher estimation of my
country, I remarked, that it did not seem to diminish their
respect for one, who had dared so frankly to compare
it with others. I thought I had produced an effect with
the mother and the daughter. The Conde only
remarked
,
that of the few inhabitants of the States that
he had seen, they were all in the same habit of
vaunting
their own country. The father confessor mused,
made the sign of the cross, and left the apartment.
The expression of Don Pedro was more unequivocal.
It was evidently the sueering and supercilious look of a
man, who regarded the speaker with disdain.
VOL. I. 10
Remember, if I have seemed a tiresome egotist long
ere this, you must thank yourself for your curiosity to
hear my adventures, and that you were fairly
forewarned
what you had to expect. Nothing material
occurred in my history for some days. My wounds
were healing. My colour and strength returned. I
foresaw that ill health would soon serve me no
longer
as a pretext for remaining in this family. As my
health returned, I saw Doa Martha less frequently,
and I thought there was a visible anxiety in her
countenance
.
I had sometimes almost dared to believe
that she regarded me with partiality apart from any
feelings in relation to her deliverance from captivity.
But when I had almost arrived at an undoubting
conviction
of this, the present avoidance of me, apparently
without motive, levelled the fabric of my hopes with
the dust. I vexed myself with suspicions, that she even
took pains to let me see that she could treat Don Pedro
with kindness. He took no pains to disguise his
haughtiness
and dislike. As was natural, recurrence was
often made in conversation to the adventure of the
deliverance
of Doa Martha. He invariably took occasion,
speaking in Spanish, which I began, however, to
understand
,
to treat the whole affair as a mere trivial
matter, very common in the history of their intercourse
with the savages; intimating always, that, with such an
incitement as the liberation of the lady in question,
none but the most worthless poltron could have failed
to do the same.
I had leisure, during this confinement, to draw
portraits
of the principal members of the family. All the
thoughts of the Conde seemed to be engrossed in
arranging
the affairs of his government, and in repressing
the incipient spirit of republicanism, in which he seemed
to have had great success. But although every thing
of that kind appeared to be repressed for the moment,
and the march of the government seemed to have
regained
the calm and regular ascendency of despotism,
the anxious look of the governor was in perfect
accordance
with his declaration, that this spirit in the people
was only as coals buried under ashes, and he predicted
that the flames would soon burst forth again. In these
moments he could not always repress exclamations of
most uncourteous bitterness against the contiguity and
the infectious nature of the example of my country.
He incidentally manifested that he looked to Don Pedro
as one of the most efficient props of his government,
and his future son-in-law. But he appeared too much
occupied, to bestow any particular attention on his
private
concerns.
The Condesa still retained the traces of a beautiful
person; she possessed great talents, and her
conversation
was rich and interesting. Her eye either flashed
with intelligence, or melted with tenderness; and she
appeared the mellowed and impressive original, of
which the daughter was the fresh and beautiful copy.
In her deportment, and in hers alone, there seemed
nothing like inconstancy or caprice; and she alone
constantly manifested towards me marked and
unequivocal
partiality, and even tenderness. The father
confessor
,
whom they called by the name Josephus, was
a priest of high standing in the country, had been
educated at Rome, and had all the external suavity
and observance of a courtier, the training and adroitness
of a jesuit, and a sufficiency of intrigue to have been
minister of the Grand Seignior. His form was noble,
his voice deep and impressive, and every function of
his ministry performed with an indescribable grace.
Seen at a distance, his countenance and manner inspired
respect. Contemplated more nearly and intensely,
there was something in it sinister and repressing to
confidence
and affection. He regarded the spirit of the
age, the fermenting germ of republicanism, and the
slightest beginnings of innovation in the Catholic
hierarchy
,
with a deep aversion, that savoured rather of a
malignant nature, than of the prejudices of education.
In the same proportion as his own enlightened mind
had penetrated the absurdities of those points, which
constitute the incredible and contradictory of the
Catholic
dogmas, was he bitter and strenuous, even to
persecution
,
for retaining every jot and tittle of them in all their
ancient strictness. He entertained for my powers and
acquirements, such as they were, perhaps too much
respect. But for the rest, he regarded me with a
jealousy and distrust, for which, as I had treated him
with uniform deference and consideration, I could hardly
account even on the score of our difference of opinion.
On the whole, he seemed to regard me as dangerous
among the faithful of his flock, on the ground of my
fancied learning and acuteness.
The only time in which I saw the countenance of
Doa Martha wholly free from anxiety and chagrin,
and her manner towards me as it had been at the first,
was on an evening when she came into the library
during my confinement, leading up to me, and
introducing
with mock gravity her duea, a character
formerly
so indispensable in an ancient Spanish family,
and retained by the Conde out of his stern regard to
the usages of the ancient
rgime
. Have you never
read a translated Spanish romauce? said she; if
you have, permit me to show you the identical
character
,
called a duea. This is Doa Dorothea, an
ancient friend of the family, whose duty it is to keep
volatile and perverse young personages, like myself, for
instance, in the right way. She has the hundred eyes
of Argus, and the incorruptible watchfulness of the
dragon that guarded the golden fleece. She is as hard
as adamant, and as little exposed to melting as platina.
So you see, how little danger there is that I should be
allowed to act naughtily, even if I would; and how
little chance there is that I should bestow my poor
hand and heart unworthily. I could with difficulty
restrain my laughter, when I looked upon the personage
who sustained such a grave office. She was a round,
short, and plump figure, with a most prominent front,
dressed in a short cotton jacket, which showed her fat
and joyous figure to wonderful advantage. Good nature
laughed in her grey eyes and in her ruddy face, which
was almost an exact circle. She was, in fact, an
exact female Sancho Panza. It was obvious that she
10*
had availed herself as faithfully of the privileges of
good eating and drinking, and that she was disposed to
allow others to follow their inclinations in these and in
all respects. There was something irresistibly
ludicrous
,
in supposing such a person set as a guard over
such a young lady, as Doa Martha. The old lady
sustained the gravity of her office but a moment. She
laughed and caressed her young lady, and was gay and
voluble, and threw out her Spanish proverbs, like her
famous predecessor. As she addressed part of her
conversation to me, and spoke in Spanish, that part of
it which I might not be supposed to understand, Martha
translated for my use into French, with true Spanish
gravity. She began by describing the mourning and
desolation about the house, when her dear young lady
was first carried off by the savages, how many masses
were offered, and prayers said for her return; how
stoutly and earnestly herself had supplicated the Virgin
on her account, and how long she had abstained from
flesh and wine, under a vow for her return; that, for
her part, if she had been a man, and a soldier, like
Don Pedro, she would have set out alone, if none
would have gone with her, to fight the savages for her
rescue. You are the man, after all, for me; for you,
that were not of her country, or religion, fought for her,
while the Don was here at home, mourning, and talking
about her. I have no doubt that he would murder you
at once, if he thought you capable of looking upon her
with the eyes of love. But I learned from my mother,
rest her soul, that love will go where it will go. For my
part, I never saw two persons look so much alike, as you
two. Here the young lady blushed deeply, and ceased
to translate. But I understood almost every word;
and what I did not understand, her laughing eyes and
significant gestures supplied. She turned to the young
lady, See now, said she, how he blushes! In truth,
he looks as grave and simple as a young girl. One
would think he did not know a pretty woman from a
guava
. Who would think, that such a blushing and
handsome boy could attack and conquer one of those
terrible savages? I have seen these heretics before.
They have the finest twinkling eyes and ruddy cheeks,
and, I have heard, they are but sad fellows among the
ladies. At the same time she chucked me familiarly
under the chin, calling me
bueno mozo
, hoping that I
should become
buen catalico
, and take one of the young
ladies of the country for a wife.
She seemed sufficiently disposed to proceed in the
same style; but her young lady interposed, and
suddenly
resuming her countenance of care, she appeared to
make an effort in addressing me. We have had enough
of this, said she. Now we will have, if you please,
one word of seriousness. You cannot be surprised,
that I think of you with some interest, and that I can
readily imagine how anxious you must be to have some
pursuit and employment. I am told, that all the young
men of your country feel in this way. Different as our
modes of thinking are, I respect such feelings. We are
preparing to depart for Durango. Here we have never
been, and cannot be, at home. My mother has
expressed
a decided wish, that you should accompany us. You
will receive a visit from my father, proposing terms of
honorable employment with us. Will you deem it
forwardness
or gratitude in me, if I add my wishes to those
of my mother, that these terms may prove acceptable
to you? In giving utterance to the purest and simplest of
my feelings, I am sure that you are too noble, too
generous
,
to misinterpret me. You have youth, intelligence,
spirit, learning; every thing to fit you for such a theatre,
as our unhappy country is just opening. My father
foresees, and it is easy to foresee the murky clouds of
change and rebellion rising on all quarters of our
horizon
;
and the times call for wise heads, strong hands,
and true hearts. I am sure that our house needs them.
For we have the patriots, as they call themselves, for
enemies on the one hand, and my father has enemies
and competitors even among the royalists; and he has
found, by sad experience, that all is hollow and false
on every side. What a noble career opens for a man
like you! When my mother expressed her wish that
you might remain with us, she remarked, what a
soothing
tranquillity she should derive, from knowing that
one true and determined heart would be always near
us. Much more of a similar import was said, and
having thus prepared me for the visit of her father,
she left me, and the fat and laughing duea waddled
after her.
Soon after the Conde entered, with something more
of state and gravity than usual on his brow. He began
by congratulating me on my evident restoration to
health. The physician, by whose judgment we are
wholly guided in these cases, he added, assures us
that your wounds are so healed, that you may safely go
abroad. I have happily completed the business that
brought me from home to this distant and inconvenient
sojourn. I now propose immediately to return. I
know not, nor would it be proper for me to inquire,
with what views you were residing among the
Commanches
?
I have understood, that you belonged to a
party from the States, whose object was traffic with the
savages. You probably know in what light we here
consider such expeditions, and the men who are
engaged
in them. But we hold you a noble exception.
I will not disguise from you, that I might excite
suspicion
by what I am about to propose to you. You are
aware in what light we view your country and religion.
But we have inquired respecting you of the Commanches,
and of the officer and soldiers who saw you in the valley.
Even the savages do justice to your conduct in the
affair with Menko, by which my daughter was
liberated
.
They say that you only anticipated the
vengeance
which themselves would have inflicted upon him
for his treason. They wave all claims for ransom, and
admit that you did right in taking it into your own
hands. That sum, the half of which was delivered
into my hands with my daughter, together with the
effects of Menko, is a considerable fortune. It was
forever
lost to me, and, in comparison of my daughter,
never took up a single thought. That is fairly and
decidedly yours, and I am ready to pay it over to you
at this moment. But that is not all. It is impossible
that I can ever think of releasing myself from the debt
of obligation to you. I can show you that I wish to do
what is in my power, and I will come to the point.
The Condesa wishes you, if your object is to become
acquainted with our country, to remain in my family,
where you will have access to official information, and
will have every chance to gain this acquaintance. That
you may feel justified to yourself in the possession of
an employment, if you will converse with the father
confessor, and allow him to rectify the errors of your
understanding in regard to religion and our faith, and
pledge your fealty to my government and our king, I
will immediately give you the commission of captain
in the regiment of Don Pedro in our army. He
waited
for my reply.
I thanked him for interesting himself in my welfare.
I assured him that I should be pleased, if it were in my
power, consistently, to accompany his family to Durango.
I proceeded to observe, that I had not had very definite
views in my journey to the Commanches; that I had
been rather inclined to be, what they called in my
country, a roving youth; that so far as I was clear
about my motives, a disposition to wander and see new
regions was the first, and money a secondary, and very
distant one; that if it came by honorable enterprise and
exertion, like the rest of my countrymen, I understood
the value of it; that in attempting the release of his
daughter, I was conscious that my motive was unmixed
with any base alloy of that sort; and that to put the
thing out of doubt to myself, as well as others, that it
was so, the success of that action should be its simple
and single reward, and that I hoped he would not hurt
my feelings by ever proposing any other; that I should
be happy to converse with the father confessor, and
should treat him with the deference due to his
character
and his office, but that my opinions in regard to
religion and morals, such as they were, were probably
fixed unalterably, and that it was as probable I might
think of converting the father confessor to my views, as
that he would bend mine to his; that to the last
proposition
,
I could only say, that in a cause that was
consonant
to my feelings and principles, no profession would
be so congenial as to hear arms, and that nothing would
delight me so much as to be provided with any
honorable
pursuit in his family; but that no consideration,
not even the desire to remain with him, could induce
me to draw a sword in defence of the claims of
Ferdinand
VII. upon any part of Spanish America.
He heard me to the close with patient dignity. He
seemed rather surprised than offended, as I feared he
would be, with my rejection of his offers. There is, in
truth, said he, among your people of all classes, a
Spartan stubbornness, that I, as a soldier, know how to
appreciate. But your refusal of money is, indeed,
utterly
unlike what I expected from one of your country,
and I think it is out of place in the present instance.
Your republicanism I can pardon, as the prejudice of
your birth and country. I love a man not the less for
being true to his country. As it regards your faith,
I well know that we cannot change it when we will.
All I request of you with respect to the father confessor,
I am sure you will grant, and that is, the deference due
to his character and office. He is a wise and a learned
man. I am not dissatisfied with your inflexibility of
character. It effectually vindicates you from one charge,
that has been brought against you. I wish to retain
you in my fumily. The man who is true and
unchanging
in so many points, will be true to whatever
confidence
I may repose in him. I hope we shall persuade
you to go with us.
Show me any useful and honorable occupation, I
replied, and I will go with the greatest pleasure. I
think, too, that you might count on my fidelity, Never,
since I left my native place, have I seen the family
where I would feel so happy to remain, if I might do it,
and be useful, and retain self-respect. There is one
thing more, he replied, that strikes me upon this
subject
.
I will consider that point with my family, and
converse with you again upon this matter before my
departure.
I had in this family an unknown, but faithful friend,
in an Irish Catholic servant, named Bryan O'Flaherty.
He had been absent, it seems, and he now introduced
himself to me with a box of books, which, it appeared,
had been brought for me by the Spanish officer, who
had been sent to escort back Doa Martha from the
Commanche valley. The Red Heifer had collected
these, my drawings, and every thing that appertained to
to me, and, together with a letter from the captain of
our party to the Spanish country, had, with considerate
kindness, sent them on with the other baggage to
Santa Fe, hoping that I would return, and accept of
the honor she intended me. I was affected with this
distinguished kindness to a recreant, who seemed so
little capable of returning it. Bryan laid down the box
with a low bow; and I contemplated his laughing Irish
face, his brightly florid complexion, and his yellow
locks, with satisfaction; for I saw that he was not
Spanish, and could probably speak my native tongue.
Now, said he, begging your honor's pardon, speak
so much as one little word in the king's English. It
is such a weary while since I have heard a word of
it. I thanked him for his kindness in bringing my
books, and expressed myself pleased to find a member
of the family who could speak my mother tongue.
Ar'n't you the jewel, now? said he. It's many the
long year that I've heard never a word of that sort
before. Oh! but your honor has the true Irish face,
and speaks in the right fashion. I have been in a hot
fever to see you, ever since I have heard you was here.
Now, may be, I don't know a thing or two about this
family. He came close to me, and let his voice fall
almost to a whisper. Do you know what a bother
they have been making about you down stairs? He
paused, as if waiting for me to ask him to proceed. I
felt, it is true, a strong curiosity to hear on what cause
I could have been the theme of conversation.
Decorum
forbade me to gratify that curiosity, by questioning
a servant. Finding that he must go on without any
VOL. I. 11
request, or be silent. Ah! he proceeded, your
Honor
has the grand way now, and I dare say your Honor
is as true as steel. Well, then, I love you for your looks,
and the tongue that is in your head; and, by St. Patrick,
I love all that the sweet Martha loves; and if she don't
love your Honor, there is no devil! Do you think
so, my lad? said I. Ay, he returned, I thought
I could bring your Honor to your tongue. The sweet
Martha was in tears. The Conde was in a fret. The
good, kind Condesa threw in for you as much as she
dared. But there is father Josephushe is of my
father's worship, to be sure. But, may be, I don't
know him, for all his sanctified airs. And there was
the young Don, with his grim face, and his big airs,
and, devil burn their boots, no good of ye did they
say. `Well,' says I, `this man has my mother's tongue
in his head. He has shed his own blood, to kill a
heathen savage, and has brought our sweet Martha
home, Heaven brighten her two eyes; and by those
tears, she belikes him,' says I, `or I don't know the
taste of a potatoe. The man,' says I, `I dare say is
a pretty man, though he may believe neither in the
Virgin, nor St. Patrick.' So I stands your friend in my
heart. I opens both my ears, and the more they told
me to hush, the more I remembered every word.
When I was out, round Doll, the duea, hears the rest,
and we both put what we heard together. Jesus! what
a botheration they made, and all about you! They
rumbled it out in Spanish; but Doll and I heard every
word. Here he paused, in hopes now to have raised
curiosity, to have me question him to proceed. I was
determined to leave him to himself, to speak or be
silent, though I saw no harm in hearing what he had to
say. Now only look, said he. Your Honor burns
to hear, but says never a word. You shall hear all.
The Conde said, you talked big; and that all your
people are as stiff as asses. But it raised your Honor
mightily in all their eyes, that you would have none of
the money. The Conde stuck to it against them all,
that you was no common man, and he sware his
biggest
Spanish oath, that he believed you was a true, rale
jantleman. The father confessor, roast him! said that
he thought you an orange-man, and a bad heretic, and
so much the worse, that you was knowing, and was
handsome enough to pervert all the young girls in the
region. How much has he swayed the Condesa and
her daughter already! Then he commanded them in
the name of their holy mother, the church, to discard
you from their thoughts. They both looked so sweet
in his cross face, devil roast him, and begged him not
to think it a sin, that they esteemed you for your valor
and truth. `And these,' said he, in his deep voice, and
looking this fashion, `and these are just the baits by
which the devil lures away the hearts of the faithful in
the form of heresy.' The young Don bounced about
the while, like a roasted chestnut, and said that your
Honor had tried to steal away the heart of the sweet
Martha. And then her eyes sparkled, as though she
would have lightened upon him; and then she told him
that you was all truth and honor, and as incapable of
trying to do that, as she was to allow it; and that you
had too much courage and generosity to abuse the
absent. Then he was cross back again, and said, `That
is the way that the fellow veigles you all with his big
airs,' and that he meant to call you out, and teach you
the difference between fighting a christian jantleman,
and a poor Indian. At this word, Martha brushed away
her tears, and, may be, she did'nt give him a look!
`Very like, Don Pedro,' says she, `you think that would
be the way to raise yourself in my esteem. It would
be quite the pretty return to the only man, who dared
expose himself to rescue me from a condition worse
than death.' And then she drew up grand, this way;
and she looked wild, and her eyes glistened, the jewel.
And she says, `Now hear me all. I know that my father
is too great and noble, to be set against a man that has
done so much for me, by any of you. I have my
father's spirit in me. Treat him badly, and you will
make me love him. I owe my father deference and
obedience, but none of you can command the heart.'
Your Honor, I remember every word. And then she
went on to say, that if you would treat him with
kindness
,
she would make any vow, never to think of your
Honor. Says I to myself, `Ay, my dear! but you're
not a thousand years old yet.' But that if you drove
him away from a family that owed him so much, she
should hate Don Pedro for ever, and that it would go
farther to make her a heretic, than any thing else. All
this while the sweet girl had been screwed up; and
then she burst into an agony of tears, and I know not
what happened, for they drove me out of the room.
But round Doll says, that the Conde snivelled and the
Condesa, and that Don Pedro and the father were
glad to clear themselves, and so your Honor seems to
have the day among them. And since that, I have
seen the priest and the young man look in the Conde's
face, and, by Jesus, mum was the word; for he looks
as dark as thunder. God love your Honor for speaking
English, and looking like an Irishman. And what do
you think the Condesa says? She says, `Bryan, I think
he will go with us to Durango; and if he does, Bryan,
you shall be his servant.'
At supper, as Bryan had related, every face was
either clouded or sad. The Condesa and her daughter
made efforts to seem calm, and as though nothing had
happened. But the traces of the recent storm were
sufficiently visible in the countenances of the rest. I
have reason to think, that I seemed the most unmoved
among them. After supper I was left alone with the
Conde. He resumed the former conversation
apparently
with cordiality. I have been thinking, said
he, of your wish to find employment, and of your
expressed willingness to reside in my family. It occurs
to me and to the Condesa, that there is such here, and
just such, as fits the case. Let me premise one thing.
My daughter is young, ardent, inexperienced. She
is destined for Don Pedro. We have all, her mother,
my daughter, myself, an entire confidence in you.
She has seemed more backward in meeting our views
there, than I could have wished. I have but this one,
11 *
and she is the light of my eyes. I would be glad not
to force her inclinations. Women are naturally wilful.
She leads us to think, that kindness to you will be the
readiest way to bring her inclinations to this union.
You will understand our views, and if you cannot further
them, we confide in your honor that you will not impede
them. Thus much premised, I proceed to observe, that
we some time since made inquiries for a person suitably
qualified for an English instructer. My daughter is
sufficiently versed in French and Italian, and has long
wished to add English to her acquirements. There
are some other young ladies in Durango, associates of
my daughter's, who will join to form a class, and Don
Pedro will be of the number. The time, the mode,
and the compensation shall be settled by yourself. Will
you consent to take charge of such a class? I
thanked
him, of course, and told him that, at first view, it
seemed precisely the employment which I should have
chosen, and that I wished only the succeeding night for
consideration, and would give him an answer in the
morning.
The evening was one of preparation, for the family
proposed the next day to commence their journey for
Durango. A royal regiment of troops in fine uniform
and discipline had arrived from Durango, and had
pitched their tents on the square, as an escort for the
Conde on his journey. The militia of the country had
been pouring into the town through the afternoon.
They were fantastically fine in their array, and made
more noise and display, than the regular troops. The
bugle, the drum and fife, and occasionally a full band
mixed their martial notes. The hum of the lounging
multitudes, who were idly busy in looking upon this
scene of preparation, was heard on all sides. Great
numbers of the provincial officers, and of private
gentlemen with their families, were in waiting to take
leave of the Conde. A fte of illumination and
refreshments
was prepared for the occasion. There was a
public supper, at which I sat down with more than a
hundred people. After supper there was a promenade
in the public garden attached to the palace, and the
family of the Conde enjoyed their friends and the
delightful
coolness of the evening in the garden. It was there
that the citizens and public functionaries were to take
leave of the governor. I received a card of invitation
to share the walk with the family. Every walk and
alley of the garden was occupied by great numbers of
the nobility and gentry of the province. The garden
was brilliantly illuminated. The varieties of beautiful
trees and shrubs, most of them new to me, with their
luxuriant and African foliage, gilded with the flickering
rays from an hundred lamps, the lofty palms, that
mounted into the air beyond the radiance of the
illumination
,
that were half seen in light, and half dimly and
indistinctly in shade, produced a most striking effect
upon the eye. The country has a variety of birds that
sing in the night, and they seemed to enjoy the splendor
of the illumination with exultation, and to swell their
little throats with hilarity. Every thing conspired to
produce that train of sentiments, that thrilled every
nerve with delightful, but melancholy sensation. I know
not why, but I thought deeply, almost painfully, of
home, and of infancy, and of that circle of which I was
a part, and where I was of consequence. Here
circumstances
had established a kind of standing for me;
but I was a stranger, rather endured, than desired, at
least by a part of the family. Of the numerous groups
that were chatting, and walking and enjoying
themselves
in all the intimacy of acquaintance, I knew not
one; and of those that passed me, and made the inquiry
of transient curiosity about me, it was sufficient with
most of them to bound their interest, to know that I was
a heretic, and an inhabitant of the States. I wandered
to the farthest extremity of the garden, where a
beautiful
little brook
chased
over the pebbles, and fell into a
deep basin in the corner of the garden. In this basin,
so smooth, that it reflected every thing like a mirror,
the lights of the sky, of the garden, and the moon, over
which fleecy clouds were sailing with a gentle breeze,
and the acacias and catalpas, with their stems all
tufted with flowers, were seen shooting into the still
depths their reflected brightness and beauty. Here I
seated myself on a bench to enjoy the scene, and to
meditate, and fix my purpose for the morrow. My
thoughts wandered. Before I could combine and
arrange
the elements of the calculation, my thoughts had
escaped a thousand leagues from the subject in hand.
To concentre thought, and fix the mind, external
nature
,
especially if beautiful, must be excluded.
Imagination
at present was too busy for reason and judgment.
Nature was too enticing, and the air too full of the
ambrosia of the catalpas, and the breeze too bland, for
the operation of painful thinking. I fell involuntarily
into my habit of reverie. The drudgery and vexation
necessary to sustain the grosser elements of our
existence
,
the contemptible, and yet impassable barriers
erected between kindred minds by birth, habit, riches,
country, religion, to stay, or not to stay in a family,
where all these barriers existed between me and its
members, and where, if I might flatter myself that I
had some interest with some of them, I knew I was
only upon sufferance with the rest, that was the
question
.
It may be foreseen, how pride and independence
would, perhaps ought, to settle the question. There
was another efficient element in the calculation, which
had, I doubt not, its influence at that time, unknown to
myself. Vanity whispered that a certain member of
the family betrayed, against herself, a strong desire that
I should stay. But I reflected, how often and how
bitterly
would they make me feel that they considered me
a heretic, poor, and an adventurer. How often must I
endure the insolent haughtiness of Don Pedro, and suffer
from the deeper plottings of the father confessor. Then
the beauty of the evening would withdraw my thoughts
from this painful subject of meditation. I heard the
sparrow, the red-bird, the mocking-bird pouring their
little hearts into their song. I looked up to the dome
of that grand temple of nature,
The sky,
Spread, like an ocean hung on high,
Bespangled with those isles of light,
So wildly, spiritually bright.
Who ever saw them brightly shining,
And turn'd to earth without repining;
Nor wish'd for wings to soar away,
And mix with their eternal ray?
As I applied these beautiful lines in thought to the
feelings
of the moment, the Condesa and her daughter,
disengaged from the company with which I had seen
them walking, came round in front of the basin. I
moved to resign my seat to them. No, said the
Condesa, sit still, and allow us to share your seat,
and the benefit of your lonely meditations. It appears
to me, that your temperament inclines you too much to
solitude. It seems wrong, that solicitude and care
should anticipate the effect of years, and touch such a
fresh countenance as yours. Loneliness, Madam,
I answered, is not painful to me. But they, who
should infer from seeing me much alone, that I was
occupied by profound or painful thought, would look
too deep for the cause. I would claim nothing more
for this taste, than the simple merit that belongs to it.
I am, Madam, by nature a dreamer with my eyes open.
If I might be permitted to record my early habits,
the first pleasures of my existence, that I remember,
were, in the vernal and autumnal north-eastern storms
of the Atlantic region, where I was bred, when the
wind howled, and the trees were bending under the
gale, and the mist and sleet poured along in sweeping
columns, to repair to the shore of the sea, in the height
of the storm. Here I would sit for hours,
regardless
of the elements, listentng to the roar of the winds,
and marking the dashing of the spray, as it mixed with
the white mist of the sky. With what pleasure I saw
the billowy mountains roll in to the shore, and burst
against the cliffs! And then, to see them retire again,
and leave the deep and black caverns of the rocks
exposed to view, and to watch the return of the
enormous
and dashing surge,such were my earliest and
most intense enjoyments. My friends, even then, used
to chide me for foolish exposure, or to pity me as one
addicted to gloom and melancholy. It was in vain that
I told them that these were the happiest moments of
my life. My tastes were not theirs, and they could not
account for them. My mind at present, I would hope,
has somewhat enlarged the range of its thought, and
the number of its combinations. But I am now as
much addicted to this dreamy existence as ever. I
would not proudly say with the great ancient, `Never
less alone, than when alone;' for I am not sure, that
this indulgence of musing and reverie is favorable to
thinking. I only know, that it is favorable to
enjoyment
.
I never flattered myself that I possessed the
genius of Rousseau; and I am sure that I have always
detested many of his opinions. But when he tells with
so much
navet
of his disposition to dream with his
eyes open; when he speaks of committing himself to
his open skiff in that sweet lake, throwing himself at
his length on its bottom, raising his eyes to the sky, and
floating at the will of the breeze, and losing hours with
no other recollections, than the pleasurable
consciousness
of existence, he describes a taste, absurd as you
may deem it, precisely like mine.
You describe to me, she replied, the mind of a
very romantic, but not a bad young man. I have the
more indulgence for such follies, as, at your time of life,
I was much addicted to them myself. Delightful days!
I never tire of looking back upon my visions, when the
world, existence, every thing was as a romance. We all
learn the difference soon enough, between the sweet
visions of youth, and the sad reality of actual existence.
I replied, that I suspected there was a sufficient leaven
of romance in my composition to unfit me for the hard
struggle and the dry competition of actual existence.
I have been so often and so bitterly reproved for
indulging
these dreaming propensities, have heard the
maxim so often circulated, that we are placed on the
earth to act, and not to dream, that I have ended by
doubting the innocence of this propensity, and have
striven to conquer it. If you say, Madam, that you
have felt the same propensities, you will reconcile me
to myself. It was, I suspect, the indulgence of this
original propensity, that brought me to this region, so
remote from my native country. I was always
delighted
with books of voyages and travels. I sail with the
voyager. I journey with the traveller. I clamber with
him over his snowy mountains, or enjoy the boundless
horizon of his plain. I float down the interminable
river with the wanderer of the Mississippi. I have
heard your daughter quote Chateaubriand. Some
passages in his travels are to me of the highest order of
poetry, and abundant aliment for day-dreams. Nothing
can be more delightful than some of those periods,
where he relates his impressions in the midst of the
magnificence and boundlessness of the savage nature of
our forests, when the moon arises upon them, and
diffuses over them the great secret of melancholy. I
might instance that passage, that even the hypercritics
have admitted was so beautiful, in the
Gnie du
Christianisme
,
`Description d'une belle Nuit, dans les Forts
du Nouveau Monde,' and many others in the romance of
Attala
. But I recur incessantly to one that scarcely
has been named, but which strikes me still more.
`Pour nous, amant solitaire de la nature, et simple
confesseur de la Divinit, nous nous sommes assis sur
ces ruines. Voyageur sans renom, nous avons caus
avec ces dbris, comme nous mmes ignors. Les
souvenirs confus des hommes, et les vagues reveries du
dsert se mlaient au fond de ntre me. La nuit
tait au milieu de sa course; tout tait muet, et la
lune, et les bois, et les tombeaux. Seulement  longs
intervalles on entendait la chte de quelque arbre, que
la hache du tems abattait dans la profondeur des forts;
ainsi tout tombe; tout s'anantit.'
[1]
[1]
`For me, a solitary lover of nature, and a simple confessor
of the Divinity, I have sat down among these ruins. A
traveller
,
unknown to fame, I have conversed with these mouldering
monuments, as unknown as myself. Confused recollections of
men, and the vague reveries of the desert, were mingled in the
recesses of my soul. The night was in the midst of her course.
Every thing was silent, the moon, the woods, and the tombs. Only
at long intervals was heard the fall of some tree, which the axe
of time had cut down in the depth of the forests. Thus every thing
falls. Thus every thing returns to nothing.'
Doa Martha
VOL. I. 12
here remarked, with some earnestness, You have
proved, Sir, that, differently as we have been bred,
there is a striking coincidence in our taste. My mother
knows how much I was delighted with that very
passage
which you have quoted, the one to which you have
referred, and another at the commencement of the
chapter, entitled `Spectacle Gnral de l'Univers.'
Indeed
I was never able to discover why that eloquent
book, `
Gnie du Christianisme
,' was so generally
condemued
.
To me it says much, and strongly and
beautifully
,
for religion. He often speaks to my heart.
There are in it some of the most eloquent passages,
and some of the most impressive sentences of that
beautiful prose poetry, which seems peculiar to the
French. But I have yet, Sir, to discover the connexion
between the admiration of these passages, and that
determination, which brought you into our country.
I answered, Such passages, particularly that, `une
belle nuit,' &c. gave me back more beautifully the
image of my own thoughts. I was determined to
converse
with nature alone in those prairies, and those
boundless deserts, that he so delightfully painted to my
imagination. I could not hope to find these places,
except in the western regions of my own country, and
that part of yours contiguous to them. My journey
from the Mississippi to this place has, thus far, more
than realized my images. I worshipped in all the
forms of nature, from the lonely and inaccessible swamp
of the Mississippi, the abode of gloom and fever, and
vocal only with the notes of the owl, and the howling
of wolves, to the extended plantation, with its mansion,
surrounded by the little village of hovels, and from
the region of plantations, to the grassy sea of the
prairies, and the sublime scenery of yonder chain of
mountains, to the beautiful valley, in which dwelt the
ruthless, but primitive Commanches; a place so
exquisitely
beautiful in its scenery, that even your
daughter
,
under all the gloom and apprehension of her
residence
there, felt that beauty; to this place, where all
the contrasts of social and primitive life, of wealth and
poverty, refinement and simplicity, are brought side by
side. I have had exquisite enjoyment from these sources.
Providence has opened to me sources of moral
satisfaction
in the chain of events, which brought me acquainted
with your daughter, which I would not have exchanged
for any other the world could have offered me. Come
what will, I shall always rejoice that I became a
wanderer
,
and that Providence has brought me here.
This brings me, added the Condesa, to the point
that has been on my mind from the first. You delight
to journey. You have been advertised that we depart
to-morrow for Durango. It is a beautiful country between
this and that place. The Conde has made a proposition
to you to accompany us. You have promised him an
answer in the morning. May we not hope, that you
will consent to go with us? If I thought you like other
young men, I should not dare to tell you how much I
desire it. The people in this country are so wild,
ignorant, and uneducated, and at the present
moment
we are surrounded by so many enemies, visible
and invisible, so many dangers of every sort, rebellion,
treason, discord, the savages, that you can hardly
conjecture how my confidence goes out towards a
young man, educated, principled, high-minded, and, to
use Bryan's expression, `as true as steel.' Indeed,
we hope you will go with us. I do not disguise that
you will have to encounter prejudices. But I have a
presentiment that you will triumph over them all. You
do not talk of returning to your own country. Ah!
you must have felt, in all the pride of youth, as you
are, that you need a mother. I will be as a mother to
you. Could you but renounce your errors! Could you
but have accepted a commission from my husband,
there is nothing that you might not have hoped. But,
heretic and republican as you are, both the Conde and
myself have the most undoubting confidence in you.
Only stay with us, and you will become gradually trained
to our ways, and finally become one of our people.
I replied, that if I were to consult my inclinations,
I should not need the additional motive of her wishes,
so affectionately expressed, to decide me. But that I
felt all the obstacles of a different nation and religion,
and felt their peculiar pressure under the existing
circumstances
of the country; that under such
circumstances
,
it would not be honorable to me to stay, without
a sufficient and respectable employment, that would
furnish me a vocation, that would justify me to myself
in staying; that I much feared that this proposition, to
employ me to teach English in the family, was merely
got up to satisfy me with myself, and as a kind of
compensation
for supposed services.
Far from it, she replied. Our relations with
England and with your country are daily increasing.
Notwithstanding the prejudices of religion and country,
we are getting more and more in the habit of learning
English. We made efforts to obtain a suitable teacher,
before we became acquainted with you. It is no new
fancy of my daughter's and mine.
I perceive, said Martha, that you need a great
deal of inducement, and that we have to labor to bring
it about, as they do to induce a young lady to sing.
But even at the hazard of ministering to vanity, I shall
not fear to add my wishes to my mother's. You have
been still talking about your wish to find employment.
You will not deny that this is respectable, nor that you
are qualified. Let us hope, Sir, that you will shorten
the matter, and put an end to our suspense, and stay.
You do not know what a diligent pupil I shall be. You
will have two charming pupils, beside myself, and a
third extremely rich, and Don Pedro, a royal officer,
and so forth. Besides, if you will promise to be good
and docile, we will teach you our language in return.
All this was uttered in grave and set phrase. But
there was a certain arch expression in her eye, which
placed all this to the account of mock gravity. But
apart from all this, there was a certain air of
supplication
in her appearance and countenance, that weighed
12 *
still more with me to accept the proposal, than even the
maternal kindness of her mother.
I remarked, that I felt a strong desire to see more of
a country, which was so little known in the States;
that no better opportunity could ever offer me, to visit
its interior under favorable circumstances. I thought
I was competent to the employment in question; that
I should depend much upon their indulgence to a
stranger, who could know so little of their manners;
that I should trust to their friendship to put me right,
when I was in the way of making mistakes. I will
accept of it, said I, and do the best that I can. I
am not a little swayed to this decision by the motive
which Dona Martha has suggested, that while I am
teaching her my language, I shall also be learning hers.
I must be a very dull pupil, not to catch the true
Castilian
from such an instructress. This little fetch at a
compliment, escaped me almost unconsciously. I
regretted
it, when I saw that it drew blushes from the
one, and created grave looks in the other. But after a
momentary pause, the Condesa added, with the same
maternal air, We are of the old fashion, and hope
that you will always dispense with compliments, and
treat us with plain sincerity. In acceding to my
proposition
,
you have removed from my mind a weight of
uneasiness. We were fearful that you would carry your
feelings of independence to the point of pride, and
that you would be governed by sentiments of
self-respect
that were impracticable. One word more, and
we will drop the conversation. You can readily imagine
the bearings of the relation which you will sustain
among us, and that all eyes that will be upon you, will
not be as mine. Only calculate at times what
construction
can be put upon innocent actions. For the
rest, it is precisely because I have no fear that any
thing will make you swerve from the right path, that I
have become a kind of guaranty for you with those who
have supposed, that it might be hazardous to entrust
such a charge to such a young man. You see, that I
deal with you with maternal frankness, and I have not a
fear of the result. But I perceive it is too cool for us
to sit still. Let us take a turn in the garden. It is
not such a one as I will show you at my own house,
but still it is pretty, and the evening is delightful. She
accepted my arm, and we wandered round the mazes
of the garden, at every turn inhaling a new perfume
of flowers, or taking a new view, set off with all the
mild and magic brilliance of a full and unclouded moon.
All restraint was removed by the place and
circumstances
,
and the recent understanding with each other.
The conversation, flowing from the deep sources, where
restraint and formality so often confine it, became
cordial
,
frank, and exhilirating. We were mutually getting
more into the tone of people of one family, when a
message from a family of consequence, who wished to
take leave of the Condesa, called her from us, and left
me alone with the daughter. It cannot be doubted,
that such a situation must have been to me a desirable
one. But I found myself timid and silent, for the good
reason, that nothing occurred for me to say. I had
supposed, that I should be at least as fluent as I had
been, when we were journeying from the Commanches.
I felt, indeed, tied up by the inviolable laws of honor
and confidence, and had not an idea of attempting to
make love to the beautiful Spanish girl. I had scarcely
searched, whether I felt an impulse to do it. I was
certain that she would have frowned upon any
approaches
to such a strain. But I had taken it for
granted, that somehow our conversation would have
assumed a confidential character. But the moment
that we were alone with the moon, and amidst
jessamines
and roses, and she leaning on my arm, alas! I
might say, with Virgil,
Vox faucibus hsit
. My voice
clung to my mouth. An extinguisher seemed to be
clapped upon my thoughts, as well as words. The
very arm that sustained her trembled. This, thought
I, is a strange case. I must inquire into it, before it
becomes an universal palsy. I was mortified, too, to
find that she was much less afflicted in this way than
I was. She now and then made a remark, to which I
replied by the significant monosyllable Yes, or No.
This soon ceased, and we walked back and forward
among the bowers in profound silence. We saw the
father confessor and Don Pedro walking together at
the head of the alley. This restored speech to her.
We shall have, I hope, said she, a pleasant journey
together. Oh! that it were to be like that from the
valley. Saying this, she wished me
bon soir
, and
tripped away.
CHAPTER V.
The moon shines bright, and her silvery light
Through the forest aisles is glancing;
And with trembling beam on the rippling stream
A thousand stars are dancing.
No noise is heard, save the lonely bird,
That hoots from his desert dwelling;
Or the distant crash of some aged ash,
Which the axe of time is felling.
Anonymous
.
We
were awakened at three in the morning by the
ringing of bells, the blowing of bugles, and the noise
and bustle of preparation for the journey. Squadrons
of horse, with their heavy and measured trampling,
gallopped
backwards and forwards. I was aroused by my
good friend, Bryan, who told me, how glad he was that
I was to be along with them. He brought me a billet
from the Conde, to whom I had notified, by the
Condesa
,
my acceptance of his proposition, politely
expressing
his satisfaction on that account, and proposing
different arrangements for my comfort on the journey,
among other things, requesting me to avail myself of
the services of Bryan. He, on his part, was in raptures,
and poured out the expressions of his satisfaction with
true Irish hilarity. I left a letter for my companions,
intimating the new course I had taken, and making
arrangement for the disposal of my proportion of the
dividend of profits. I mounted the fine horse which I
had taken from Menko, and Bryan rode mine. The
Condesa and her daughter, Don Pedro and the father
confessor, rode in the family coach. The Conde rode
on his fine grey charger at the head of his troops.
As we past the family, Don Pedro had just assisted
the Condesa and her daughter into the carriage, and
was getting in himself. Bryan rode close to me, and
said, in a low tone, Now God bless your Honor, that
is provoking. See that swarthy fellow! scorch his black
whiskers! He is going to live in clover. And they
just stuff the sweet Martha beside the polecat, like a
pig in a bag. Ay! but if she had her own heart's
content
,
she 'd not be there. Never mind, my master.
Every dog has his day.
The array was soon in marching order. The band
struck up a slow and solemn marchalmost a funereal
straina Spanish martial air of parting. The trampling
of horses disturbed the stillness of the night, and the
impression of the music and the scene thrilled through
my frame. Who can account for such a deep feeling
from circumstances, which, at another time, would have
produced no feeling at all? Our place was among the
advanced guard. We now passed through deep and
still forests; then splashed through swamps and streams.
Now we scrambled up precipitous hills; and then
descended
upon the interminable grassy plains. There can
be nothing that stirs and animates the spirit more deeply,
than a ride in the brisk and cool air of the morning,
and amidst a great body of horse, swiftly moving
forward
to the trumpet, the bugle, and a full band. Were
I a general, I should choose that my troops should make
their attacks, just before Aurora was dispensing
briskness
and gaiety in advance of her rising throne.
The morning dawned upon us, as we came upon the
Rio del Norte at the Parso. The river is here of
very considerable width, but white with its furious
current
dashing among rocks. The scenery is most
whimsically
and delightfully wild and romantic. A village
is never seen to so much advantage, as just when the
sun is rising, and the mist uncurling its white drapery,
and unshrouding the roofs, the spire, the mill, and
slowly rolling to the summits of the hills. How sweetly
the smoke raises its spiral curls from the humble sheds
of the villagers! The clink of the blacksmith's hammer,
the hum of the mill, mixing with the hundred sounds of
animals, and of peaceful and village life, at this moment
are to me inexpressibly cheering. The alluvions of
this noble and romantic river are covered with vines,
from which is made the delicious wine of the Parso.
Husbandry is here managed by irrigation. In this arid
soil and burning climate, there is, in a landscape vivified
by irrigation, a charm, which no language can paint.
Nature furnishes us with the means to create this rich
scenery, and seems to delight to put us to toil in the
use of them. The freshness and luxuriance of this
artificial landscape far transcends any freshness and
beauty which nature produces of herself in her most
indulgent mood. Each garden and patch had its own
little rill of the most limpid water. The verdure, the
prodigious grandeur and strength of the vegetation
contrasted
so much the stronger with the red, sterile, and
scorched hills, by which we descended to this
alluvion
.
At this place we had more of the bustle of militia
parade. Our morning militia escort left us here, and
returned to Santa Fe, and was replaced by new troops
from the vicinity of the Parso. We halted in this
village
for breakfast. The order of march for the
remainder
of the day was here reversed. We, who had
been thus far in advance, were now to be in the rear.
In falling back for this arrangement, the Conde's family
passed us. The morning was bright and warm. The
glasses of the carriage and the curtains were raised,
and I had the mortification to see Doa Martha squeezed
on the same bench with the tall, stern, and swarthy
young Don, looking, as Bryan described it, `as grim as
a death's head.' Not even the enviable place he
occupied
,
could smooth his moody brow. This fellow had
always looked on me with lowering countenance from
the first. I confess I felt a singular twinge of ill feeling
towards him, as I saw them pass. It was something
like that bitter sensation, which is vulgarly called
heart-burn
,
or acidity, and for which they give chalk and
lime-water. Is this, said I again to myself, is this
that terrible disorder, in its commencement, called love,
and in this case, silly love, without hope, or the chance
of return? Let us look to this thing. The symptoms
are bad. What will the fixed disorder be? And is
this the feeling of envy and jealousy? I aroused
myself
,
looked at the sweet landscape, and felt the bright
sun. I sat down at the table, determined to make a
full breakfast, and take a glass of wine. I realized that
we are best capable of self-control upon a full stomach.
My head swam a little, as I saw the young man of
whiskers lead out the Doa Martha. The heart-burn
twinged for a moment. I followed them, mounted my
horse, and said, firmly, Not guilty, upon my honor!
And I felt better for the effort.
The country between the Parso and Durango was
sufficiently pleasant, though destitute of the wildness
and sublimity of the country in the vicinity of the
Commanches
.
Red and precipitous hills, extensive grassy
plains, ragged villages, full of a mixed race of people,
composed of Spanish, Indian, and Negroe, recurred in
succession. We had still in the distance the blue
outline
of mountains. We passed through Chihuahua, and
Mont el Rey, considerable towns. We were regularly
in advance in the morning, and in the rear in the
evening
.
I as regularly caught a glimpse of Doa Martha,
seated beside her silent and stern admirer. I made
some acquaintance with the officers of the Spanish
regiment. No one of them spoke French, but Colonel
Arredondo, and of him I shall have occasion to speak
hereafter. Of course my intimacy with the rest went
no farther than the common forms of civility. There
was a marked jealousy towards me, which I placed to
the score of my country. Such a kind of cavalcade is
apt to be very barren of incident, and ours was so. I
regularly exchanged salutations with the Conde, who
simply inquired of me, how I found the journey.
VOL. I. 13
I spoke but twice with the Condesa and her daughter.
I found Bryan to possess a cleverness and a fund of
vivacity and amusement beyond all price.
It was high noon when we entered the city of
Durango
,
whose spires I had seen glittering in the distance
for some leagues. Before we arrived here, various
circumstances
reminded us, that we were in a rich mining
district. At the
haciendas
, amidst mud-walled cabins,
and filth, and meanness, and the squalidness of poverty,
and the coarsest and clumsiest furniture, we often saw
the domestic vessels and utensils of massive silver. Now
and then we passed the mansion of a fortunate miner,
and the luxurious arrangements, the ostentatious display,
had its peculiar effect upon the eye, in the contrast
with the mean cottages and the primitive and savage
nature around it. The city itself presented the same
striking contrast of magnificence and littleness, of
splendor
and meanness, of palaces and hovels. On one
hand was the vast cathedral, with its dome, and columns,
its silver shrine, its ornaments inlaid with gold and
sparkling
with gems, and its fine paintings, beside miserable
daubs of St. Michael and his dragon; on the other,
palaces
surrounded by their orangeries, and cool with the
dash of fountains, playing into basins of marble; and the
gorgeous display of temples, and peristyles, and columns,
and baths, all this ostentation of luxury, towering above
filthy and mud-walled cabins. The rational part of
the city was like the architectural. Here were men in
the richest dresses, and their ladies gaily adorned and
sparkling with diamonds, and a moving mass of life by
their side, clad in leather jackets, and dirty red baize
shirts. Such was the first aspect of the wealthy city of
Durango, the centre of a very rich mining district, and
of an episcopate, with a population of thirty thousand
souls.
I omit the circumstances of the Conde's reception
here in the central city of his government. I am not
expert at the description of these things. You can
imagine the
vivas
, the noise, and ringing of bells, and
the firing of cannon, and the parade of large bodies of
raw, country militia, who were fine, and expert in
managing horses. It was sufficiently imposing, and had
a kind of barbaric splendor, which brought strongly
and painfully to my recollection the same kind of
display
in my own country. I remembered the clean,
healthy, and well dressed crowds of people on such
occasions, all so alike in their appearance. I
recollected
the long and martial lines of uniformed soldiers.
And, more than all, I compared the aspect of this rabble
of slaves with the lofty port and firm tread of those
masses of freemen, who carry their diploma in their
countenance.
Immediately upon passing the town, we entered upon
the Conde's estate. A private road led us along an
avenue, shaded with catalpas and China trees, and the
stone cottages had a neatness and uniformity, very
different from any thing I had yet seen in the country.
The road itself was a curiosity in its kind, and wound
round the bases of fine slopes, covered with luxuriant
vines, patches of tobacco and wheat, groves of orange, fig,
and other fruit trees; and the very air was perfumed with
bowers of the cape jessamine. That singular and most
splendid shrub, which the French call
pite
, and which
is, I believe, a species of the cactus, made in some
places an impenetrable wall; for no animal will brave
the steely and poisonous thorns that terminate its stems.
Through such an avenue we rode five or six miles,
until a sharp turn in the road cleared us of the hills,
and opened to our view the columns in front of the
massive and turreted stone mansion of the Conde,
embowered
in the shade of huge sycamores, that reared
their white arms as high as the turrets. Amidst these
ancient bowers it occupied the centre of a gentle
eminence
.
A lawn of many acres, turfed with the perfect
verdure of the blue grass, sloped to the bank of a small
stream, which brawled along over pebbles and rocks,
and almost encircled the lawn. Domestic animals of
all kinds, and domesticated animals of the wild races,
as deer, buffalo, cabri, and other animals, unknown to
me, were ruminating in the shade along with sheep,
goats, and cows. A considerable village of the houses
of tenants, and the offices of servants and retainers of
the family, were built in parallel lines, with strict regard
to comfort and utility, as well as pleasing effect, in the
rear of the mansion. That and these appeared to be
coeval, and built all of the same material, a beautiful
greenish grey soap stone, which had a charming effect
upon the eye. The fences, and granges, and all the
appurtenances of this sort, were either of this stone, or
of the imperishable mulberry or cedar, and were
massive
,
strong, and painted white, or to imitate the stone,
and all seemed to have especial regard to perpetuity,
as well as beauty. Smooth mountains in the form of
cones, or towering and ragged points of granite, finished
the distant outline. The sun was descending as we
rode under the shade of the sycamores. It was a
scene of comfort, amenity, repose, and grandeur, which
filled the heart and the eye. At the entrance to the
lawn the crowds of citizens, the rabble of the city,
and the annoying cavalcade of the militia left us. A
select and invited party of the ladies and gentlemen of
the vicinity, and of favorite officers, to form a domestic
circle, remained to welcome the return of the Conde to
his mansion by a fte.
To me the joyous greeting of the servants,
domestics
,
and retainers of the family, who amounted to some
hundreds, formed a pageant a thousand times more
impressive, than the stern and bannered ceremonial,
with which we had been treated for some time past,
even to a surfeit. This, too, was arranged with the air
of a fte. But here the demonstrations were real.
The head of the government and of a princely
establishment
had returned from a long and dangerous
absence
,
in which his only child had been made a captive
among the savages. It was amidst troublous and
dubious
times, in which the people were constantly alarmed
with wars, and rumours of wars, that he had returned
to a peaceful and rural retirement. A host of dependants,
who identified their own security, comfort, and even
consequence, with his, welcomed his return. What a
13*
different air has every thing that is done with the
heart, from that which is merely
got up?
With how
much sweetness and tenderness did Doa Martha
receive
their caresses and congratulations? I had the
satisfaction of seeing the affectionate bursts of joy with
which she was welcomed home. Amidst the general
melting of hearts, I had the delight to receive a cordial
grasp of the hand from her, and a welcome of manner
and eye, which I treasured in my heart, as I was shown
by her to a cushioned seat in the shade. The Condesa
and the Conde, the father confessor and Don Pedro
even, seemed to have relaxed from their customary
gravity, and the latter especially were unwonted in their
cordiality to me. I was introduced in rapid succession
to the officers, and to a crowd of gentlemen and ladies.
Three or four of the latter were handsome, as many
tolerable, and the numerous remainder were yellow,
swarthy, badly formed, and dressed in fantastic finery,
and only calculated, as I could not help remarking to
Doa Martha, as foils to her. To this fine compliment,
a slight curtesy was all my reply.
For the rest, there was the usual ringing of bells,
firing of cannon, bonfires on the hills, and illumination
among the trees. Wine for the gentry, and
mezcal
and
agua audiente
for the mob, flowed as from fountains.
A most bountiful supper, of a plenty surpassing even
Camacho's wedding, was spread on rustic tables on the
grass, and all was festivity and joy. At table, the
Conde sat on one side, Don Pedro and the father
confessor
and the officers were below him. On the
opposite
side, I sat immediately below the Condesa and her
daughter. Amidst the Babel clatter of voices, and
plates, and gaiety, I was able to receive and return,
without notice, a great many of those kind and
affectionate
remarks and welcomes, so naturally growing
out of the time and place. I was positive that Martha
evinced decided partiality for me; and that there was
a gladness of heart in her welcome to me, of which she
was not conscious. Surely, I thought, vanity could not
misinterpret all this.
After supper there was dancing. The Conde and
his lady, the officers, and the fine ladies chimed in.
The tall colonel, Don Pedro, the future son-in-law, led
out the Doa Martha to head a national dance. It is
one into which the Spanish enter to enthusiasm. I was,
and still am, morose upon this subject of dancing. I
felt my twinges of heart-burn, and was determined not
to like it. But never had I witnessed any thing to
compare with the grace, the elasticity, and sweetness of
the dancing of Doa Martha. I had never conceived
before, that there could be the highest grace, science,
and even expression of the heart in dancing. She
seemed to inspire her tall and grim partner with dignity
and grace. Clapping of hands, and the most unbounded
expressions of joy were drawn forth from the spectators.
Even the elderly dancers, who were laboriously
pursuing
their vocation, were arrested by their admiration.
The incipient feeling of heart-burn was a little mitigated
by witnessing the comic distress of my friend, Bryan,
who was obliged to sustain his part in this affair with
the gay and plump duea. Extremely sensitive to the
ridiculous himself, he turned upon me an eye, in which
chagrin and laughter were curiously blended, as his
short partner shook her castanets, and rolled round his
square and erect figure. The movement called the
parties to walk slowly, and solemnly, and with frequent
and low bows past each other, until a certain part of
the tune. At this point, the parties changed the
movement
,
and skipped and capered as if they were mad.
There was something amusing in the perplexity and
restraint of the tall, square Irishman, compared with
the laughing gaiety of the duea, who did her best at a
bow, and waddled with her short figure, like a duck, that
produced an uncontrolled laugh on all sides. Martha
shared in it with the highest glee. Even I could not
exercise the supplicated forbearance, which the
countenance
of Bryan seemed to demand of me, and against
myself I laughed heartily with the rest.
I might have remarked, that it is the fashion in
this dance for old and young, parents and children,
masters and servants, on these occasions to join in the
same dance. The Conde and his lady had paid their
tax to the custom, and were seated under a spreading
sycamore, blazing with various-colored lights, and
witnessed
with calm satisfaction the joyous group of their
friends and dependants, crossing each other in the
mazes of the dance. Her partner led their daughter
to a seat, and was engaged in conversation with an
officer
.
Greatly to my surprise and satisfaction, Martha
beckoned me to her side. After asking me how I was
pleased, and questions of that sort, she regretted that I
could take no part in these innocent gaieties myself,
and remarked, how differently all this must seem from
scenes of the same kind in my own country? I
am thinking, she continued, how to render you
popular in this region. Nothing would do it so
effectually
,
as to conform so far to our ways, as to take a part
in this dance. It is a national mania with us. You
have seen me go through with the business, and I
judged from your looks, that it struck you as a very
ridiculous affair. I am not ashamed to say, that I enjoy
it. I hold it right to countenance these people in their
innocent gaieties. I am most annoyed with the insipid and
flat compliments of these military heroes. Our national
manners call for all this, and allow strangers privileges
here, which would not be tolerated in any other place.
I should think it would be conformable to your
republican
notions to see the rich and the poor mixing together
in the same sports, in which their ancestors mixed in the
generations of the past. Will you have the goodness
to walk this dance with me? With what you have
seen, and with a few directions which I can give at the
moment when wanted, I am sure, from your walk and
your figure, that we can manage the dance. It will be
acceptable to my parents, and to the people. At
another time and place, I might not be allowed this
familiarity with one of another nation. Here it will be
entirely in place. I thought philosophy was
uppermost
at the moment; but I now think, that I
remembered
the applauses bestowed upon her dancing with
Don Pedro, and that the real spice of my reply was
envy. Thank you, said I, and here I added all her
titles, for your condescension, and for the care you
take to remind me of it. It is as unexpected as it is
grateful. I have seldom danced in my own country.
The dances there seem to me sufficiently ridiculous.
I confess, if you will, that yours do not seem less so.
If I wished to caricature rational beings in the deepest
malignity of heart, I would set them to capering,
bowing
,
skipping, cringing, and conducting after the manner
of this dance. I may as well pass for a cynic, and ill
bred, at once. But I do not love to see those for
whom I entertain the feelings I have had for you,
engaged
in this way. Besides, I should not exactly choose
to be the foil, to set off the dancing of your late partner.
I must deny myself the honor which you propose me.
She arose, and stood before me, and fixed her keen
black eyes upon me with a scrutiny at once intense,
modest, and yet firm, as though she would read to the
bottom of my heart. Do you not only misinterpret,
Sir, but mock my purpose? said she. I see well
that you understand how much I wished your esteem.
I cannot even flatter myself that there is any lurking
feeling of jealousy in all this lowering of your
countenance
.
Your philosophy, Sir, is too hard-hearted, and
sees the ridiculous too keenly for me. I thought that a
young lady under my obligations, and who kept a strict
guard that too much of the heart should not break out
in expressing those obligations, and who had in her
viens the unpolluted blood of twenty generations of
noble descent, might consider what I proposed to you,
as a condescension on my part. I see, Sir, that I have
mistaken you. I am to be your pupil, and I will show
you that I am not apt to make a second mistake, when
the first is clearly seen.
She arose rather in sorrow than in wrath, and calmly
walked away. I was deceived, if the flashing of her
dark eye was not dimmed, and suffused with tears.
I was disarmed of envy and jealousy, and all the legion
was cast out in a moment. I never remember to have
felt worse. It was not acidity or heart-burn now, but
emotions made up of mixed ingredients, but all of them
more bitter than aloes. `Despiser of dancing!' said
I to myself, `this is your pitiful philosophy. That
piercing eye saw the envy and jealousy that you would
fain have dubbed philosophy. And then the nobleness
of her motive, her considerate and mild benevolence!
Let her ask me to dance again, and I will dance, if
I figure more ridiculously than even the fat duea.'
But the evening passed away, without offering any
chance to manifest either repentance or reparation.
I was shown to my apartment, without being able to
catch the eye of Martha for a moment. The
confused
hum of the parting company gradually lessened
upon my ear, and I had scarce pressed my pillow,
before my imagination was weaving a laborious web
of dreaming. Mrs. Radcliffe's castles, and priests,
and ghosts, and winding-sheets, and spectres, figured
in succession before my mind's eye; and the
catastrophe
of each scene was Doa Martha shedding
tears at the thought of finding me guilty of the baseness
of envy.
The next two days were days of finding my latitude
and bearings at table, in the house, and in the adjoining
walks. Bryan furnished my table in my own room, a
charming apartment, partly lighted with painted glass,
and partly ventilated with Venetian blinds. Every
thing that could be devised for the comfort of a scholar
was placed in it, books, stationary, a writing desk, a
lolling chair, and a few articles of sumptuous furniture.
The blinds opened directly among the branches of
sycamores and catalpas, and I could reach the clusters
of grapes, that hung from the interlaced vines, with my
hands. The first sounds of the morning were the
mellow whistle of the red-bird, and the matins of the
nightingale-sparrow, directly on a level with my
window
.
I spent a good portion of those two days in
wandering unheeded and alone under the ancient groves
of these beautiful grounds, in the shade of gigantic and
spreading trees, planted by nature, beyond all date,
and in her own order. Fine swells, verdant dells,
springs, brooks, and the river, of which I have spoken;
innumerable flocks of beasts and birds, comprising, as
it seemed, all the varieties of the ark; beautiful
stone cottages, clustered with the bignonia in full
flower; comfort, industry, and repose;these were the
features of the landscape. Mountains towered in the
distance, and I heard frequent explosions, like thunder,
or distant earthquakes, which, they informed me, were
the blasts of the miners in the mountains, where they
were extracting silver ore. I found the intelligence
and good nature of Bryan invaluable. From him I
gleaned much of that small local information, which
is at once so necessary, and so difficult to obtain.
There was something peculiarly amiable and good
about him, and I was interested in hearing his history.
He was one of those ten thousand poor Catholic
adventurers
,
who are seeking bread and employment more
especially in the Catholic countries. Enthusiastically
attached to every remembrance of home, the
circumstance
of my speaking English drew his kind heart
towards me. The deep and grateful affection which
he felt for the Condesa and her daughter, and
something
of transferred kindness to me, as her supposed
deliverer, added another tie. The only failing was one
of too much kindness, a disposition to outrun the limits
of propriety in bringing information of what passed in
the family in respect to me.
The third morning after my arrival, I was invited
again to my place at table with the family. After
suitable
compliments, and inquiries if things were right in
my apartment, and other commonplace conversation,
I was informed that my limited number of six pupils
were waiting to have me arrange my time for giving
them lessons in English. I of course proposed
commencing
immediately. Bryan received directions with
respect to the horses and a carriage or
volante
,
whenever
I chose to ride, and I was invited, with great
urbanity, in all respects to consider myself as a
member
of the family, and dispose of my time and
amusements
VOL. I. 14
at my own discretion. The eye of the Conde,
I remarked, constantly wandered, as though he
struggled
with the internal apprehension of rebellion and
civil discord. The father and Don Pedro had returned
to their usual stern reserve towards me. The Condesa
and her daughter, were rather formal than otherwise.
There were a few officers, beside the family, at table.
For myself, I was treated with civility enough, but I
had the uncomfortable sensation of seeming to impose
restraint upon the whole circle. It was arranged, that
I should give my lessons between three and five in the
evening, commencing with that day.
At the assigned hour, my grammars and dictionaries
were selected, and my pupils introduced to me, in the
place where I preferred to receive them, in my own
apartment. With two of them, Doa Martha and Don
Pedro you are already acquainted. A master's
comfort
in the discharge of his thankless, and yet
responsible
duties, depends much, as every one knows, upon
the disposition and character of his pupils. You have
passed through that bitter discipline, and have served
in that hard warfare, and you will sympathize with me,
while I give you the outlines of the rest of my pupils
in this my new charge. I comprehended in a
moment
,
that in Don Pedro, I had an arrogant observer,
and a vigilant spy; whose least concern was to learn
the language, and who would yet find fault with his
instructer, for his want of progress. The elder of the
four strangers I should have supposed turned of nineteen.
She too was noble, was called Gauchupine, and had
been born in Old Spain, and had a half a dozen long
names, terminating in
a
, and was, like Martha, an only
daughter, and heiress of a long string of titles, and
what imported much more, even there, an immense
fortune. She had a fine figure, an air rather haughty,
a brownish complexion, and the usual black locks and
eyes. She was much more gaudily dressed than
Martha
,
and the general expression was pride of wealth
and uncontrolled feeling. To avoid the incumbrance
of her names and titles, I shall call her by her first
name, Dorothea. The other three, were of the name
of Benvelt, daughters of a miner of Saxon descent,
who had accumulated vast wealth in his profession, had
been ennobled, and now held the office of assayer of the
mines. These daughters were from eighteen to
fourteen
,
beautiful girls, with round faces of the purest and
the most brilliant red and white, with flowing flaxen
curls on their alabaster necks, and mild and melting
blue eyes. They struck me, as most amiable, untamed
romps, with the kindest sensibilities, and whose good
dispositions were so unchangeable, as to have survived
the extreme indulgence, with which they had been
managed, or rather mismanaged by their widowed
father, who loved them with such a doting fondness,
as would be as apt to cherish their faults as their
virtues
.
Few situations can be imagined more embarrassing
and awkward than mine; a stranger, of a different
nation
and religion, thus commencing a task, hard and
unthankful at the best, under every advantage, and
here undertaken with pupils, who, except Martha,
spoke very indifferent French, the only language, in
which I could communicate with them, and thus
beginning
upon a language, which foreigners generally
suppose
extremely difficult to learn. I made a few
remarks
,
by way of explaining my plan, and the mutual
diligence, necessary for our reciprocal duties, and I
assigned them their lesson. Martha evidently
remembered
what had occurred at the fte, but she seated
herself to her task, with the unaffected docility and
earnestness
of one who meant to learn. The only time,
in which I had ever seen a smile in the grim face of
Don Pedro, was when I gave him his task. There
was on his face an ironical semblance of submission,
which became him as the capers do an elephant.
Dorothea
,
instead of looking at the lesson, eyed me from
head to foot. The Misses Benvelt, in a language
neither
French, German, nor Spanish, but a compound of
the accents of the three, eagerly proposed a great
many questions, and laughed heartily at me and
themselves, for not being able to understand each
other. A grave smile at our mutual embarrassment,
interrupted the studies of Martha, and she quietly set
us right, by interpreting for us. They thanked her in
Spanish, as they said, for bringing them so pretty a
fellow to teach them English. She bade them be
quiet, for that I understood Spanish. This produced
from them more laughter and romping, and it was some
time before I obtained stillness. I applied myself to the
Spanish, while they were engaged in their English;
and we proposed it, as a trial of speed, which of us
should first learn the language of the other. The
attention
of Martha was sustained and entire. Don
Pedro
arose repeatedly, took out his watch, yawned, and
said, as plainly as manner could say it, this is a most
simple business for a man of my dignity. Dorothea
walked carelessly round the room, examined the
paintings
,
and looking me full in the face, asked me, if the
dress I wore, was in the fashion of my country? The
Saxon young ladies found inexplicable difficulties,
teased me with innumerable questions, but seemed
both goodnatured, and disposed to learn. The
recitations
corresponded to these different degrees of
attention
.
That of Martha comprised all, that was within
the limits of the task assigned. Don Pedro strove to
hide his want of his lesson, under affected indifference
and disregard to the business. Dorothea answered my
questions, by proposing questions in her turn, asking
me the English of different words. The Misses
Benvelt
blushed rosy red, attempted
badinage
, and the
youngest of them shed some tears. I treated them
with great gentleness, and made all possible excuses
for them. To which they replied by saying, that I
was a dear, kind master, and that they would do better
next time. Thankful was I, to get over this first
formidable
business so well. Martha tarried one moment
after the departure of the other pupils. I seized that
moment, to make the
amende honorable
, which I had
vowed to myself to make, the first opportunity, for
my misbehaviour of the former evening. Allow me,
14*
said I, to avail myself of this chance to tell you, that I
have been much dissatisfied with myself, since my
rudeness of the other evening. I shall have no more
peace of mind, until you have reconciled me to myself
by your forgiveness. The beautiful dancing of
yourself
and your partner, excited envy. In the
self-blindness
of the moment, I baptized the bad feeling by the
name of philosophy. Dance as charmingly as you will,
and be as happy as you will, and with whom you will.
I will witness it all, and be a philosopher no more.
Only say that you forgive me. She held out her hand.
Forgive you, my dear sir? That is a word utterly
misapplied
in this case. If you were to put it to the
account
of a little jealousy, it would be placing the thing
in so flattering a light, that any young lady would
forgive you of course. But, if it will satisfy you with
yourself, know, that the frankness of this confession,
places you, at least in my thoughts, on as high ground,
as if you had not sinned. Go, I forgive you. Be a
philosopher no more.
This may serve as a specimen of the general order
of our recitations for a considerable time. I was
sometimes provoked with the insolence of Don Pedro.
But he always seemed to have his cue, and not to be
disposed to carry it beyond a certain point. I found
him not deficient in capacity. Sometimes, to impress
me that this was not the case, he would recite his lesson
quite well. He once or twice undertook the puzzling
me with some perplexing niceties, that he had studied
out. As soon as he found me thoroughly informed
upon the subject, he desisted, and I was troubled from
that quarter no more. My other pupils gave me no
particular difficulty, and made the customary progress,
except oneand her progress was rapid; the task of
teaching her was delightful, and reserved as a desert to
carry down the bitterness of all the rest. My other
amusements were walking and riding. I made
frequent
excursions among the mountains, and often rose
early, and scaled them, that from their summits, I
might contemplate the rising sun. I sometimes angled
in the stream, and in this amusement I had more
dexterity
and success, than the inhabitants themselves.
Once or twice I rode with the Conde on his hunting
parties. I saw at once, that I never could acquire any
thing of Spanish dexterity at throwing the noose.
Beside
the slaughter of such animals, as deer and buffaloes,
for sport, brought to my view such agony and
struggle
,
as were too painful to my feelings. The
fire-huntings
by night, had a picturesque and impressive
effect, which interested me for two or three times.
But my serious amusements at home, were my books,
and playing the harpsicord, at which I had acquired
some little previous dexterity. I am inclined to think
that this latter amusement, derived its chief interest
from the circumstance, that I pursued it in the same
room with the Condesa and her daughter, and had the
instructions of the latter to help me out with the tune.
I saw her seldom alone. But I had contrived so to
manage demonstrations of a change of mind in
relation
to dancing, that there seemed a tacit
understanding
,
that my silent apologies had been fully accepted.
A new source of satisfaction was opening to us both.
My previous knowledge of Latin and French, together
with a considerable knowledge of the philosophy of
languages in general, and, let me bring out the whole
truth, an earnest desire to converse with Doa Martha
in a language which flowed from her lips like honey,
and sounded on my ear like music, soon made me
master of the Spanish. I felt it due to the talents and
virtues, as well as the taste and literature of my fair
and amiable pupil, to propose to be guided in my course
of reading by her judgment. I perceived that it was a
compliment which counted at once, and went directly
to the point. She, in her turn, made a surprising
progress
in English, so much so, that she could converse
with me in that language, before either of the other
pupils could comprehend a sentiment, expressed by the
words. They might know a particular word, and we
amused ourselves by putting them on a wrong scent,
and we so often convinced them that they totally
misapprehended
our meaning, that we could, if we had
chosen, have held a confidential conversation in their
presence, and nothing but our countenances would have
betrayed a sentiment. The temptation was great, and
almost irresistible to this very point. We were both a
little guilty in this way, but I can aver, on my
conscience
,
that she trespassed oftener and farther in that
point, than I did myself. You can imagine my delight
in unfolding to such a pupil the treasures of our great
master-minds. But you cannot imagine her eagerness
and delight in these employments. I discovered, in
fact, from the brewing gloom and ill humour in the
countenance of Don Pedro, that he was fully aware of
our enjoyments in these respects, and that, like the
first enemy of man, he was watching to eject us from
our paradise. I saw that, in order to the tranquil
continuance
of these enjoyments, innocent as they were,
we must be more moderate in the indulgence of them.
While the countenance of the father Josephus was
lengthening, and accumulating bitterness in its
expression
towards me, my young male pupil made little or
no progress, interrupted our most impressive readings
with a whistle of contempt, staring at her with an
expression
of pity, and at me with scorn. I felt that
my happiness must soon have a crisis. In a morning
conversation at table, he took occasion to express a
decided dislike for the English language. He observed,
that a foolish fashion had controlled him to think of
learning it; but that it was a harsh, hissing, and vulgar
language, fit only to be spoken, as it was, by barbarians.
He thence digressed to the people of the States, and
he spoke of them with increased asperity, adding, that
the only difficulty in reducing the rebellious creoles
to proper loyalty and submission, arose from the
contiguity
and the infectious example of the States.
Colonel Arredondo, who had acted so efficient a part
in putting down the beginnings of disaffection, was
present, and echoed the observation. I thought of
various replies to these rude remarks, which were
evidently
personal. They were all bitter, and replies of
defiance. I received, too, at the same time, a look of
such earnest entreaty from a quarter, that I need not
mention, as caused me to suppress the rising words.
I was too content with my situation, to commit it by
taking notice of remarks which, after all, I was not
bound to consider personal. The only reply that I
deemed it proper to make, was, by a profound bow of
apology to the family of the Conde for leaving the table,
by rising, and looking Don Pedro for a moment sternly
in the face, and leaving the room.
Bryan informed me that the Conde, who appeared
to have been absent when the conversation commenced,
and who only noticed the insulted consciousness with
which I left the room, applauded my mode of noticing
this rudeness, and observed, that whatever they might
have thought of my language and country, his personal
obligations to me, forbade their using such language at
his table in my presence, and requesting them to
abstain
from it in future. He furthermore told me, that
he had, more than once, heard the father confessor
cautioning the Conde against the influence which I was
imperceptibly, as he said, but rapidly gaining over the
minds of his wife and daughter. He had heard him
warn him, that such a course would render him
unpopular
,
and suspicious among the ultra and fierce
royalists
,
that it was dangerous to the church thus to retain
a heretic of some learning and ingenuity in his family.
It is true, he informed me, that the Conde always
vindicated
me from any sinister designs, and expressed an
entire confidence in my honor and fidelity. Even the
manner of the Condesa, so tender and maternal, when
we were for a moment alone together, and so reserved
and silent, when we were before witnesses, boded me
no good.
Influenced by these united considerations, I was
determined
to have an explanation, at least with my fair
pupil, and either propose through her a relinquishment
of a charge, which seemed likely to produce only
dissension
and uneasiness, or at least to propose to her to
shorten our readings together. A chance soon offered.
I had been in the habit of going through my tasks with
my other pupils first, and reserving the pleasure of
hearing this pupil for the last. Don Pedro had this
time made a miserable and stammering attempt at a
lesson, a thing he had not attempted before, since I left
the breakfast table so abruptly. He sometimes, as I
remarked, attempted a lesson, that he might show his
ability to do it, when he pleased. The task was of
blank verse, and somewhat difficult, and he wholly
failed, and failed, evincing an effort to succeed. This
put him in evident ill humour. Dorothea stumbled,
too, and excused herself by taxing me roundly with
taking more pains with Doa Martha than herself, and
that for this want of equal attention, she was behind
her. The two younger Misses Benvelt strove hard
to recite, and shed childish tears at their failure. The
elder one, who had always before shown great
sweetness
of temper, caught the infectious ill temper, and
was stubbornly silent. The young gentleman whistled
awhile, delighted with these murky indications of ill
success to my function, and left the room. The other
pupils went out in succession, without the usual civilities
of leave. I was left alone with Martha in the midst
of her recitation.
The recitation closed, and before the reading, which
generally followed it, as she took up the book for the
reading, I requested pardon for interrupting the
customary
order of our pursuits. What mean these tears
and this rudeness, Doa Martha? said I. I see
nothing to justify it. Constructions must have been put
upon these exercises, which I see nothing to justify.
Where is the wrong? I begin to be afraid that I am
fonder of learning Spanish, than teaching English. I
have a surmise, that I am rather longer in my attention
to your lesson, than the rest. It is natural to linger in
pleasure, and to hurry through toil. You had made
me a kind of promise to put me right, when you saw
me going unconsciously in the wrong. The truth is,
my conscience tells me, I am partly guilty of Dorothea's
charge. I have probably involved you in an unpleasant
predicament, as being, through your generous
indulgence
,
an accessary. I have been thinking, Doa
Martha, that my compatriots about this time are on
their return to the United States, and that I had better
restore tranquillity to all these ruffled countenances,
and relieve you from all charges of too much kindness
towards me, by joining them, and returning to my
country.
During these remarks she manifested great agitation,
and replied with a voice of deep emotion, which she
endeavoured to conceal under an appearance of gaiety.
You are now partly kind, Sir, and partly unkind.
You are kind, very kind, to remind me so gently of my
own fault, by calling it your's. I will be as frank as
you have been. Where you have done badly in this
thing, I have done worse. I have determined every
day to retrench and deny myself. But it seemed so
innocent an amusement, and so little liable to
misconstruction
,
I have returned to my fault again and again.
I love English, that I must confess. I am sensible
that I have trespassed on your time and patience.
Your language has opened to me a new world, and
your beautiful poets have convinced me that I have a
new heart. Will you leave me just now, in the midst
of these enjoyments? You have just opened the first
pages of the book of knowledge before me, and have
raised the eagerness of desire, and you would now
leave me, not enough instructed, unaided, to read it.
We cannot spare you just now. The character which
my mother has always maintained as belonging to you, is
beginning to be developed, to convince the doubtful, and
to confound your enemies. That you have such, I will
not deny, nor that I have heard you traduced. More
shame to those who do it so unjustly. Let them go
on. Their palpable malice has half convinced my
father. In my mother you have a firm friend. Your
pupils behaved badly just now, I admit. But what of
that? I dare not tell you what these young ladies think
of you, for fear you should become vain. Stay, and
triumph over your enemies. It is unworthy of that
spirit, of which I have received such memorable proofs,
VOL. I. 15
to fly, because your merit has raised you enemies.
I have none too many real friends myself. Oh! if you
knew what I have recently suffered!
It is not altogether an original remark, that human
nature is a very frail establishment. Those brilliant
and spirited eyes, melting in the tenderness of
persuasion
,
and fixed upon me, the frank and childlike
simplicity
of her confidence, and the deep expression of
grief with which she made the last remark, completely
vanquished my resolution, and I expressed myself in
terms of unwonted bitterness towards those who could
be so base as to cause her suffering. I was vehement,
and expressed myself with an ardor, that intimated any
thing, rather than the common interest which I must be
supposed to feel in her condition.
She looked at me rather with surprise than
displeasure
,
holding up her hands in astonishment. Look
you here! said she. This is the philosopher, the
pure and dispassionate intelligence that despises
dancing
.
Indeed, Sir, this declamation is more flattering
than just. It is a truth, that a personage, just so
meritorious
and innocent as I am, does suffer just now, and
that bitterly. Let us both lay our wrongs out of the
question, and see which can suffer with most dignity
and patiencethe dance-hating philosopher, or the
untaught, romping Spanish girl, that dearly loves the
fandango. Your readiness to fly at the first difficulty,
inclines me to think, the young lady will vanquish the
philosopher at this trial. I answered, When I know
the nature of your sufferings, and from what cause they
flow, I can then judge of the equality of the trial.
Oh! I must make you a confidant, then, must I? I
am thinking you are rather too young, all philosopher
as you are, to receive the confessions of a young
lady. But I know of no impropriety in saying, that
the man, who the other morning so rudely caused
you to leave the table, is the cause of my suffering.
Why should I stint my confidence? They have
destined
me for him. I have parried the proposition for a
long time. Once I was indifferent to him. My
feelings
,
I know not how, have changed, and I now
positively
detest him. The worst is, that my friends, my
father, my dear mother even, are in the conspiracy
against me. They even urge me to an immediate
union. They allege the disturbances and dangers of
the times; the necessity of an equal-aged protector, a
man of the same rank, wealth, and condition with
myself
.
They go further. His taciturnity with them is
wisdom. His bitter temper is honorable sternness.
They even sicken me with his praises. To all this,
urged again and again, I have only to reply, that I
feel safe; that I would neither wish to leave, or survive
my mother; and that I have a fixed disinclination to
any present change in my condition. I strive to gain
time. The Virgin mother forgive me! I dare not tell
them that I hate their favourite. Once or twice they
have driven me to desperation, and then they heard all
the truth. But enough of this. I know not what has
led me into the folly of telling you my trifling secrets.
I mean to be more moderate and discreet in allowing
myself the pleasure of English reading. I mean to be
patient and prudent. Do you do the same. Shorten
my exercises, and prolong those of the rest. Be
marked in your civilities to them. How my heart
thanked you, for conducting in a manner equally
forbearing
and spirited towards Don Pedro the other
morning! continue this course, and you will conquer
them all. Oh that the Holy Virgin would touch your
heart! Then, ah then she made a pause. And
what then? I eagerly asked. Then you might
become
to me, as a brother.
I implore you, said I, my dear Martha, not to put
any of these bribes before me, nor to make any of
these tender suppositions, which can never be. I
fear, I can never change my religion. My convictions
upon this point are settled. I should poorly win my
claim to more confidence with a mind, that weighs
character, like yours, by becoming a recreant to my
principles. I beseech you not to make me swerve from
my course by a kindness, which may set my wicked
imagination
to weaving the threads of a tie, tenderer than
that of brother. I must never allow such a fancy,
much less give it utterance. You are right, she
replied
;
you must neither forget the latter, nor dream
of the former. But remain firm to your philosophy.
I pleased myself in fancying you were cold,
disinterested
,
dispassionate, and what an excellent casuist you
would be to me in cases of conscience and the heart.
In short I promised to find in you, a calm and
considerate
friend and brother. Above all things, I wish
you to exercise forbearance towards Don Pedro, and to
remain where you are. Things must change for the
better. Put the most favorable construction you can
upon a confidence, which departs so far from common
rules. Alas! whom have I in whom to confide, but
my mother? and, unhappily, she is in sentiment with
my father upon this point.
It is not in man, at least it was not in me, to resist
such persuasions, which, however they may seem out
of the way in the relation, had, under the circumstances
of the case, an air of simple and modest confidence,
which, according to my notions of decorum, were in
perfect keeping with her whole deportment. My own
wrongs were forgotten, and regarding Don Pedro as
another Menko, I was determined that I would remain,
and endure all, as long as it should be endurable, and
that I would devote myself to the welfare of Martha, in
whom I began to admit to myself, that I felt to the full,
at least a fraternal interest. And with her frank
admission
of claims up to that point, I determined to
content
myself.
I fear, sir, that I have already wearied and cloyed
you, with these milky adventures. I have all along
felt extremely foolish about being the hero of this my
own story, and have thought often of the privileges of
the renowned author of the Commentaries, and have
wished, that like him, I were of sufficient consequence,
to speak of myself in the third person. But, as you
insist upon my proceeding, you must arm yourself with
patience, and I will introduce you to matters of a little
15*
more pith and moment. I will go on to give you
all the tender matter of this stage of my adventures
in a mass. You may infer, as you please, my
inmost
thoughts, whether, or not, I am a captivating
man, since you will see from my story, that I fire
every thing that comes in my way.
It happened, the next day after this conversation
with Martha, that Dorothea and the Misses Benvelt
came in for recitation considerably earlier than usual.
The library was separated from my apartment where
we recited, by a partition, which was pierced in a
number
of places to admit a free circulation of the air, and
was screened by Venetian blinds, a whisper in one
apartment, as in a whispering gallery, was audible in
the other. I had set out on my evening ride; I forget
the circumstance, but something had induced me to
return. I was in the library when the ladies entered
my apartment. I was so situated, that I could not
escape, without making it known, that I had overheard
their conversation. I heard my pupils begin to make
me the subject of a confidential conversation, premising
that they had seen me ride out, and that I should not
be back for an hour. I heard enough, before I had
determined what course I ought to pursue, to hold me
in `durance vile,' until I might escape unperceived.
I was aware that I should create a most painful
surprise, if I should open my door, and interrupt
them.
The conversation began by the Misses Benvelt
inquiring
in a half whisper, if it were certain that I was
not in my room. Dorothea affirmed that I was not,
for, as she rode into the courtyard, she had seen me
moving out on horseback. Beside, she added, I
should think, he could not hear us from the library,
even if he were there. Neither do I believe, even if
he heard us, that he could make out our conversation,
when we speak in Spanish. Elder Miss Benvelt.
There you mistake. He speaks and understands
Spanish well. Love and Martha have taught him all
that. Dorothea. He learns Spanish to a miracle.
That is true. And he is a charming fellow. But I
vow to our Lady of Lisbon, that I believe not a word
of his loving Martha, though it is easy to see, poor
thing, that she is dying for him. But she is sped.
She is obliged to take Don Pedro, for better or worse.
And I see not, why she ought not to be satisfied. He
is rather solemn and grim, to be sure. Not exactly
such a man as our master, but well enough after all.
I suppose you have heard the news, that there is
another rising in Texas. A great many Americans
have come on, and are joined with the rebels. The
Conde has to go and fight them. He insists that his
daughter marries before he sets out for the army.
The Condesa is in heart with Martha, and against an
immediate union, and there has been a great storm in
the palace. I think for one, that she never will do
better. Jesu! I have seen as pretty, as she is, though
she gives herself such airs. The father confessor is
ready to excommunicate her for her obstinacy, and
Don Pedro swears, that she did formerly as good as
promise him, that she was ready to go with him to the
altar; and he lays all the blame of her present
obstinacy
upon our teacher, and he swears, that if the
adventurer
,
as he calls him, does not leave the country, he
will call him out and fight him. That's determined
upon. Some say, he will fight, and some say, that
these people are better to fight Indians, than they are
to handle sword and pistol with a gentleman. I wish
I knew, if there were any love between them. For
my part, I always suspect such grave people. Martha,
to be sure, seems to have fire enough, but the other,
seems an insensible block of wood. I dare say, both
of them have their thoughts, as well as other people.
At any rate, Don Pedro is determined to kill him, or
drive him out of the country. They have threatened.
Martha every way, poor child; to send her to Spain,
and to a convent, or to shut her up in the palace upon
bread and water. Second Miss Benvelt. Poor
Martha! I am sorry for her! It must be a dreadful
thing to marry, where one does not love. We must
all allow, that Martha is a sweet girl, though she does
happen to be prettier than any of us. As for our
teacher, he is a divine young man. Certainly Martha
is an exception. But leave her out, and we must
allow that the Germans and the Americans are much
handsomer than the Spaniards. I was at Chihuahua,
and saw those fine fellows that came with Captain
Pike. I could never endure a swarthy Spaniard for
a husband, after seeing such men. Dorothea,
looking
in the glass. I vow, Miss Benvelt, you are very
complimentary. May be, you forget that I am a
full-blooded
Spaniard, and a Gauchupine myself. I bless
the Virgin, my father allows me to do just as I please.
This poor fellow of ours has no money. Now would
it not be a generous thing, to take him myself. I
have wealth enough for us both. I have done every
thing to let him see, that I did not dislike him.
But he is an astonishing block, and will not take a
hint. Elder Miss Benvelt. My father is as rich,
as yours, and allows me as much liberty. For the matter
of that, the Saxons and Americans are much more
alike, than the Spaniards and Americans. I hate Don
Pedro! The bloody-minded wretch, to drive away our
master, or kill him. I hope, if they do fight, that Don
Pedro will fall. Do you think he will fight,
Dorothea
?
Dorothea. I dare say he will. But if he
should, these Americans have an eye and a hand, as
steady and true as steel. It is just as likely, as not,
that he kills Don Pedro, and then I am sure he would
get Martha for the prize. Now, to tell you the plain
truth, I do not value English a fig, and I am sure, I
shall never learn it. What's the use? he talks French,
and you say, he can talk Spanish. I vow to the
Virgin, I love to look at him, and that's just what I
come for; and you, German romps, you are here for
nothing else either. How is it, that Martha has already
learned to hiss in the horrid language? Is it not
surprising
that the language should be so harsh, and the
men so pretty?
I heard a great deal more childish rattle of this sort.
I was presented with interior views of what was passing
in the recesses of the Conde's household. I gathered,
that Martha was more severely pressed to an union
with Don Pedro, than she had informed me; that I
might expect to be treated by him with more gross
rudeness, than I had yet experienced, and, more
important
than all the rest, that there was an insurrection
in Texas. The confabulation ended by my fair pupils
proposing a walk in the garden, before recitation. The
moment they retired, I retreated too, and, by a
circuitous
direction, came into my room as if from abroad,
leaving them entirely ignorant what flattering secrets
I had been compelled to hear.
This recitation passed off as usual, except that Don
Pedro did not attend it. The young ladies apologized
for their rudeness and negligence of the former day, in
such a manner, as led me to see, they had been tasked
by Martha for it. They attributed it to chagrin for not
having learned their task. They promised better
attention
for the future. As we had agreed, I devoted but
little time to Martha, and more than usual to the rest,
and the exercise went off with apparent satisfaction
upon all sides.
Next morning I had still further confirmation of what
was passing at the palace respecting me. I wished to
take a ride to visit a young Englishman, that was much
esteemed, who had recently been dangerously wounded
by the unexpected explosion of a blast, which he was
superintending in the adjacent mines. He was the
only son of an amiable and interesting widow, whose
husband had been settled on the Conde's estate, as
chief engineer in the mines. Bryan rode with me to
show me the way. As soon as we had cleared the
park, he addressed me in a voice, which trembled with
affectionate concern. Now God and St. Patrick
touch the heart of your Honor, and make you a true
Roman. Why that prayer, Bryan? I asked.
Because, your Honor, father Josephus, blast his black
face! has set all the big people against you. He tells
them that you are a bad heretic, as knowing as the
devil; and that you will make all the people rebels.
He makes you a kind of Orange-man. The Indians
and the small folks like you all the better for it.
But that is no help here. For the king's men just
whip you up for nothing, and plunge you a thousand
fathoms in the mines for nothing but a word. And
these folks have all the upperhand now. And so the
Conde, to please the big folks, and the father, and the
young Don, and all, has published, that unless you will
turn round, and become a true Roman, and swear for
the king, he will send you packing. Your land is a
free one, and if you go home, unless you are pleased
to beat me back, Bryan goes with you. My good
friend, said I, I have hardly the means of taking
care of myself. But if I leave here, I certainly return
to my own free and happy country, where every honest
man does as he pleases, and there an industrious and
active lad can hardly fail of finding profitable and
independent
employment. Ay, said Bryan, that's
the country for me. Here there's but a word and a
blow, and the blow comes first. But it will please your
Honor to hear, that Martha, God bless her bright eyes!
pleaded hard for you, and said, as how an honest man
could not change his religion at once, and just when
he had a mind to it. The jewel and her mother had
a great deal to say for you. Finally, the Conde got
his blood up, and looked cross, this way; and swore,
that he had done enough to please her whims, and
those of her mother; that his mind was fixed, and that
he meant to try another hand with you, and with them.
He looked more grim and bitter than ever I saw him
before, and ordered his daughter out of the room.
Bryan continued to give me details of this sort, until
we arrived at a most beautiful spot at the foot of the
mountains, from which burst forth great numbers of
clear and beautiful springs. In a deep grove of
catalpas
and white walnuts, through which ran a rivulet,
formed by the union of these springs, was one of those
green stone cottages, of which I have spoken. Here,
Bryan informed me, lived the young man, whom I
came to visit. I knocked, and was admitted
immediately
.
On a clean mattress, and in a room neat and
cool, lay the unfortunate young man, whose wounds, it
was feared, would prove mortal. He had a manly
face, of the finest expression. His neck and breast
were scorched and blackened with gunpowder. He
appeared in an agony of pain, and the noble effort
which he made to suppress the expression of it before
his mother, gave his countenance a striking moral
interest
.
His mother seemed between forty and fifty,
and her countenance bore the impress and the trace of
former beauty. No language can paint the maternal
affection, apprehension, and suspense, with which she
bent over the feverish and agonized form of her only
son. I told her, in a low voice, who I was, and that
having heard of her son's misfortune, and though not of
his country, yet speaking the same language and
entertaining
for him the sympathies of a fellow countryman,
I had come in the hope that he would allow me to sit
with him, to watch with him, or in some way to be
serviceable to him or her. I felt affected with the
spectacle before me, and whenever the heart is moved,
the tone and the words catch the emotion. All the
mother's heart was expressed in the earnestness of her
thanks. You are thrice welcome to my poor son,
said she, as he fondly grasped my hand. It will do
him good only to hear his own language spoken by one
so nearly of his own age. After I had assisted her to
raise him, while she arranged his dressings, and after she
had informed me how he had received his wound, she
proceeded to tell her own short, but sad story. My
husband came out here from England with an hydraulic
machine for throwing water from the mines. We were
here entirely in a region of strangers, both to our
language
and religion. I heard not a word of English for
two years. But the place was delightful, the scenery
inspiring, and the people kind. So long as my dear
husband was with me, I knew no want of society or
friends. We obtained a comfortable subsistence. We
VOL. I. 16
had the good opinion and the countenance of the Conde,
and every thing went well with us. We had but this
son. He was trained to the same employment with
his father, who lived to see him able to take his place.
The damp of the mines affected his health. He took
the fever of the country. Oh! how my heart throbbed
with apprehension, till his was still in death. Thou, O
God, sawest that it was good so to be. I was stupified,
reckless, almost motionless for months. Even this
sweet scenery, which memory still paints as it was
when my husband was with me, became tame and
gloomy. I was sure, `that the world had died to me,
and I to the world.' I mourned `in secret places;'
and I now feel that it was the insane and impious grief
which rises against that decree, which is as righteous
as it is unchangeable. God, who is rich in mercy,
bore, with his own divine forbearance, this my repining
spirit. I arose from my stupefaction, and I struggled
with myself, and I prayed and communed with God,
and became gradually composed, and the spirit of
peace revisited my bosom. This dear son began to be
to me, as the husband I had lost. He came forward,
considerate, virtuous, industrious, respected even by
these people, so different in manners and religion.
Yesterday the second blow was struck. My Heavenly
Father saw that my idolatrous leaning upon the father
was about to be transferred to the son. It may be,
God will look upon this my extreme affliction, and will
stay his hand with this solemn warning. And oh! if
he will be pleased to spare this my dear son, I here
promise, as soon as he shall recover, to strive not to
love him more than I ought. There is nothing on earth
in which to trust, but God.
Nothing soothes the agony even of pain, like true
sympathy and tenderness of heart. I looked on this
poor widow's all. We shed tears, the mother, the son,
and the stranger, together. I sat behind the young
man, sustaining him half raised on his pillows, and was
bathing his head, and chafing his throbbing temples
with aromatic vinegar, and the mother was fanning him,
and dropping silent tears, when the door opened, and
Doa Martha entered, without being announced. The
Conde, she said, had come out to take a look at a
new mine, excavating in the side of the mountain. He
had sent by Martha, who felt no disposition to pass by
this scene of sorrow, the preparations of the family
physician for his wounds. Her steps instinctively led
her to the abode of misery. She requested that she
might be set down at the foot of the hills, whence she
walked up to the widow's cottage, to be called for on
the return of the Conde in the evening.
The day was a holiday from the usual English
exercises
,
and it may be supposed, that the surprise of two
such persons, who seldom saw each other, except in
the presence of prejudiced spies, thus to be sure of the
greater part of a day together, and unsuspected, was a
pleasant one. Two circumstances concurred to open
both our hearts. We were in a scene of sorrow,
peculiarly
calculated to open the heart, and we were both
of us sufficiently apprised, that these interviews must
be of short duration. I may add, that I knew enough
of her ardent and affectionate character, to know what
effect it would have upon such a nature as hers, to see
me thus occupied. And if ever beauty, united with all
the adventitious circumstances of worldly estimation,
is irresistible, it is when the eye first melts in
sympathetic
participation with pain and woe, and is suffused
with the tears of unaffected pity. I discovered, by the
first affectionate look of recognition, that this was not
the first time Martha had been there. I saw, too, by a
transient look, that she thought well of that part of my
religion, which led me to spend my holiday in the
abode of sickness and sorrow. She said but a few
words to the poor widow, but it was the look that
accompanied those words, which went to my heart.
The young man next received her attention. She
gave him some cordial drops, and a balsam of the
country
for embrocation, and was particular in telling the
mother all that the physician had said and prescribed
in the case. The drops were given immediately, and
I raised him, and with the assistance of his mother, we
applied to his wounds these applications, which operated
almost immediately in allaying his anguish. He first
showed tranquillity, and the moment after drowsiness,
and soon he was in a quiet and refreshing sleep, the
first he had had from the time of his receiving his
wounds.
It was natural that the mother's heart should open to
confidence and hope, and while she spoke of the
extreme
forlornness and destitution in which his being
taken away would leave her, Martha replied, My
dear Madam, he must, and, I trust, he will recover.
Every thing that nursing and medical aid can do, we
will have done. I hope there is no ground for
apprehension
.
But even if things should go different from
our hopes, as long as I am here, and have the means
of aiding you, you shall have a daughter, if not a son.
You know whether you may depend upon my promise.
Who can trace the effect of such eyes glistening with
sympathetic tears? I felt to my cost, what it was upon
me. I perceived a certain swelling of my heart, and a
thick palpitation there, which I was sure, from what I
had read, and from the deep attention I had lately
bestowed upon these feelings. I was sure was love.
This, then, said I, is that terrible disorder, as
obstinately fixed upon me, as I was supposed to be upon
all my own determinations. Never had I watched a
conversation with such an intense interest, as that of
this blooming girl, so amply endowed with the means of
kindness and aid, holding the grasped hand of this
interesting
widow, and both of them dissolved in tears.
The Conde was not expected to return until
evening
.
Bryan was occupied in arranging her affairs in
her barn and enclosures. The mother was in the
kitchen, preparing refreshments and dinner for her
guests. The patient slept. The intense ardors of the
sun were mitigated by passing clouds, and a pleasant
breeze. Why should we not walk, asked Martha,
in these beautiful groves? I wish to show you what
a strength and beauty of vegetation we have here among
16*
these springs at the base of these mountains. The
trees, plants, shrubs, and flowers, that are common to the
mountains and the valleys, meet here, and intermingle.
The fountains, that trickle from the roots of the hills,
irrigate the various tribes of vegetation, the vines and
copses, and give them a delicious verdure and coolness.
Here are the favourite haunts of the red-bird, the
mocking-bird, the parroquet, and the myriads of birds
with the most variegated and splendid plumage, with
which this region abounds. Let us walk, and enjoy
the coolness and the scenery; and I, nothing loath,
I admit, walked with her under trees, every one of
which was prodigal of harmony. Immediately round
us, every thing was beauty and repose; but heavy
thunder, the clouds of which were not yet visible, rolled
among the mountains. The bald eagle and the falcon
raised their screams, and were soaring in the blue
above their loftiest summits. My fair companion
seemed
to have laid aside her reserve and her distance of
manner. She spoke in English in pure words and
correct
phrase, but with a Spanish accent, which possibly
I might not have admired, had the words been uttered
by the lips of age and deformity; and she quoted
Shakspeare with an enunciation, not perhaps like
Garrick's
,
but I am sure, I thought the words prettier, and
the quotation more apposite, than I had deemed them
before. I, too, had my quotations, and to tell you the
plain truth, we both of us verged rapidly towards that
confidential conversation, which both of us seemed to
have a presentiment would be our last. I cannot
remember
exactly how we arrived at the point, but we
had imperceptibly begun to say civil things to each
other, and to regret the want of opportunities to talk
with a little more freedom. Martha in particular
expressed
herself with great energy upon the beauty of
the day, the place, the occasion; and admitting that
she had never enjoyed a walk so much, observed,
quoting from Othello, that if I had a friend, let him
desert the usual frivolous pursuits of young men, and
turn aside on a holiday, to comfort and nurse a sick
young man, the only son of his mother, and she a
widow,let me bring such a friend to such a place,
and that would woo her.
Upon the hint, the same purpose with Othello's,
sprung to my lips; but prudence and honor laid their
imperious injunctions upon me, and suppressed the
expression of it. I only observed, that when I saw
such a friend standing on a precipice, with temptations
almost too strong for human nature to resist, I should
advise him, if honor or duty had placed a single
obstacle
in the way of winning the prize, not to woo it,
but to fly. In truth, said I, Doa Martha, if I
had not made an inviolable covenant with my thoughts
and resolutions, it would not be safe for me to be here.
A long and foolish silence ensued, each waiting for the
other to begin the conversation again. She resumed
first, by remarking, that she had been introduced, just
before her embarkation, to the splendid court of
Ferdinand
VII. I was very young, but I had the
customary
share of compliment and attention. But with what
different sensations did my youthful imagination
expatiate
in that scene of splendor and dissipation, from
the calm satisfaction of comforting the desolate heart of
this poor widow, and walking in this sweet place,
contemplating
this grand and awful nature above and
around us; seeing these gay birds, dressed still more
gaudily than the ladies of that court; hearing that
distant thunder echo in the mountains; feeling
myself
secure in the society of a man, who has opened
to me a new and an enchanting page in the book of
knowledge, in having taught me his language; and
finding myself here with him (both led by the same
impulse to do good) who feels on so many points
in common with myself. I replied, by applauding her
taste, and by saying, that although poets and
philosophers
had prosed upon the subject so much and so
often, it was not the less true, that there was no real
and healthful enjoyment, that would at once satisfy and
last, but that which proceeded from truth and nature.
The real and deep satisfactions of life are cheap and
common. The feverish and noxious pleasures, that
cost much, and are seasoned with pride, luxury, and
ambition, are within the reach of but few. With respect
to the affection, upon which you have touched in
quoting
from our bard, there is no doubt that luxury, and
dissipation, and splendor, and courts, are fatal to its
pure and genuine influence. That we can be happy,
let divines and poets say as they may, I know and
feel. Let the past and the future be blotted from the
records of memory. I can live long and happily on
the remembrance of this day. And I, too, she
replied, have been so happy, that I want words to
express my sensations. I have felt before this, that
certain places and scenes, and even a certain
temperature
of the air, must concur with the tone of our
thoughts and feelings, to produce high enjoyment.
What a beautiful canopy of shade! Look at that
distant
outline of mountains, that seem to be points from
which the mind can take its departure towards the
eternal throne! How grand those distant peals of
thunder
!
And yet what repose and tranquillity about us!
Scarcely a leaf trembles, to disturb the singing of the
birds. This place, I should think, would almost
suggest
thoughts of love to a philosopher, who held himself
above the joys and pursuits of the vulgar. What
beautiful
verses were those which you read to me the other
day from Wordsworth. See if I quote them right.
Love had he learn'd in cots, where poor men lie,
His daily teachers had been woods and rills;
The silence that is in the starry sky;
The sleep that is among the lonely hills.
I have heard my companions often talk with a foolish
cant about woods and solitudes, and love and a cottage.
Nothing is to me more disgusting, than the affectation
of fondness for these things, as nothing is more
delightful
,
than the real, deep, and cordial relish for them.
Instead of affecting any delight which I do not feel in
these simple satisfactions, how many times have I
suppressed
emotions of this sort, struggling for utterance,
lest I should be thought extravagant and romantic.
While we were thus conversing, the thunder, which
had been rolling at a distance in the mountains,
approached
nearer. The peals were more frequent, and
the echoes more loud and awful. The brassy edges
of clouds rolled together, and sweeping forward, like
the smouldering pillars of smoke from some mighty
conflagration, were seen lowering from the heights,
and beginning to cover the sun. Gleams of lightning
darted far into the regions of the atmosphere, that were
as yet of cloudless blue. The crash that followed
interrupted our conversation. Hark, said she,
what terrible peals of thunder! and she clung
involuntarily
to my arm. I asked her, if she were
accustomed
to be frightened at thunder. She answered,
Not with thunder storms of a common character.
But I have been so happy, and have enjoyed these
hours so much, that I know not why, at this moment I
feel not precisely terror, but as your poet says, `awe
struck.' How grand and how awful are the forms and
foldings of those clouds, `tempest o'er tempest rolled.'
Why is it, that in such perfect repose of the heart,
and such delightful exercise of its best affections,
images of terror and destruction should bring with
them peculiar alarm? It is in these moments, when
we feel in the highest degree our capabilites of
enjoyment
,
that the idea of death, strikes me with chill
and with fear. `D'ou part l'clair, que nous appelons
existence, et dans quelle nuit va-t-il s'teindre?
L'Eternel a plac la naissance et la mort sous la forme
de deux fantmes voils aux deux bouts de ntre
carrire. L'un produit l'inconcevable moment de
ntre vie, que l'autre s'empresse de dvorer.'
By this time the horizon was covered. There was a
rushing sound in the air, and we were reluctantly
compelled to return to the house for shelter. The
thunder storms of the northern regions, seldom give
an idea of the assemblage of terrific accompaniments,
belonging to a severe one in the tropics. A thick
mist fills all the distance between the clouds and the
earth. A dim and yellowish twilight throws a frightful
yellow upon the verdure of the trees and the earth.
The storm was tremendous. The commencement was
in the stillness of death, and the burst of the winds was
as instantaneous, as the crash of the thunder. The
rain did not descend in drops, or in sheets, but the
terrible phenomenon of the bursting of the clouds upon
the mountains took place. The roar of the new
formed
torrents and cascades, pouring from the mountains,
mingled with that of the rain, the thunder, and the
winds. The atmosphere was a continued and lurid
glare of lightning, which threw a portentous brilliance
through the descending waters and the darkness of the
storm. Many an aged tree, that had remained
unscathed
for ages, was stript from its summits to its
roots by the descending fires of the sky. The people,
used as they were to thunder storms, were appalled
by the fury of this. The sick young man, aroused
from his sleep, rested his head upon his hand, and his
pains seemed to be suspended, while he contemplated
the uproar and apparent conflagration of the elements
abroad. A blaze of lightning filled the room, and the
thunderbolt fell upon a vast eypress, but a few feet
from the house. The shock was so violent, that each
one, that was sitting in the room, was thrown from his
seat. As we recovered from the blow, we saw how
naturally, in such moments, each one flies to the
object
,
in which he has most confidence. The
widowed
mother, sprang to the arms of her son, and Martha,
at the same moment, clung to my side. The scene,
so terific to them, was to me, one of the grandest in
nature. I enjoyed the commotion and the darkness of
the storm. All the energies of my nature were
awakened
.
I would have been willing, that such peals
should have been repeated every moment, so that the
bolt fell not on the house. The impulse, which had
led Martha to fly to me in the moment of terror, was
the most unequivocal proof, I had yet experienced,
that I was not indifferent to her. Here the heart had
spoken; but the moment of recovered self-possession,
replaced the paleness of surprise and terror, with the
blushes of consciousness. The entire calmness, which
I felt and avowed, drew from them expressions of
astonishment, almost of reproach. But it gradually
communicated, as it invariably does in such cases,
composure
to the rest. We resumed our seats in a kind
of tranquil astonishment, as the storm gradually
subsided
.
The thunder rolled sublimely still, but at a greater
distance. The blue of the atmosphere began to show
itself at the zenith. The clouds rolled away towards
the east, and the sun came forth in his brightness, just
above the smoking summits of the hills. The scene,
that was terrific in the fury of the storm, was now an
indescribable
mixture of beauty and grandeur. Frequent
gleams of the most vivid lightning played on the
passing
extremities of the clouds, rolled together, pile
above pile, like precipices of brass. White pillars of
mist arose from the earth. The birds welcomed the
return of the sun, and the renewed repose of nature,
with a thousand mingled songs. Occasionally, a louder
peal of thunder, made the cottage tremble to its
foundation
,
and the hollow roar of the torrents, that the
shower had formed in the mountains, sounded like the
distant tones of an organ.
The young man was revived, by the cheering
freshness
of the atmosphere, and that balmy odour and
richness of the earth and the sky, after such a shower,
that every one has felt, and that so few have described.
We sat at the door of the cottage, looking abroad upon
the scene, and inhaling the breeze, too full at heart, and
too happy, at least two of us, for any thing, but silence
and interior enjoyment. We were aroused from our
pleasant reverie, by the rattling of the Conde's carriage,
as it drove towards the cottage. Martha turned pale,
as she discovered that we were thus recognised
together
.
There was no retreat. The family had not
known, that I was to visit there, and this meeting had
but too much the appearance of having been
preconcerted
on both sides. This appearance was
strengthened
by the evident perturbation in her face. Even
the countenance of the Condesa, as she came in, had
VOL. I. 17
an unwonted expression of severity, as she passed me
into the cottage. The Conde, the priest, and Don
Pedro
,
each reddened with undisguised resentment. The
physician was with them, and while he and the Conde
were examining the case of the young man, and the
Condesa was engaged in conversation with the widow,
Don Pedro requested me to walk abroad with him.
The very manner in which he made this request, was
an affront. However extraordinary the request, and the
manner in which he made it, I saw no reason why I
should decline. I foresaw, in fact, the course which
our conversation would assume. It did not contribute
to my composure, to remark, that his request had been
noticed by the Condesa and her daughter, and that
they were both, as I went out, as pale as death.
We were scarcely cleared of the cottage, before he
began in Spanish, for he was evidently in too much
perturbation, to speak in a foreign language. Sir,
it is full time, that you and I have an explanation. I
begged him to proceed, and tell me upon what subject.
You know too well, he replied, the subject I mean.
I have had good reason before to complain, but have
forborne, till your conduct is no longer endurable. I
find you here in company with Doa Martha. The
meeting is evidently preconcerted. When a young
lady of her rank and standing so degrades herself,
whatever may be her share of the fault and folly, I
shall consider you answerable for the whole. You are
perfectly aware of my right to interfere in the case.
You must be equally aware, that at this stage of your stay
in a family where accident has given you claims that
you seem disposed to prosecute to the utmost, seeking
opportunities of private interviews with that lady, must
be as unpleasant and offensive to her parents, as it is
affronting to me. You seem to have imposed upon
her gratitude, and subsequently, to have weakened her
reason and good sense, to the point of inducing her
to dishonor her noble name and family. The parents
have finally seen their error in allowing themselves to
be influenced by the foolish fancies of their daughter.
They propose a summary way of bringing this affair
to a crisis. But it is my cause, and I propose to take
it into my own hands. I wave all objections to you on
the score of birth, standing, and character. If you are
the undoubted chevalier, which you are estimated from
one fortunate adventure, you will meet me, and we will
decide our pretensions to the young lady in question,
in the proper way. If you refuse, she will at least see
the true nature of the heroism of her chivalrous and
heretical champion. You understand me, sir?
Yes, I answered, somewhat bitterly. Your
head, heart, and language are but too easily
comprehended
.
In the first place, sir, you have no right
whatever to tax me in this way. I respect myself too
much, and you too little, to vindicate myself, or obviate
your charges. I owe it to Doa Martha, however, still
more than to myself (for I would not reply to it on my
own account), to affirm on my honor, that no knowledge
of her intended visit here, induced me to come, and
that if I had known that she would have been here,
I should not have come myself. For the rest, sir,
whether I am brave, or a coward, it becomes not me
to say. It is contrary to my settled principles of right
and wrong, contrary to my religious, my heretical
principles
,
if you please, to fight a duel. No temptation
shall seduce me, no provocation goad me, to violate my
principles. Doa Martha, and every other person, will
think me chevalier, or not, as they choose. I will not
meet you in that way. Even upon your calculations,
in staking our lives on this issue, I do not estimate the
stakes to be equal. Whatever difference fortune has
made between us, I have always felt myself, I will not
say so much above you, but so different from you, that
all your attempts to insult me, have been, and are now
utterly unavailing.
This I said firmly, and in good set Spanish. It
seemed equally to rouse his confidence and his rage.
He seemed to have had some modest apprehensions
that I would fight him. When they were removed, his
insolence knew no bounds. He poured out terms
corresponding
to the words, poltron, coward, scoundrel, &c.
in rapid succession, and told me, that if he did not fear
the interference of the family, he would chastise me
with his cane on the spot. I was wholly unarmed, but
in bodily strength much his superior. I advanced near
him, and directly in front, eyeing him sternly, Sir,
said I, that is another affair. Nothing will provoke
me to be the aggressor, and nothing will make me swerve
from my purpose not to fight you. Attempt the least
personal violence, and, Sir, I have principles for that
emergency. Touch me, Sir, and you will know in a
moment the power of my muscles, and I have a
surmise
,
that one experiment would satisfy you for ever.
In his trembling hands, and in his pale face, and a kind
of impulse to retreat, I saw that he was not nerved to
the point of immediate contest. He retired, uttering
as he went, the terms loquacious coward, and
entered
the cottage, and the family soon after took their
leave. I entered the cottage, and repeated my offers
of watching and aid, received the affectionate and
cordial
thanks of the widow, and followed the carriage at
a distance.
On my return, I learned by Bryan, that Don Pedro
had been particular to have it known that he had
challenged
me, and that I had refused to fight him, And,
said he, God bless your Honor, but it has turned the
Conde's heart still more against you. Every tongue
wags upon the subject, but Martha's, and she, the jewel,
just turned her face, and looked t'other way. Every
body fights here, when he is asked. Ah! by St.
Patrick, had it been me, your Honor, that he had been
asking that way, he should have tasted my shelalah,
any how. I see clearly that your Honor has to leave
the family, and this business of learning them English.
May be, it is not your Honor's way of doing business.
Even the jewel herself would have liked you none the
worse, for giving that grim whelp a basting.
Thus I saw that even the kind heart of Bryan had
been carried away by their prejudices, and chilled
against me, for refusing to fight. You must be
perfectly
17*
aware, how strongly the current sets in the
southern
and western country against the young man, who
refuses a challenge. It is considered not only as the
touchstone of courage, but the test of all kinds of worth.
An unknown young man can hardly expect to sail
before
the full gale of public opinion, until he has been
known to have fought, or to have given a challenge.
A prejudice so brutal, pervades all classes of the
community
.
Even the few, who profess to act under the
influence of the Gospel, evidently grow cool towards a
person, after he has been known to have refused a
challenge. The same prejudice to the same extent
prevailed here. I no longer disguised from myself that
I loved Martha fervently, and with all my soul. I had
flattered myself that I was beloved in turn, and persons
at that time of life who love, and believe themselves
beloved, will conjure up visions of hope. Impossibilities
vanish before the buoyancy of youthful hope and love.
I knew her heart, and the excellence of her
understanding
,
and the correctness of her moral feelings.
But I knew, too, that the strongest minds never
completely
disentangle themselves from the ties of the web
of early associations and impressions. It was a
reflection
of unmingled bitterness, that I should, after all, be
banished from the palace, my pursuits, and Martha,
and be stigmatized as a coward; while the only
achievement
that I ever fancied I had performed, would be laid
to accident, and I be thought to retreat before the insults
of the acknowledged admirer of Martha, and my avowed
enemy from the first. I found it hard, and even
impossible
to tranquillize my feelings by recurring to my
principles
.
I thought, for this ride, with the admirable, but
vanquished and forsaken Brutus, O virtue, I have
worshipped
thee as a real divinity, and I find thee but an
empty name. It was not long that I chewed the cud
of these bitter fancies, before I retracted all my
infidelity
as to the doctrine, that Virtue is her own divine
reward. We rode on in silence, for even Bryan, having
given unequivocal vent to his feelings, and having said
his say, rode beside me in a kind of sullen silence.
As we approached the river, near the castle, the
twilight
was fast fading away. The carriage might be in
advance of us a third of a mile. I heard a loud and
mingled shriek of terror and distress. We put spurs to
our horses, and were on the banks of the river in a
moment. Our arrival was at a critical period for the
family. The carriage, and all that were in it, had been
carried away with the horses by the stream. The
coach-door was closed, and the Conde, his lady, and
their daughter were drowning, without the possibility,
as it seemed, of escape. The attendant servants on
horseback and the physician had crossed by swimming,
and were crying for help on the opposite bank. The
priest, with either a more reverend care for his health,
or with earlier foresight of the danger, had cleared
himself
of the carriage, and hung fast to the roof. Don
Pedro, too, had been in season to escape, and had
floated before the furious current, until he had seized a
long branch, which waved up and down, and sometimes
sunk him quite under the water. He and the priest
appeared to strive which should bawl most lustily for
help. Bryan did not want for energy, but he seemed
as one distracted. The physician and the servants, the
coachman and footmen, who were all safe ashore on
the opposite bank, answered to all these cries of
distress
by still louder shrieks, by crossing themselves,
telling their beads, and making vows to Our Lady of the
Pillar. I stripped myself to my pantaloons in a moment,
plunged into the foaming current, and found the
advantage
of having been an early and an expert swimmer.
The horses were already sunk and drowned, and the
carriage, impeded in its downward course by swinging
against a clump of small trees in the stream, just sunk
the party shut up in it, up to their chins, and sometimes
under water, according to the waving of the bushes.
The priest on the roof begged me for the love of God
and the Virgin, to give him the first deliverance. I
disregarded
his cries, and was obliged to dive in order to get
at the opening of the door. I soon rescued the Conde,
who was nearest the door, and who was not so
exhausted
,
but what he was able to swim ashore. I then drew
out the Condesa and her daughter, who both clung to
me at once, and I was in danger of being drowned with
them. I disengaged their hands, which they clasped
firmly upon each of my arms, and pushed them from
me at my arm's length. The Condesa and her
daughter
,
disengaged from me, clung to each other. I grasped
the robe of the mother with one hand, and with great
offorts contrived to waft them, almost unconscious and
half drowned, ashore. To some in my situation, it would
have almost furnished amusement to hear the lusty cries
of the two friends of mine still in the stream. As Don
Pedro seemed in the greatest danger, I purposed to
rescue him first. I rested a moment on the bank to
recover breath, and then plunged in. He had, as I have
remarked, enormous black whiskers. I remembered
his recent insults. I twisted my fingers in the curls of
his whiskers, by which I had the finest management
of him, and in this manner I fished this young limb
of the Spanish nobility safely from the stream.
The father alone remained perched on the roof, and
he was now apparently sinking. His cries of Help!
murder! I drown! were interrupted by loud and
earnest recitations of the
pater noster
, and prayers to
the Virgin. I took one end of a handkerchief, and
gave him the other to hold, and in this way I brought
him off safe. Horses and servants had already
conveyed
the father, the mother, and daughter to the house.
Don Pedro, exhausted with fear and the water he had
swallowed, was obliged to be aided to the house. The
priest had suffered in no other way, than by fright.
On the road to the house, I was informed that the
coachman drove the carriage down the usual ford. The
horses had been accustomed to pass it so frequently,
that they plunged into it, not observing that by the late
shower it had been swollen to a furious torrent. Just
below the usual ford, a bar, that reached across the
channel, fell perpendicularly into a broad and deep
basin. The horses were frightened with the unusual
fury and foaming of the current, and plunged, and were
immediately carried over the bar, and the disaster had
happened in this way.
The following morning I had a visit in my own
apartment
from the Conde before breakfast. He saluted
me gravely, and with great deference. You are an
astonishing man, said he; and if I believed in
destiny
,
I should be compelled to suppose that fate had
some how united the influence of your star with mine.
You may not have known that I have been suffering
among my best, in fact, my only friends, for retaining
in my family such a young man, a heretic, a republican,
of the same nation, and participating the same
sentiments
,
no doubt, with men, who are now united with
the rebellious creoles in an insurrection against my
government. I have vindicated your integrity. I have
indignantly repelled charges against you, as a dangerous
man. I have urged obligations of such a nature, as
could never be repaid. With respect to fears from
another quarter, they might be excusable in Don Pedro,
but I would hope, that nothing could ever influence my
daughter to do violence to her standing and religion,
by the thought of a mis-alliance. You have been made
aware, how incompatible we have considered your
nation
,
religion, and condition of life with mine. I feel it
necessary to be perfectly frank with you. I have
admired
your character, at the same moment that I have
entertained these views. I have suffered so much from
suspicion, my government having had to encounter
charges diametrically opposite, and the father and Don
Pedro have had so much to say against your residence
here, that I had yesterday, after seeing you with my
daughter at the widow's cottage, determined to break
with you, and dismiss you. I found, on inquiry of her,
that this meeting was merely accidental, and without
concert. Returning from that meeting, you have
triumphed
over us all again. We appear to be plunged
into danger, only to bring you to our rescue. It was a
noble return to Don Pedro for the insults of an hour
before
.
I owe you my life, in common with the rest. Even
the father admits, that he is ashamed to see you, after
what you have done for him. My wife and daughter,
God be praised, are quite recovered this morning.
Our proverb says, `that words are wind.' I am so
peculiarly situated, that I know not how to frame words
in which to thank you. If money could discharge my
obligations, and you would receive it, I would soon
wipe out the score. We all feel as we ought, and you
should place all our distrust of you merely to
circumstances
,
and our peculiar position. Shall I be still
plainer
?
My daughter probably feels too much, though, as I
have said, I have had no fears that either of you would
depart from the decorum expected from both. She is,
as you must see, my all, the apple of my eye. There
is not an alliance that fits us in all the government, but
that of Don Pedro. He is noble, rich, brave, loyal, a
colonel, high in the favor of this government, of the
same race and religion, in short, compatible in every
respect. I grant you to be worthy in the endowments
of nature, but I need not contrast you with him in some
of these particulars. My first object ought to be my
own fame and honor. The next dearest point on earth
is, to see my daughter united to Don Pedro, to continue
my race and honors, when I am no more. I put it to
yourself to weight these circumstances. These evil
times, upon which we are fallen, give them an
invincible
pressure at this time. It distresses me to tell you,
that I was forewarned of the result of permitting your
stay in my family. I flattered myself, that my daughter
would see all these things, as I see them. I perceive
that I mistook, from a blind confidence in her pride.
You have been too long and too intimately known to
her, for her repose. I acquit you, from my heart, of
every thing that is not perfectly correct and honorable
in your intercourse with her. But if you were to leave
us now, even after you have saved her a second time,
she is a woman, and you know,
semper varium et
mutabile
.
Time will operate upon her, as upon upon the
rest. The peace and honor of her and of my family
are now in your hands. I have tried you sufficiently
upon the score of compensation. I can offer you
nothing
,
and you must rest satisfied with the applauses of
your own noble heart. And in your own country,
which I believe to be, as you represent it, great and
rising, such a mind as yours cannot fail to find its place,
and meet its reward. Were you a royalist and a
Catholic
,
untitled, and without a
peso
, you should fight Don
Pedro, for I do not believe you want courage, and
you should be my son-in-law. I can only mourn, as it
is, your unchangeable perseverance, and leave you to
infer my wishes.
I have observed in such cases, that the first resolution
which offers, is ordinarily the right one; and that all
attempts to gain time for deliberation, are poor efforts
to throw dust in the eyes of conscience. The
undisguised
and frank admissions of the Conde placed the
straight course clearly in my view. I might regret as
bitterly as I would, the obstacles of prejudice, nation,
birth, wealth, and religion. But these obstacles were
not the less real, or unchangeable. My conscience
admitted even, that they existed every where. Though
I was not sharp-sighted enough to see the utility of
these things in the general system, I was not repining
enough to doubt that they have their advantages in the
order of things. I painfully felt that I loved Martha,
but I hope I might say, without boasting, that I loved
honor and duty more. I admitted, then, to him in
reply, that I had staid too long in his family, if not
for his daughter's peace, at least for my own; that I
was well aware of all the obstacles of which he had
been pleased to remind me, but that I was no swindling
adventurer to take advantage of his confidence and of
circumstances; and that I would repair my fault as fast
as possible, by leaving his family, and returning to my
own country, never, I hoped, to leave it again. I
assured
him, that my residence for even this short time
in his country, had learned me one great, practical
lesson, and that was, suitably to prize every thing that
appertained to my own.
He politely tried to disguise his joy at this
determination
,
and the old topic of compensation was resumed,
VOL. I. 18
and disposed of as formerly. I felt no unwillingness to
receive, under the name of salary, a sufficient sum to
enable
me to return to Santa Fe, and thence, with the party
that I came with, to my own country. I confess, that the
thought more than once flashed across my mind, of
joining
the patriots; but my only clear and fixed purpose was,
to return home. My departure was fixed to take place
in three days from that time, and I somewhat sternly
requested of the Conde, that during that interval, I
might not meet the members of a family, where I
seemed so dangerous, and that I might be served in my
own apartment. He appeared to feel much mortified,
at least he said much upon that point, that a person,
who had rendered him such signal services, should
seem to be driven, without compensation and almost in
disgrace, from his family. The father, he understood,
since the affair of the last evening, had felt more earnest
desires to converse with me on the subject of religion.
Possibly he might present views of the subject that had
never yet occurred to me, as I admitted that I was
very little acquainted with the points in dispute between
their church and ours. If I should yet see cause to
change my religion, all his views with respect to my
departure, might be reversed. He recommended to
me, to receive the father with a docile mind, and a
heart open to conviction. He promised to ascribe my
departure to motives most honorable to me, and to
notify
it to my other pupils accordingly, and then left me.
In these remote regions, and in establishments like
this, where the duties assigned to the different members
of the family are small, news flies with a rapidity,
unknown
in towns, where the people have important
pursuits
.
Every person in and about the house knew in
half an hour, that I was shortly to leave them. If I
might estimate my standing with these humble, but
amiable people, by attentions and demonstrations of
sorrow and regret, which must now at least be
disinterested
,
I had been a personage of no small
consideration
in the palace. These people are naturally
affectionate, and there was a strife among them, who
should render me most kindnesses. The affectionate
Bryan had tears in his eyes, when he brought in my
breakfast. God bless your Honor, said he, you
ought to kill the swaggering young Don, and instead of
that, you are going to break the heart of Martha.
Satan roast them all, but her. Don't you save their
lives, once and again, and drag out the young Don by
the whiskers, and the father, devil roast him! like a
drowning rat there, from the top of the coach, and
what do they do, but drive you out of the house, like a
mad dog? By Jasus! you have only to say one mass,
and scorch the whiskers of the young puppy, and you
will walk cock of the roost, after all. By St. Patrick,
your Honor, Martha is worth that much, and then I
will serve you for ever, and the day after. At any rate,
if you are wilful about saying the mass, as it is like you
may be, go where you will, if you will let me, I go with
you, and I have told them all as much. Certainly,
Bryan, said I, you can go with me, if you choose.
But I have been used to serve myself, and have no use
for a servant, and no means to maintain one; but if
you choose to connect yourself with my fortunes, I will
always do the best for you I can. That is all I
want, said he, and you shall see whether I am any
loss to you. As for money, Martha and her mother,
the kind souls, have taken care to provide for that case.
Martha says to me, `Go with him, Bryan;' and the
tears fell from her eyes, like rain; `and if you love
Martha, show it by being kind to him, and taking good
care of him.' And she put into my hand a bag, so
heavy, and full of doubloons, and she says, `Bryan,
put it in your trunk, and apply the money to his use,
for the sake of Martha and the holy Virgin.' So your
Honor sees, there is no want of money at all, at all.
After breakfast I took my accustomed walk, and in
the course of it was joined by father Josephus. His
manner towards me was wholly changed. The haughty
distance, with which he had hitherto treated me, was
converted into the most winning suavity, which he
knew so well how to assume. He reverted with the
politest expressions of thanks to the scene of the
evening
before, remarking, that he had now another motive
to wish my conversion, since he understood I was about
to return to the land of licentiousness and heresy, and
that his sense of right told him that the most worthy
return he could render me, for having saved his life,
was for him in return to attempt to save the life of my
soul. Do you feel docile, my son? said he. Can
you listen with an unprejudiced mind? Certainly,
holy father, I answered; I shall only ask as much
patience and teachableness from you, if I find any thing
to reply to your arguments? Listen, then, said he,
and I will condense my view of the subject as much
possible.
It is admitted by your teachers, that the holy
Roman Catholic church is that form of doctrine and
discipline, transmitted by Christ to his apostles. The
fathers were all of this church. No other was thought
of for a long succession of centuries. A few wild and
transient heresies, indeed, sprung up in different ages
of that period, but so wild, that they fell by their own
absurdity, or were dispersed before the wholesome
instructions
of our church, like `chaff before the wind.'
Our church was clearly and indisputably the church
universal, down to those times of ignorance, heresy, and
misrule, which you call the Reformation. We have,
then, the most appropriate sanction which can belong to
this awful subject, antiquity in our favor. Compared
with the age of our church, all your new-born heresies
are but as the prophet's gourd, the birth of a night, and
to die in a night. We have in our church the keys of
the kingdom, and of death and hell. Christ said to
us, `On the rock of this unchangeable church will I
build my church, and the gates of hell shall not prevail
against it.' When he thus laid the corner-stone of our
edifice, he gave the keys to St. Peter, to be transmitted
down through the church universal in the hands of the
holy father, as the lawful successor of St. Peter. He
opens, and no man shuts; and he shuts, and no man opens.
We are in no danger of your heresies and wild mistakes,
18*
for we have an infallible interpretation of the
scriptures
,
in the expoundings of an infallible church. Christ
promised always to be with this church to the end of
the world, to enlighten and guide it into all truth; and
the proof that this promise is always fulfilling, is, that our
church is, and has been one, entire, and identically the
same in all ages, countries, and conditions of the world.
The same prayers are recited, the same doctrines
taught, the same venerable rites solemnized in the
Vatican, in the Indies, the interior of Africa, in the
wildernesses of the new world; the same extreme
unction now infuses confidence, joy, and peace into the
departing soul of the obedient son of the church in this
day, as it did in the times of the first Christian
emperors
.
Thus we transmit a wholesome and unchangeable
doctrine, consoling sacraments, awful mysteries, and an
undivided faith from age to age. While the dying
penitent is uttering
Ex profundis
here, he knows that
hundreds of the faithful departing, of all languages and
climes, are uttering the same words, at the same
moment
.
What is the fruit of your self-styled Reformation?
A thousand sects of wild and gloomy fanaticism, with
names too barbarous to be translated into Catholic
Spanish and Italian. The very catalogue of your
heresies
is the most horrible vocabulary, that ever yet found
its way through the organs of speech. Such are the
fruits of a thousand ignorant and presumptuous founders
of sects, interpreting the scriptures for themselves, the
multiplication of sects upon sects, until, in the midst of
doubt, wrangling, and disputation, the great mass of
the people end in unbelief. Look, my son, at our
rites. How awful and imposing! See our priest giving
the consecrated wafer, and uttering the sublime words,
`Depart, Christian soul!' Behold the countenance of
the penitent, who feels all the tranquillity of pardoned
sin, brightening with faith, hope, and love, the moment
before it is rendered unchangeable in death. You object
to us the worship of images. We deny the charge,
and throw it back in the face of its inventors. We
venerate the Redeemer, and the Mother of God, and
the saints. We have preserved, by holy and primitive
painters, their countenances, as they were in the flesh.
Instead of reserving them for the private chamber, or
the cabinet alone, we place them in our churches.
We look at them, and our hearts are strongly called
out towards the archetypes of these dim resemblances,
that are in glory. We remember their toils and
temptations
along the same thorny path which we ourselves
are travelling. We contemplate the visages of the
holy pilgrims that have arrived at our home before us,
and we bedew these images with the tears of memory
and tenderness of heart. This is our worship of images.
You call us persecutors, and yourselves have
persecuted
,
as often as you have had power. Ask your
Quakers. Search the records of those times, when
superannuated
and broken-down old women were burned
as witches. Look at the church records of Geneva,
and, in fact, of every place where you have had power.
We grant you, it is right that the great Master of the
granary should sit in it with his fan in his hand, and
that the chaff should burn with unquenchable fire. The
true Catholic church never did, and never could
persecute
.
Whenever she has used a wholesome and
necessary
severity, it has been only to apply an energetic
medicine to a desperate case, to purge away the leaven
of heresy, and avail herself of that temporal sword,
which has been given her, to vindicate her own glory
and advantage.
I cannot follow, and it would be useless to follow
him in his long and labored harangue. In the same
spirit, he discussed and apologized for the decrees of
the councils, the protestant charges of corruption and
tyranny in the papacy, and in the religious houses, the
sale of indulgencies, the doctrine of purgatory, of the
real presence, and the other peculiar dogmas of the
Romish church. Sometimes his arguments were
ingenious
,
and his apologies and defences plausible.
Sometimes he availed himself of the most palpable
sophisms; as, for instance, he was an assertor of
infallibility
in the church universal, and not alone in the
Pope, the head of his church. I do not say, said
he, that any individual, or any portion of this church
is infallible. Every constituent member of the church
is fallible. But the whole, taken together, is infallible,
and so of the rest. He insisted most earnestly on the
patronage which the Catholic church had always
afforded
to genius, talent, investigation, and discovery, and
adverted to the great inventions, as having been
universally
of Catholic origin. He spoke of the
unequalled
advancement of the fine arts under the
fostering
care of Leo X. He summoned all his rhetoric,
and called in aid all his insinuation, in syllogizing one
grand ultimate maxim. You cannot but admit, and
your church does admit, that we may be right. You
know our grand maxim,
Point de salut hors de l'glise
,
`There can be no salvation out of the church.' You
admit, that there may be salvation in ours. Upon
your admitted principles, we are safe, and you are not.
My dear son, said he, who have yielded temporal
salvation to me, Oh! allow me to be instrumental in
the salvation of your soul. The Condesa and her
daughter pray for you, and wrestle with the saints and
the Mother of God for your conversion. No words
could describe the joy, which I should carry them,
could I inform them, that a wanderer, so dear to them,
was reclaimed, and brought home to the fold. There
is nothing, which you might not hope from their favor
and mine, and that of the country. You would yet
stay with us, and I should fold you to my bosom as a
son, `begotten in my bonds.'  I clearly saw, how
well he understood the weak points of human nature,
and the seductions, which would be most likely to
seize upon any unfortified part of the heart. In
addition
to his own entreaties in this peroration, he availed
himself, at the close, of all the trick of tears and
exclamations
.
On the whole, I inferred, that he had, according
to the proverb, two strings to his bow. If I were
dismissed, he seemed to feel, that he should make
enemies of the Condesa and her daughter, and rivet
the friendship of the Conde and Don Pedro, and that
the case would be reversed by my conversion. The
glory of adding an obstinate American heretic to the
church, appeared to weigh down the scale in favor of
desiring my conversion.
It was but right, to be grateful for such disinterested
concern for my soul, and I said as much to the father.
But, said I, in return, though I may not be able
with so much address, as you have shown, to follow
you through your whole discussion, you will allow me
to suggest the thoughts, which occurred to me upon
some of your positions. I shall take them up in the
scriptural arrangement; the last shall be first, and I
shall remark on your harangue from the end to the
beginning
.
My understanding and my heart equally
revolt
against that bigoted maxim,
Point de salut hors
de l'glise
. If I could believe such a maxim for a
moment
,
I should doubt at once, the wisdom, benevolence,
and mercy of the Universal Father. Neither has
your church alone the use of that miserable sophism,
which you build on that maxim. Among those sects
in our church, to which you have adverted with so
little courtesy, I believe nearly the half of them have
followed your church in shutting the gates of heaven
against all, but the staunch and devoted of that sect.
What a humiliating spectacle, to see a few beings, so
frail, so blind, so erring, as man, sitting down to scan
the purpose of the Eternal in a council, laying down a
few points of belief reduced to writing, and arrogating
to themselves to say, that every one, who does not
believe
what we have here written, will be damned. A
thousand pagan sects, are found to hold the same
maxim. Alas! it is but too deeply laid in the heart of
man, and each one of these pagan sects could urge the
same conclusion upon me and you, with the same force
as your church. Your syllogism would avail your
church, if you were the only church, that could make
use of it. Your church has patronized science, arts,
discoveries? Witness Galileo, compelled by the united
voice of the church, declared by its infallible organ and
head, the pope, to renounce on his knees the true
system
and philosophy of the universe, the glimpses of
which had dawned upon his mind. Witness the
proscribed
books, now interdicted in the region, where we
are, among which are the works of Locke and Newton,
not to mention numberless others, the most venerable
names that science records. The age of Leo X, I
grant you, was the age of painting and architecture.
But the march of events, the progress of the human
mind, and the accumulated tax, which bigotry had
extorted
from ages and nations, collected at Rome, and
squandered in a period, which your own writers admit
to have been the most abandoned that your church had
seen, would have produced the paintings of Raffaelle,
and the church of St. Peters, if the religion had been
that of Pagan Rome.
As it respects the persecuting spirit of your church,
I dare not trust my feelings for a moment to discuss it.
If our church has imitated yours in its worst features,
in the smallest degree, so much the less honor for it.
But, Sir, our persecution, to yours, is but a drop to the
ocean. Alas! Sir, I have read a description of an
auto-de-fe
,
by a member of your own church. Do I not
know, that to the most revolting hypocrisy, adding the
last refinements of cruelty, when you deliver over the
wretched victim to the secular power, to be roasted
alive! you charge that power `not to hurt him, even
so much as an hair of his head.' You cannot suppose,
that I have not read the history of the wretched
Albigenses
and Waldenses, inhabiting the mountains and
vallies of the Cevennes. Who of us has not heard the
manner in which you have treated the Huguenots?
Who of us has not read of the massacre of St.
Bartholomew
?
Our very children learn their rudiments from
a book, which presents in coarse but striking
representation
the burning of the venerable Rogers, his wife and
nine children looking on the dismal spectacle. I am
willing to believe, what I hear the liberal and
enlightened
laity of your church affirm, that with the advancing,
improved, and more merciful spirit of the age, your
church has remitted something of its sternness and
dogmatism. But an exclusive and arrogant spirit,
seems to have been so deeply interwoven with the
texture
of your church, that you cannot lay it aside. You
transmit it from country to country, and from age to
age. I have no dread of any church, that is not in
power. But I would not wish to see the renewed
experiment
of the universal power and influence of the
Catholic church, as it was in the twelfth and thirteenth
centuries, lest I should see the spirit of that age return
unbroken and entire. I should dread its ascendency in
any country. In its present form, I consider it a form
of worship, only adapted to the meridian of an absolute
despotism. We see it only displaying the properties of
an exotic, in my country. For the rest, Sir, trying
your dogmas on other principles, the idea of a God,
existing
in a morsel of pastry, offered in a thousand places
at the same time,a God, created by a priest, offered up
to himself, as a daily and universal sacrifice, and
expiation
of sin,is a dogma that I will not discuss, for I
respect
religion, and I have deep and fixed opinions of
my own upon the subject. Your church, you say, is
an infallible whole, made up of fallible parts, and this is an
axiom worthy of the church, that proscribed Galileo,
for broaching the true doctrine of the universe. Your
prayers to the saints, your purgatory, your bank of
merit, and other points of that class, it is unnecessary
to take into the account. We may lay them aside with
other unimportant points, upon which you have touched.
I am ready to confess, and regret, that other churches
have been corrupt, as well as yours, but in none other
can you find so many dark and scandalous records, as
in yours, at the time, when the sale of indulgenees was
authorized, and that change, which we call the
Reformation
,
commenced. I close, with questioning the
truth of the position, with which you began, the
antiquity
of the Catholic church, as it is now constituted.
Even were it correct, it would prove nothing or too
much. Paganism is almost as old as the creation. If
mere precedence in error proved any thing, your church,
VOL. I. 19
on this ground, would have to renounce its claims in
favor of Paganism. But error and falsehood do not
approximate towards truth, as they grow old. The
truth of yesterday's discovery is older than creation,
for it existed forever. But that enormous structure
of dogmas, and rites, and pretensions, and assumptions,
which was reared in the days of popes and antipopes,
when kings and emperors held the stirrup of the `one
infallible,' that had succeeded in putting down the other,
was, I believe, comparatively, of very recent date. I
have no objections to fine religious paintings in a
church. One thing in your church has my unqualified
praise. I admire the architecture of it, its dim
religious
light, its massive grandeur, as better adapted
to produce religious impressions, than ours. Neither
am I displeased with some of the imposing forms of
your worship. My heart subscribes to most of your
forms of prayer. Your church appeals, in my
judgement
,
too much to the senses; ours too much to the
intellect. A medium ought to be adopted on this point.
Could your church renounce its arrogant pretensions,
some of its absurd, impossible, and contradictory
dogmas
,
and yield something to the enlightened spirit of
the age, there is much in it that I admire. Had I lived
in the days of primitive Christianity, I should have
belonged
,
without doubt, to the Catholic church, as it
then was. But, as it now is, never. Gladly would I
gain the good will of the Condesa and her daughter.
But you would not induce me to prevaricate upon such
an awful subject, could you endow me, as the
inducement
,
with all the delights of Mahomet's fancied
paradise
.
My motto is, `I will hold fast my integrity, and
not let it go.' No man ever had his convictions
changed
by an
auto-de-fe
. It might operate to make a
man profess with his lips, what his heart detested. It
might operate to concentrate hypocrisy, and produce
more seeming ardor in the new convert, than in an old
proselyte. God can destroy or new mould the mind,
but, reverently speaking, Omnipotence itself cannot
make me believe against my impressions, and contrary
to my convictions. All avowals, that have been
extorted
by torture, or fear, or avarice, or ambition, could
have been only miserable prevarications. In the
simple
,
intellectual, and scriptural forms of my own
church, I have an entire confidence and respect. In
the regions where I was born, if any practical scale of
measurement, could be instituted, I have not a doubt,
that there is more regard to God, the sanctions of an
invisible world, and the real and stern requirements of
morality, in a single society there, than I have here
seen, in this whole region. We have been mutually
plain. I hope my frankness will be no more offensive
to you, than yours was to me. I have been bred to
respect the truth more than every thing else. You see,
Sir, what are my convictions, and whether I am not
likely to live and die clinging to that thing, which you
call heresy.
The father was, as I have said, a courtier,
accustomed
to control the expression of his feelings. But on
this occasion he could control neither his countenance
nor his words. It was obvious, that my frank reply
had stirred deeply his inward depravity. His face was
strongly marked with angry and vindictive feeling,
assuming
the form of outraged sanctity. Satan, avoid!
muttered he. I must relate to the Condesa and her
daughter, that this case is a most hopeless one. `Thou
art in the gall of bitterness, and the bonds of iniquity.'
Words and reasons on such as thee, are thrown away.
In this temper he left me. As generally happens in
these profitable logomachies, each party, in reporting
the result, claimed all the glory of a decisive victory,
and sung a
Te Deum
over his foiled antagonist.
In the course of the day I received a kind and
considerate
letter from the father of the Misses Benvelt,
whom I had repeatedly met at the house of the Conde.
He had impressed me from the first, as an amiable,
affectionate, and honest-hearted German. I had
understood
,
that he was universally beloved in Durango.
From his letter I inferred, that he too suffered from the
suspicion of being a republican, and he declared
himself
ready to act and suffer for the rights of man. It
breathed a strain of kindness towards me, and
something
like indignation for the treatment which, he had
understood, I had recently received in the family of
the Conde. He offered me, for the present, an asylum
in his noble house in Durango, and a most cordial
invitation
to come and stay with him there, and continue
the tuition of his daughters. The letter enclosed,
beside
a handsome gratuity, the amount of my bill up to
that time.
Soon after receiving this letter, I had a visit from
the father of my pupil, Dorothea, whom I had never
seen before. He was called Don Jos Manriquez, and
appeared to be a plain, bluff, soldier-like man, to whom
great wealth, and the custom of habitual deference had
given the habit of thinking, speaking, and acting,
without
the least reserve or restraint. He paid me my bill,
and made his own commentaries upon the manner in
which I had been reported to have been treated in the
Conde's family. He took care to let me be informed,
that he too was rich, noble, a Gauchupine, and
accustomed
to consult nobody's judgment, but his own. An
acquaintance of his from a neighbouring town, had
recently
converted all his estate into cash, had loaded a
number of mules with bullion, and escaped to the
United States. He was anxious to act in the same
way, and avoid the chances and dangers of a revolution,
which he anticipated.
With very little circumlocution, he let me into the
flattering secret, that his daughter had taken a
particular
fancy to me, so strong, in fact, that she was willing
to surrender to me, on the simple condition of becoming
her husband, her fair person, and the probable
reversion
of her immense fortune. In short, said he,
that matter once settled, there would be no disputes
about property. This daughter is my all; and
whatever
is mine, not only in the order of time, will be hers,
but I should have nothing separate from my son-in-law,
even now. I discovered that he had been many years
stationary, and had become indolent and timid, and in
19*
wishing to fly to the United States with his wealth, he
wanted some person, in whom he could have
confidence
,
to go before him in the expedition. He had
fixed his eye upon me, as a suitable person in this
point of view, and to this motive, together with his
habitual custom of being swayed by the wishes of his
daughter, I owed the very extraordinary and flattering
proposition, which he now made me.
In placing inducements before me, to incline me to
his purpose, he took care to inform me, that his was not
a solitary case; that a certain Mr. Bradburn, a fine
looking young man from the States, had recently
passed
through the country, and that, during a temporary
residence at Durango, he had engaged the affections
of a wealthy young Spanish lady, who took care to
have him duly apprised of the premises; that he had
accepted the offer, had married the young lady, and
was now living happily with his bride in an
adjoining
province. His daughter, he remarked, was much
wealthier than the young lady in question, and had
property enough for us both. Whimsical and singular
as were his views of things in other respects, it was
clear that he had no small degree of cleverness in
dressing up his proposition in a manner to render it
tempting to a person much more eligibly settled than
I was. Had I been a mere speculator, an adventurer,
whose only object was to establish myself in the world,
imagination could hardly have pictured a more tempting
offer. No restrictions were coupled with the proposal,
such as had been in the parallel example, which he
had quoted, in which the young man was obliged to
turn Catholic, and remain in the country. The very
proposition to me was, to carry my bride and all her
wealth, to any part of the United States which I should
fix on. Apart from the vast fortune of Dorothea,
she was far from being unattractive, either in person
or manners. She could dance the fandango, and play
the guitar with the best; and under particular
circumstances
of feeling, complexion, and dress, she was at
times even beautiful. Besides, her undisguised partiality,
which she had taken no pains to conceal almost from
the first of our acquaintance, was very flattering to the
feelings of a young man. She was rather haughty, it
is true, in her manners, but promised to be a person,
whom kindness would easily mould to my wishes.
The vision flashed across my mind, of returning with
my bride, dizened with lace and jewels, to my native
village. I well knew that my father's family and
myself
had our rivals and our enviers there. What a
delightful thing it would be, to confound them with all
our undisputed wealth and grandeur! But, besides that
I had always had a fixed detestation of marriages
merely
mercenary, I was abundantly shielded from temptation
by other feelings, of sufficient energy to exclude the
slightest inclination towards these proposals. But there
was a very unpleasant difficulty in the way of making
known my feelings to my visiter. He seemed to have
taken it for granted, when he made me the offer, that
it was one so entirely flattering, and of advantage so
unmixed, that there was no place for hesitation. I
blundered through the best apologies which I could
possibly invent, while I declined his very flattering and
tempting proposals. I had the satisfaction to see, that
though very much suprised, he did not seem offended.
It occurred to him, he said, that different people saw
things in different lights, and that his daughter was of
a character, intrinsically too frank and noble to have
degraded herself by offers of the kind, although they
had been refused.
To M. de Benvelt I returned thanks for his
politeness
,
and as I had always had no small degree of
fraternal
regard towards his amiable daughters, and had
considered
him a man in feeling, intellect, and character,
every way different from the rest, I informed him,
that, for the time during which I should sojourn in
Durango
,
I would trespass on his hospitality.
Early in the morning of the day before that in which
I proposed to leave the family of the Conde, the duea
brought me a written card from the Condesa,
requesting
me, at any hour in the afternoon that I should
name, to meet her and her daughter in her chamber,
to which the duea would conduct me. I sat down
to write a reply. She placed her plump and
laughing
figure before me in the chair, and filled every
moment
with incessant chatter about me and her dear
mistress, harping continually upon the strain, how
confidently she had hoped, that the father confessor
would have converted me; that if I could only have
gotten from the holy Virgin a heart a little more
tractable
,
I might have remained in spite of all, and married
her dear mistress; and that she, for her part, as she
told her mistress, longed to see what beautiful children
would be, where husband and wife were both so
beautiful
.
She let me know, in her way, that she thought
that people ought to have complexions rather brown,
in order to be good Catholics, for that the Misses
Benvelt, who were fair, like me, were none too firm in
the faith, and that she was afraid her mistress was
rather too fair to be a good Christian; that had she
been a young man, like me, she would have changed
her religion three times in a day, to gratify the wishes
of so sweet a girl as her mistress. Now, said she,
you love her, I will swear it, by Our Lady of the
Pillar. I know it, by the very turn of your eye. I
have told my young lady as much. And now, in a
mere freak of wilfulness, because you will not have the
advantage of a mass for your soul, you are going to
part from each other, both of you to be
brokenhearted
.
I had never expected to meet Martha again, and
had fortified my mind to this belief. I had said of the
parting, with the royal sufferer, Surely the bitterness
of death is past. But the thought of parting from
her, whose image was engraven on my heart, and was
so intimately associated with all my day and night
dreams, was so painful, that I embraced the prospect
of one more interview with her, as a condemned
convict
receives a reprieve at the place of execution.
And yet it would be only to go over all the bitterness
of looking for the last time again on a countenance so
dear. As I had fairly passed through the thing once,
I sometimes thought it would be best to inform her,
that it would be unadvised for us to meet again.
But I returned an affirmative answer to the request
of the Condesa. I had been flattered with
possessing
the philosophy of patience. I now saw how
unjustly
that poor virtue had been ascribed to me. My
pulse bounded with fever heat and rapidity, and I looked
at my watch every ten minutes. When at last the
duea arrived, to conduct me to them, I was obliged to
moderate my joy, by saying, that it was probably for
one poor half-hour, and all would be past again, and I
should be just as desolate as before.
Both the mother and daughter were pale when I
entered, and the solemnity of a funeral was in their
countenances. After all that you have done for us,
said the Condesa, I felt willing to indulge my
daughter
in this parting interview, though I fear it had been
better for both, that it had not taken place at all. It
would be alike useless, and contrary to my feelings, to
attempt to disguise from you, who understand it all
very well, the state of things here. I still cherished
some latent hopes, only half indulged, that the father
might give us some hopes, that you might one
day conform to our church. That hope is not only
past, but the father pronounces you inveterate and
incorrigible in your opinions, and so bitter in your
feelings in regard to our worship, as to be altogether
dangerous to be allowed intercourse with the faithful.
It is true, the force of truth extorts from him the
admission
,
that he believes you would not violate your
given word, or attempt to make proselytes, after you
had pledged yourself not to do so. I regret, that
you could not manage the father a little; and yet
that stern independence, that fearless regard to your
principles, even though wrong, is a trait that we well
know how to appreciate. It seems fated, that you
you must leave us, and, it is probable, for ever. I feel,
and the Conde feels, that we are on the summit of a
volcano. He well knows, that we are surrounded by
enemies on every side. How much we need some
one like you, to be always with us! I am happy to
see, in the decided manner in which you act on all
those points, where a little forbearance or concealment
might have changed the face of things here, that the
pain and the regret of parting is all on our side. Had it
been otherwise, you certainly might have indulged
yourself
innocently in courses, which would have silenced your
enemies, and admitted of your staying. I answered,
that I had least of all expected from her, intimations
that it was possible for an upright man to conceal or
keep back any thing in a position like mine. The
temptations to do this, powerful as they were, I had
overcome. I am not conscious, I continued, that
I did not treat the father confessor respectfully. I had
the same right to be plain with him in regard to his
faith, as he had with me in regard to mine. I was
willing to exercise mutual forbearance. I was
reluctant
as to the interview. You must be sensible, that
I have no obligations to the father. The gracious
manner which he saw fit to assume on that occasion,
was as little pleasing to me, as his constant distance,
I may say rudeness, has always been before. You can
never know, Madam, nor will honor allow me to reveal,
what I suffer in parting from some of the members
of this family. But even to gain their favor, were it
not like boasting, I would say to gain heaven itself, I
would neither conceal or prevaricate, on the score of
my religious principles. Well, daughter, said the
Condesa, our time is spending; if you wish, as you
said, to utter your final thanks and adieus, let us not
prolong the pain of this parting.
You are right, Sir, returned Martha, right even
in your firmness, or, as the father would call it,
obstinacy
.
I earnestly wished, that your convictions might
have yielded to the arguments of the father; and yet,
such are the contradictions of the heart, had you done
it, my estimation of you would have been lowered.
Our principles ought to be engraven on the heart. I
respect a well-principled perseverance, even in the
wrong. But are we sure, my mother, that the
sentiments
of this man are wrong? Who hath given to one
party the power to make an unerring decision? If
conduct
be a test of principles, who devotes himself so
readily? Who is it that neither considers nor spares
himself in the moment of danger? The very point,
upon which he has been so much abused, refusing to
fight Don Pedro, and which was so readily placed to
other motives, was, I doubt not, a sacrifice of feeling to
principle. Oh! if the other had something of the real
courage and character of this man! But I forget, Sir,
that you are present. It was in kindness that you saved
me from perishing in the waters. Would that I had
died, for my heart is insupportably heavy, at the thought
of this parting. I surely wish you all good things, and
yet I am so selfish, I could wish that you had some
share with me in this pain of parting. As she said
this, the tears, which had been repressed by strong
effort, flowed freely, and the face of the mother was
covered.
After a moment's pause, and apparently a successful
effort at composure, she resumed. This, then, is the
last time I see you on the earth? But, young as I
am, I have seen that it is the course of every thing
below; disappointment, vexation, misery, the bitterness
of parting; and it is death only, that brings repose.
Be it so. I will wait patiently for that grand cure. I
still flattered myself that, some how, things might
be otherwise. But it is good for me early to pull
down with my own hands my fairy palaces; and I
submit
.
Go, and be elsewhere, and to others, the same
excellent young man, that you have been to us. May
no other luckless girl feel as I do, at parting from you.
My future life will be consecrated to remembrance.
Why should I wish you to retain a remembrance of
me, as painful as mine of you? Go; forget me, and
be happy. But I can never forget you. I will
remember
you, to devote myself for others, as you have
done for me.
VOL. I. 20
And is this the way, I asked, to send me away
happy? Is this the way, Dona Martha, to fortify me for
this parting? I had been thankful, if you had sent me
away with reproaches. I might have recalled
reproaches
or indifference in aid of efforts to forget, when away.
I intended that nothing should have wrung from me
confessions, which may be harmless, as things are
now, but are utterly unavailing. Why should I reveal
feelings, against which I have honourably struggled,
but with so little effect? It has been matter of sport
with me in the case of others, the agonizing sensations
which I have so long experienced, and I expiate my
offence by enduring, in all its bitterness, the malady
which I have often scoffed at as an unreal evil, the origin
of
ennui
, or of pampered weakness. There is but one
motive, for which I would wish to live. You shall hear
of me again. Your father has reminded me, once and
again, of my condition, and of my obscurity. You shall
hear that I have gained glory, not, perhaps, in the way
in which you would have chosen that I should gain it.
But I will gain glory in the way of my principles, and
your hearts, in the end, shall be compelled to approve
the course I take. My pole-star shall be your image.
My talisman shall be the word,
Martha
. That word
shall excite me to daring. That word shall give me
patience
for toil. Heaven avert the omen, that you should be
again in danger. But it may be, that you may hear from
me again, and in the time of your greatest need.
But I ought not to tire you with these details, which
after-circumstances have consecrated to delightful
remembrance
,
but which must always be tedious to parties
less interested. The silky-milky adventures of this
sort ultimately led, as you will hear, to important
results
;
and however they may seem to you in the
relation, were no joke to us at that time. However
that may be, it grew to be a scene, before it was over.
I saw plainly enough, that the high-born and
high-spirited
young lady was completely subdued, and manifested
her feelings without control. We parted a great many
times, and had a great many last words and adieus, and
protestations and tears, and avowals of hatred of Don
Pedro, and declarations of unalterable love, and
assurances
that I should be taken at my word, that they
should hear from me again. The mother dissolved the
meeting by making an effort, and leading her daughter
away.
It would be difficult for me to recall the remembrance,
still more difficult for me to describe the desolation of
heart, which I felt, when I had retired to my own
solitary
apartment. I looked at the books which we used
to read together, and the door through which she used
to enter for her recitations, and the apartment, and the
whole earth, and all the future assumed to me a
funereal
gloom. The gloom and distress of my countenance
were transferred to the honest and affectionate Bryan,
who begged that he might accompany me wherever
I went. I placed before him all the comforts which he
was leaving, shelter, security, a bed, daily fare, and
membership in a respectable family. I pointed out the
uncertainty and precariousness of my own prospects.
But nothing would dissuade him from his purpose.
Besides, said he, have not I promised the jewel,
her own sweet self, and sworn by St. Patrick and my
mother, that I will never leave you? And do you think,
she didn't ask me to repeat to him the name of Martha
sometimes. May be, your Honor, as I know the ways
of the family, I can slip a little bit of a letter backwards
or forwards, as occasion may serve. But as to drive
me away from your Honor, I have sworn an oath upon
my soul against it.
It appeared, that my departure made a great
sensation
in and about the house, for every servant came up
to say
A Dios
, and to ask something by way of
souvenir
,
as is the custom among them. Among the rest, came
the duea, apparently staggering under the weight of a
trunk, covered with shagreen. I assisted her to take it
from her head, and when she had set it down, even
her joyous face was sad She crossed her arms over
her breast, and exclaimed, What a terrible affair this
love makes! More's the pity, that two people so made
for each other, should be separated. I will swear to
Our Lady of the Pillar, that if I had any voice in the
business, you two should not be parted. See, I have
brought you something from the young lady and her
mother. I know not what it is, but they say they will
consider it unkind in you not to accept it. Surely you
will not hurt them by sending it back. My poor young
mistress, she has done nothing but weep ever since she
heard that you were to go. And when Don Pedro
speaks to her, what a look she gives him! She has
gone to her couch, weeping, with the head-ach, poor
thing. Some folks are over wilful; but I see, that if
they insist upon her marrying Don Pedro, they will
only kill her, after all.
I found the trunk to contain an assortment of the
finest articles of a traveller's apparel, complete changes
of dress of the richest texture and workmanship, neatly
marked, and arranged for immediate use. At the
bottom
was a small cabinet, exquisitely wrought, and inlaid
with pearl. From its prodigious weight, I could
calculate
its contents. It was filled with gold coins; a
repeating gold watch, brilliantly set with diamond
ornaments; and, what I valued far more than all the
rest, a letter which I knew, from the firm and neat
Italian hand, to be from Doa Martha. I give it in
English, just as it was written, and perhaps no
unfavorable
sample of her progress in the language.
To Seor Francis Berrian, Esq., from the
Anglo-American
States
.
Sir,This being the first letter which I have written
to my instructer in English, you will not expect much
correctness. My heart is too heavy, to allow me to
think of that. My mother and I have thought it not a
wrong thing, to send you, as a traveller, dear to us
both, and parting from us, the little matters contained
in this trunk. They may be of use to you. To us,
considering the dangers of the times, and our condition,
even if Providence had not given us abundance, they
could be of none. Some part of each of the articles
20*
of dress was wrought with my mother's needle and
mine. The cypher on the back of the watch is my
mother's hair and mine united. She has always been
your friend, and for her sake, if not for mine, you will
value it. When you look at the hours, assure yourself
that, however swiftly and pleasantly yours may pass,
mine will be anxious, heavy, and, as your poet says,
`Slow as the stealing progress of the year.'
The rest was dug from those mountains near us, which
you have so much, and so often admired, and may
remind
you, when you are far away, that they still lift
their heads in unalterable grandeur, and repose above
our mansion, and remind me of the thunder-storm that
came over their blue summits, in the progress of which
storm, I admitted, for the first time, that I loved. It
would be all dross to me. But in the selfish and cruel
world, through which you have to make your way, they
may be of use to you. You will not, surely, refuse
these trifling matters from a simple and confiding young
lady, whose life you have twice saved, and who would
be glad of some little memorial in return. You need
have no scruples, for my father not only approved, but
suggested the offering. With all that you have done
for me, I remember but few words of distinguished
kindness that you have said. I could wish I could
remember
more. You will not be so cruelly proud, as
to determine to have all the obligation on your side.
I know not, but you may remember me as forward or
foolish in my affection. I have driven away that bitter
apprehension, by saying it is the last opportunity I shall
have to humble myself in that way.
Martha
.
The only token of remembrance which I was capable
of returning, I made up into a package. It was composed
of neat stereotype editions, in duodecimo, of our first
poets, the same which I brought with me from New
England. On the package, was the following letter.
Doa Martha,
I have none of that cruel pride, which would incline
me to refuse what has been so kindly sent me. The
articles derive a value from the feeling with which they
were sent, superior even to their intrinsic utility and
beauty. I am possessor of too little, to make you any
adequate return. You have loved our poets, and I
have aided you to understand them. When you look
into these volumes, besides opening to you their
magnificent
and delightful creations, they may remind you,
that before I knew you, they were all my treasure, the
only thing I cared for. Much as you are used to
homage
,
and much as you even merit, even you can
receive
but all. You say, that I have said to you `but
few words of distinguished kindness.' Surely you
know, dear Martha, that strong and deep emotions are
apt to be silent. Those brilliant eyes look too deeply
into the heart, not to have seen what was at the bottom
of mine. If I have not given utterance to my feelings
i is because words were too poor to do it, or because
timidity, or respect, or honor, or all of them united
forbade the use of them. While on the contrary, all
your expressions of gratitude for my poor services, all
the considerate kindness of your generous nature,
might be uttered to me without hazarding self-respect
or dignity. They were always viewed by me as
the condescensions of a mind, intrinsically as elevated,
as your rank and condition. What in me would have
been arrogance, or violation of confidence, in you was but
the expression of benevolence, that wished to satisfy me
with myself. I shall look on the watch, without
needing
the bright tress on its back, to remind me of the
lovely head from which it was shorn. I am sure, too,
that I shall be sufficiently aware of the heaviness of the
hours, without watching the progress of the
secondhand
.
But it shall impress one useful lesson. I will
ask, How would Martha wish me to employ the hours?
Time, in this view, will become a consecrated thing.
You will beneficent from your own nature, and you
will be beneficent in exalting my aims, and causing me
to be so. The continual, tender, and mournful
remembrance
of you, will be to me, as an invisible and
guardian
spirit, ever present to render me such as I should
be.
I sent the letter and package, made my little
arrangements
for the morrow's journey, threw myself on
my couch, and would gladly have quieted the
tumultuous
tide of my feelings, and the feverish throbbings of
my heart, in repose, as deep as that of the honest
Bryan
,
who snored on a mattress at my side, in tones, that
would not have discredited a bassoon. But the pensive
Young, knew the character of the sweet restorer,
and how readily on her downy pinions, she flies from
wo. I made a painful effort to detach my mind from
present objects. I applied a remedy, which I had
seldom
found to fail. I took up a dull book, and began
to read. I repeated the
pater noster
, again and again.
But my ear still caught the heavy palpitations of my
own heart. I arose and dressed myself, determined to
spend the night in wakefulness, since sleep fled from
me. The madness, if not the inspiration of the muse,
came over me. The following copy of verses, which
had at least the advantage of being beautifully
transcribed
,
were the fruit of my vigils, and were left with
the duea for her mistress. Many a young lady in
love, I dare say, has admired poorer verses.
TO MARTHA.
'T is in vain, that the stoic has taught,
That to triumph o'er passion is wise;
Could we learn how to fetter the thought,
We might come even love to despise.
But alas! I have studied in vain,
And I find, though I find it too late,
That to yield for a moment the rein,
Is to yield ourselves up to our fate.
I was blithe, as the shepherd in May;
But the smile on my cheek is no more.
With the cheerful I strive to look gay,
But I feel that the season is o'er.
I have heard the fond lover complain,
And have scoff'd at his doubts and his fears;
But, methinks, could I meet him again,
We should mingle our sighs and our tears.
It was folly too fondly to dwell
On a moment I ne'er can forget;
But alas! I have treasur'd too well
The fond look that o'er-cancell'd the debt.
And again I would rush to the strife,
Could I hope for another so sweet;
Again I would offer my life,
Could I pour that life forth at her feet.
Let me fly from the charm of her eye,
Too long it has lur'd me to stay;
Shall I linger, a victim to die,
When 't is Honor that beckons away?
Forbid it, my manhood and pride!
Forbid it, my love and despair!
All the rest I might learn to deride;
But her scorn I never could bear.
May the saints she is wont to implore,
For her sorrows still furnish the cure;
May the Virgin she kneels to adore,
Sweetly smile on a being so pure!
And perhaps she may think, with a sigh,
When this heart from its throbbings shall cease,
That I knew how to love and to die,
To find the sole refuge for peace.
A cart had been ordered by the Conde, to carry my
little baggage to Durango. I had arranged with Bryan
to have my own horse, and that which I had won from
the young savage, saddled, and my portmanteau ready,
before the stars should have disappeared from the sky
in the morning. I had taken a civil
cong
of the Conde
the preceding night. I hoped to be off in the morning,
without being seen by any of the family. The cool
and invigorating air of the early morning, counsels
decision
and firmness of heart. It is the time for a lover
to take his flight. I would be away before the
matin-song
of the red-bird, and the nightingale-sparrow uttered
notes in accordance with my feelings, and breathed the
melting strains of tenderness and love. We were not
as early as we hoped to be, and as I descended amidst
the dews, under the shade of those noble sycamores,
where I had so often seen the light figure of Martha in
her morning promenades, the birds were already
twittering on every branch. I looked up to the open
windows of my peaceful apartment, and sighed my
adieu. We rode slowly and silently down the lawn,
and the ruddy streak of advancing morning was
broadening towards the zenith. I was just beginning
to congratulate myself, that we were likely to clear the
vicinity, without any of those last words and parting
recognitions, that in such cases are to me exquisitely
painful. Another pang was still in reserve for me.
Just on the margin of the stream at the ford, and
precisely
at the point where I had rescued them both from
the water, I saw the Condesa leaning on her daughter's
arm. I was obliged to pass them, and of course could not
do it without a salutation. I gave my horse to Bryan,
and went to meet them. Martha was dressed with more
richness and brilliance than I had ever seen her affect
before. A blaze of diamonds in her head-dress, only
served to render the contrast of unwonted paleness and
anxiety spread over her countenance more striking. The
general spirit of her eye, amounting, as I have
remarked
,
almost to haughtiness, had given place to languor,
almost resembling disease. The usual salutations on
all sides were heavy and embarrassing, and Martha
seemed to have slept the preceding night, no more than
myself. The Condesa regretted, that any
circumstances
should have rendered it expedient that we
should take so early a start; but, she said, Bryan
had told us, that you intended to be off by the light of
the stars. Martha took a severe cold, when you
rescued
us from the water here, and has been ill from
that time. Having been restless through the past night,
she thought the cool air of the morning might refresh
her, and our morning walk naturally brought us to this
place, so associated with the remembrance of you; and
we are here to witness your final departure from us.
I observed, in reply, that my eagerness to be off so
early, could not be construed to arise from any wish to
leave friends so dear, and that she must put it to the
right motive, a desire to avoid the pain of another
parting
.
It is wrong, now, interrupted Martha, that two
good persons, who feel towards each other as you do,
should occupy this sad moment, and in this place too,
with mere words of cold ceremony, that mean nothing.
I wish to detain you, Sir, but one moment, with a
simple
question. Affirm, or deny, and I will believe all
you say, as though it came straight from Heaven. I
blush to admit, that I listen to the idle prattle of
servants
.
But it is circulated in our family, that, in
resentment
to my father, or from other motives, you are going
to reside in Durango, and are to marry either Dorothea
or the elder Miss Benvelt. I have already sufficiently
the credit of being love-lorn and woe-begone. I am
weak, or selfish, or whatever you please to call it, to such
a degree, as to hope it may not be so. Just say is it so,
or not, and I will not detain you another moment?
Certainly, I have no such thought, answered I. I
should have supposed, that Doa Martha would have
done more justice to the efforts, which she must have
seen me making to suppress my feelings, than to
suppose
me capable of such a rapid transition, as either of
these suppositions must take for granted. I have thought
of staying a couple of days in Durango, in the house,
and at the invitation of M. de Benvelt, in order, if
possible
,
to obtain a little more tranquillity, and to arrange my
plans for the future. The thought has not occurred to
me, of marrying either of the parties, even if their own
consent were first obtained. See now, said she;
that slanderer, Don Pedro affirmed that you were
offered the hand and fortune of Dorothea; that you
had, as a mere fortune-hunter, accepted it; that no
young man from your country would ever suffer such
an opportunity to make a fortune, escape him. Besides,
it was confidently reported by all the domestics. I
thank you. You have removed a weight from my
mind. As she said these words, I remarked, that her
voice became faint, and that her lips and her cheek
were blanched to the whiteness of her muslin robe.
She leaned on her mother's arm, and I involuntarily
advanced towards her. She put her hand to her head,
as if for recollection, and feebly added, I had a word
more to say to you, but, mother, I must sit. I saw that
she was fainting, and I received her unconscious in my
VOL. I. 21
arms. I instantly bore her to the stream, filled the
crown of my hat with its limpid and cold water, and
poured it on her face. My first efforts to recover her
produced only spasms, and not restoration. The
shrieks of her mother soon summoned a host of the
Conde's people, and among them himself and Don
Pedro, to the spot. The daughter had begun to
recover
,
and was sitting on the sward, smelling to the
volatile
salts, which her mother was holding to her, and I
was rubbing her temples.
The Conde approached me, and with a voice of
furious
sternness, bade me be gone, while he ordered the
servants to convey his daughter to the house. This
is too much, Sir, said he, turning to me. You are
determined to make a scene of every thing. My weak
wife, and weaker daughter, may have consented to
this interview, after you had taken a formal leave of us
all. But you are watching your chances to kill my
daughter, forsooth, because you have saved her life.
You seem to wish, that your triumph over her
understanding
may become conspicuous to every member of
my establishment. Go, Sir, and know, that by this
deportment, you have relieved me from the load of
obligation, and cancelled the debt. We learn, that you
have an appointment with M. de Benvelt. Know, Sir,
that he is proscribed as a traitor. A traitor he has
been all along. For we learn, that he has long since
transferred his property to Great Britain, and thus he
has avoided confiscation. He escaped yesterday, to
join the rebels in their den of treason on Mixtpal
mountain
.
If he should be overtaken, he dies an honorable,
but immediate death, by the spear. Certain
considerations
prevent your arrest, and had you left me without
this last interview with my wife and daughter, I might
still have retained confidence in you. But it is too
evident, that you seek these opportunities. He who can
be treacherous in one instance, can in another. I am
now perfectly aware, that I have been the dupe of your
artifices too long.
And I, too, cried Don Pedro, have my
grievances
,
and I would cancel all my obligations to you on
the spot. But it is more humane, to allow you to fly.
The Conde allows you twenty days, within which to
escape from the
provincias internas
. If you are
afterwards
found in them, you will be considered as any
other traitor and rebel, and be treated accordingly.
Go, added the Conde, catching the rage of the
furious young man. Your associates from the
Commanches
have joined the rebels. A horde of assassins
from your country are pouring in upon the frontiers.
It is fitting that you should be among them. Treason
is the sport of the people from the States. You ought
to be among them. But warn them, Sir, that they will
have a reekoning with me and Colonel Arredondo.
I will promulgate the law for rebels and traitors at the
point of the spear. I will read them lectures upon their
newfangled patriotism in letters of blood. I waited
until he had come to a stop, in perfect coolness. The
foolish transports of these two men, who seemed willing
to avenge in me the crimes of the insurgents, restored
to me perfect self-possession. Said I, Gentlemen, it
is the business of soldiers to fight, and not to fret, and
scold, and call names, like old women. I feel
somewhat
superior to you both. I explained to you one
meeting with the Doa Martha, when I fished you out
of the water. I saw her yesterday, in consequence of
a special invitation from the Condesa. I have the
card yet. Here it is, Sir. Madam will inform you,
that I started very early this morning, in order to
preclude, if possible, any chance of meeting any
member
of your family. The meeting was accidental,
unexpected
,
undesired. Your daughter fainted. I aided
her, and should do it again in the same case. I have
thought of the cause of the Patriots before. The only
impression that has hindered me from studying their
motives, and if I found them pure, from joining them,
has been, that I was unwilling to be in arms against
the government of Doa Martha's father. Your
outrages
have severed that tie. I am a patriot from
principle
.
If there be such a rising as you describe, and
headed by honest men, I will join it. Should I ever
meet with you in hostile array, my hand would only be
raised to defend you. But for you, Don Pedro, nothing
would please me more, than to meet you face to face
in the high places of the field, and where no
compunctious
visitings would hold back my arm. I hope we
shall meet again.
A Dios
, to you both. I mounted,
and Bryan moved to do the same. Stop, there,
cried the Conde. Go back, sir. You belong to me.
There is no reason why I should send another traitor
to the rebels. Dismount, and go back to the house.
And you, Sir, added he, turning to me, would be
arrested, and in the mines, without a passport. There
is one, made out for you in full form. It will last you
to the frontier, and for twenty days, and no more.
Within that time you can join the rebels at Mixtpal,
or leave the country, as you please. There is your
other horse, Sir; the time is precious, and I wish you
a good day.
CHAPTER VI.
Paulo grandiora canamus.
Que grandes poblaciones, Que immensos chapiteles
Fabricamos de suenos, Sobre esperanzas breves!
What brilliant towers, what airy spires of hope,
We rear with the material of a dream!
I HAVE been thus far the hero of my own story.
However insipid my adventures may have been to you,
they are material to preserve the thread of my story.
You will find for the time to come, my fortunes in some
sense identified with the patriots, to whose cause I
joined
myself in their incipient efforts at emancipating the
great Mexican republic. You will find them
consummated
in the ultimate and successful accomplishment of
a revolution, which has wrested this great and fair
portion
of the American hemisphere from a miserable and
blighting despotism, exercised over it by the most
bigoted
,
ignorant, and unprincipled tyrant, that perhaps
ever swayed the Spanish sceptre. Before I take that
brief retrospect, which the order of events will compel
me to take, that I may give some little idea of the rise
21*
and termination of this great revolution, so far as I am
connected with it, I shall first give you an outline of my
course, up to the time when I joined myself with the
patriots.
As I went on to Durango, driving my ledhorse
before
me, grossly insulted and browbeaten, as I had been
by Don Pedro, and driven away by the Conde, it may
naturally be supposed, that my reflections were not of
the pleasantest kind. I had been deemed of a mild
temper. I had proposed to myself the highest possible
model of forbearance and forgiveness. No curses,
neither loud, nor deep, came to my lips. But I
amused myself, as I could, in thinking, what I would do in
the cause, to which I was determined to join myself, and
what a drubbing I would give Don Pedro. I then
painfully
adverted to the condition, in which I last saw Doa
Martha. I then meditated the depth and bitterness of
love without hope. I could say with Sterne, that the
iron then entered my soul. I saw the necessity of an
effort, and I made it. `I will shake myself,' said I, `from
the dust. I will not sink, a whining lover, into the depths
of despondency. Had Martha thus deemed of me,
that this was all my nerve and purpose, she had never
bestowed on me a second thought. I love, and at this
moment see not a ray of hope. What then? Shall the
future be obscured before me in impenetrable gloom?
There is duty. There is a glorious career. What
have such wretches, as Don Pedro, sent across the
ocean, to do with their iron scourge, shaken over this
oppressed and beautiful country? I have seen, myself,
that the despotism is most detestable. A noble country,
and a people naturally amiable in the highest degree,
are regarded with sovereign contempt by the ignorant
nobles, who govern them, and are trampled into the dust.
Added to this, there is the still more wretched
despotism
of the priests, whose object it is to fetter the mind,
as the others do the body; and who regard every ray
of light, let in upon the minds of this people, as so much
subtracted from their kingdom of darkness. My
principles
and my feelings both call me to this cause. I will
gain glory. I will triumph over envy. I will humble
that arrogant intended son-in-law. What do I know?
May not the Patriots triumph, and may I not again be of
service to Martha, and her mother? But how will
Martha
,
who feels the ties of kindred so strongly, regard me
in arms against her father; in arms against a despotism,
and hierarchy, both of which all her associations and
habits have taught her to consider as sacred? Such
were the points on which I soliloquized with my heart,
and my conscience, as I rode along. I settled the
matter
with myself, by recurring to my old college saw,
Fiat justitia, ruat clum. I will do my duty. I
will act out my principles, come what will. Even if the
Patriots pursue wrong ends, or use bad means, I will
renounce the cause. If Martha hears, and approves, it
is well. But if she should not eventually subscribe to the
right, I have loved an illusion. Did she not generously
defend me in my adherence to my faith? And will she
think the less of me for consistency here?' My thoughts
ended, as they began, by mingling bitterness towards
the Conde and Don Pedro with my purposes. I thought
over their obligations, and the contumely and contempt,
with which they had answered them. Armed with such
views, I made my inward vows to the cause of liberty
in New Spain. Who knows, how often even the best
of men act from mixed motives, in which bad, unknown
to the agent, is blended with good?
I found every thing in Durango in uproar. The
public
ear was filled with rumors. One brood of monstrous
fabrications had scarcely perished, before another was
hatched. The lower classes in general appeared in
favor
of a revolution. The greater part of the
European
Spanish, or Gauchupines, and the higher priests
were unrelenting enemies of change. Suspicions,
jealousies, and rumors of every sort were afloat,
and the terrible reaction of fostered ignorance and
bigotry began to show itself. The government
vibrated
from trembling and contemptible forbearance to
wanton tyranny and unnecessary cruelty. The objects
of suspicion were seized, and, without being confronted
with their accusers, often without knowing the charges
brought against them, were plunged in the mines, or were
assassinated or speared by the soldiery. A number of
Americans, who were casually found in the country,
shared the former fate. The natural character of the
Conde had inclined him to lenient measures. But he
had been obnoxious to another faction, who advocated
opposite principles. To support himself, and to
remove
the charges of guilty forbearance, he had
sometimes
assumed a severity, foreign to his general
character
.
In this unequal march of the government, the one
course prepared the way for the other, and proscription,
banishment, and massacre were the order of the day.
The people, who had been guided by a standing system
of falsehood, and were excessively ignorant, were, as a
matter of course, timid and suspicious. The different
races of which the population was composed, and their
mutual hatreds and jealousies towards each other,
naturally
came in with abundance of fuel for this flame.
In the corners of the streets, and in all the places of
public meeting in the city were seen groups of ragged,
and mean-looking people, with lowering brows, and with
jealousy and apprehension in their faces, conversing
together
.
Patrols of armed men were seen scouring the
streets. I quickly found the advantage of my passport.
I was obliged to produce my papers at every turn. I
found it necessary to use caution in my inquiries for M.
de Benvelt. By good fortune, I chanced upon the
acquaintance
of a surgeon from the United States, who
had been settled for some years in this city. I found
him, as might be expected, a republican in principle; but
having married a Spanish wife, and having gained a
considerable
property, of which he could not now dispose,
he was reluctantly compelled to remain on his guard,
and watch the current of events. With him I could
converse without suspicion. I found him honest,
hospitable
,
and intelligent. From him, I learned, that M. de
Benvelt had indeed been proscribed, and had fled with
his family to the patriot gathering at the mountain
Mixtpal
.
He gave me the most accurate directions to that
place. The encampment of the patriots was on the
side of this mountain, which was about seventy miles
from Durango, in the direction of St. Antonio. He
informed
me, that at the latter place, there was another
patriot encampment, in which a number of adventurers
from the United States were enlisted under the same
standard with the Creoles, and engaged in actual
hostilities
with the royal government. I gained from him
much important local information, respecting the relative
strength and bearing of the parties. Through him I made
all the necessary preparations for my journey. I sold,
through him, my ledhorse, and purchased, and equipped
a sumpter mule, with my baggage, which the Conde had
caused to be safely deposited at the principal
meson
in
the city. I made the most prudent arrangements, which
the case admitted, for securing against accident my
precious
trunk, furnished myself with the proper arms for
my intended warfare, and provided myself with a
sufficient
supply of wine and provisions. In short, I
packed
my mule to the extent of his travelling powers, and
disposed of the remainder of my baggage in an immense
valise for my own horse. I spent one night with my
host, who evinced himself in all respects a true
American
,
and early the next morning, with mutual
expressions
of good will, I set my face towards the mountain
Mixtpal, and the union of the patriots.
My journey led me, as usual in this country, on a
great and beaten road over red hills succeeded by grassy
plains. I saw little to interest me. The impress of
terror and apprehension was marked even upon the
passing on the roads. From the prevalence of mutual
suspicions, the people travelled in large and select
companies
,
and those completely armed; so that every
group of passengers had the appearance of a band of
guerillas. The greater portion of them could not read,
and for those, who could, my passport was an
unanswerable
document. I met with no adventure, until
a little after noon. My agitation and anxiety, for the
three last days had prevented my thinking much about
food, but nature, after all, will have her way. I began
to feel faint, and to bethink myself of the provisions,
with which the provident surgeon had furnished me. A
clump of shrubs and catalpas indicated a spring at a
little
distance from the road. Thither I was turning my
steps, to make my dinner in the shade, when I saw a
solitary horseman descending the hill, just behind me.
As he neared me, I began to fancy myself acquainted
with his form. In fact, it proved to be no other, than
Bryan himself. Place any one in my situation, an utter
stranger in a strange country, and you may fancy
something
of my joy at meeting him again. He sprang from
his horse, and embraced me, shedding tears of joy.
Now, said he, satan roast them all, if they ever
separate me from your Honor again. Bryan has nicked
them all, and cleared themself, though they barred him
up like a runaway dog. Don't you see, too, I have
brought your Honor's horse. Who should I light on in
Durango, but the yankee surgeon? I plumped upon
him, as though he had fallen in my porridge, and he
told me all, where your Honor was gone, and showed
me the horse you had sold. When I had once set eyes
on him, no other beast would serve my turn. So, your
Honor, out of the cash, that Martha, the jewel, has
furnished
me, I bought him back, and mounted him, and
here I am, safe and sound, to follow your Honor to the
world's end, to fight royalist, devil, or dobbie, just as
your Honor chooses.
But you have not told me how you escaped?
asked I. Well I will tell you that too. After you
was off, the Conde he orders me to the palace before
him. But Bryan is much of a mule, when the gait
does not please him. So I asks him, as his own self
had bid me be your servant, why he stops me now?
So he looks big, this way, curses me, and shuts me up
in that infernal calabooza, with steel bars, that they
have near the palace, and tells me to cool my fingers,
and learn patience there. There I sets me down on
the straw to a comfortable little turn of thinking of my
ways, and the fleas, your honor, boring my tender
skin in a thousand places at once. All the while, I
was as surly and as cross as a bull. At night they put
in some bread, a cup of the element, and a shank-bone
of tough beef in a platter, and I, your Honor, in pure
ill nature, kick'd it all over, like a gentleman. The
night and the day, in that horrid hole, are all one thing.
I guess it was not much wide of midnight, when down
comes the plump old duea. Ay, does your Honor
remember the capers we cut together, when we first
came home, and your Honor grinned this way? I sees
her waddling up to the grates with her dark lantern,
and she says, `Bryan, O Bryan, are you here, honey?'
`Ay,' says I, `and no thanks to them that put me here
neither. What would you with Bryan?' She says,
`Bryan, you are as cross as a rattlesnake, and you
always liked Anna, the
quarteroon
, better than me.
But you are pretty boy, Bryan, and I bears no
malice
.
So, you see, Mistress and Martha waited, till the
Conde had cooled a little, and then they gives me the
keys of this here calabooza, and bid me unbung this jug
of yours, and bid you clear yourself, and join Mr. Berrian,
as fast as you can.' Be sure, your Honor, I needed no
spur for that gait; and then, while I was yawning, and
getting a little out of the kinks, she tells me all in a
whisper, `Bryan, you cant guess, what a fuss we have
had. They have done all, but raise the real devil
himself. The Conde has quarrelled with madam, his
wife, which is more than I ever knew him to do before,
and he swore by all the saints, that he had almost a
mind to bring the father confessor, and marry his
daughter
to Don Pedro on the spot, and Martha look'd grand,
this way, and a little wild, and said a big speech, as
how she would mind her father in all right things. But
devil burn Don Pedro, if ever he lays the fingers of a
husband on me.'  I suspect, said I, Bryan, that
this last part of the speech, is an interpolation of your
own. No, please your Honor, it is neither pole nor
hoop of mine in the least, but just the meaning of what
the duea told about Martha. Oh! I couldn't tell
your Honor all about it in an hour. The Conde is
fretted to death, about the new business on the
mountain
,
and another rising away there in the countries
near your Honor's country. But he swears, it is harder
to manage a wife, and a giddy girl, than a whole
government
of rebels, but that he will see the girl safely
married
,
before he goes out to fight the publicans. The
young Don, all the while puts the Conde up to this, and
stands by, like a dog, waiting for a bone, and, devil
roast him, he looks big, this way, and is going to put on
his regimentals, and then he swears, how he will spit
VOL. I. 22
the publicans, and whip your honor, and the like of that.
But the best is to come. Here's a sweetmeat for your
Honor, and he took a billet from his bosom. It was
from Martha and contained these words.
`I cannot but believe that you will be glad to hear
that I am better. It was but a bad cold. Bryan will
tell you, that I suffer on account of our common enemy,
Don Pedro. They have used some indignities towards
me, and I am glad of it. My heart has been so heavy
of late, that I feared my spirits would be broken down.
But they will find, to their cost, that they have roused
the blood of my ancestors, and that they cannot bring
me to their purposes that way. I have no authority
to counsel you, and yet my heart is still prompting me
to say something. Whatever course you take, I am
sure you think it the path of honor. You will not take
it amiss, if I say one word to you about the mountain
You will go there, I am told. I wish you may not take
arms against my father. But I foresee that you will be
much with the Misses Benvelt. They are good, I
hope, and pretty; much fairer, I confess, than the
Spanish ladies. I am far enough from being happy
myself, but surely I am not so base, as not to wish you
happy, and you will be; for you will walk together, and
look at the mountains, and watch the setting sun, and
the rising moon, and have none to disturb you. Well,
they may as well be happy as anybody. I hope you
will not wholly forget me, when you teach them
English
.
They will learn fast, I dare say, now that you
have no other pupils. Could you not find time to
write to me, now and then? It would teach me to
correspond
in English; and I think your verses are pretty,
though they are on so poor a subject. Bryan has
promised that he will find some way in which to
forward
your letters. May be, I shall trouble you now
and then with a line. It will be a hard thing for me,
to imagine you in the ranks against my father, and I
know well, if you were to meet as enemies, you would
spare him for my sake. But for the other, he has
used us both with the basest indignity, and uses names
in reference to you, in my presence, that I will not
trace with my pen. I nightly, and fervently implore
the Mother of God, and all the saints, to guide you,
and keep you from all harm. If I could believe that
there were more energetic forms of prayer in your
church, I would use them too.
Nothing could exceed the delight of the honest Irish
lad to rejoin me, and I felt as if, in this humble friend,
I had found a brother. The spring was limpid and
cool, the shade of the catalpas delightful, and mangre
love and insurrection, we eat heartily, and drank a
reasonable
quantity of the heart-cheering
Passo
with
entire
gust. And now, said Bryan, your Honor, I
feel like a lion. I am ready to march to the ends of
the earth, and as much farther as your Honor pleases,
and if the publicans don't find me up to hard knocks,
let them say, `Bryan's a coward.'  We were soon
jogging along the dusty highway, towards the mountain.
Our horses, when brought together, almost manifested
the joyful recognition of Dapple and Rozinante.
We arrived, as the twilight was fading, at the foot of
a mountain, the first of a chain, which stretched, hill
beyond
hill, to the gulf of Mexico. Its summit was still
bright, and illumined with the last rays of the sun,
while its sides, and its base were enveloped in the dusk
of evening. We had overtaken, in the last half hour,
a number of solitary horsemen, who were hastening to
the same point of union. At an elevation of some
hundred
feet, on the side of the mountain, on a table plain
of no great extent, we saw the white tents, the fires and
torches, and the camp of the Patriots. A pass, barely
wide enough for the ascent of a horse, wound up the
sides of the mountain, among huge fragments of
rocks. We were hailed with the question
Adonde
va?
by a couple of tall and fierce-looking Spaniards,
armed with all sorts of weapons. Those, whom we
had joined, produced documents, which procured them
immediate admittance. I was aware, that my
passport
from the Conde would be of sinister omen in
this place. I enquired, anxiously, if M. de Benvelt
were there. I was answered in the affirmative, and
that any friend of his would be admitted. We were,
however, most carefully scrutinized. Having advanced
a few rods further up the mountain, to a small plain,
we were joined by a file of soldiers. We next came upon
a pass barred up with fallen trees, except a narrow
gateway
,
through which but one man could pass at a time
Here were temporary stables, and here we were
compelled
to leave our horses. A couple of
cargadores
, or
porters, came, who with Bryan made shift to carry our
baggage. The story, which Bryan told with great fluency,
of our having been driven from the Conde's palace, as
patriots, obtained for us undoubting confidence, and a
cordial
reception, and we were hailed as masonic brothers of
the cause. We continued, with increasing difficulty, to
clamber up the rocks, and to wind round the sides of the
mountain, with a half hour's most laborious ascent. Then
we opened upon a plain of some acres in extent. In the
centre, was a smooth, level, and verdant little prairie, on
one side skirted with lofty trees, whose shadowy verdure
showed delightfully by the hundred fires of the camp.
The watch-word was given by the leader of our file,
and repeated from sentinel to sentinel, until the sounds
died away in the distance. We were immediately
ushered
into the camp, and brought to the marquise of the
commander in chief. Here our documents were examined
anew, and as mine was the most suspicious case, M. de
Benvelt was sent for, to answer to my being a true man,
and no spy. While I was awaiting the issue of this
message
,
I had time to look round the camp. From the little
I had seen, and read upon the subject, I judged, that the
tents were arranged in military order, and the tall,
whiskered
,
and fierce-looking men, seen partly in light, and
partly in shade, made a formidable appearance. There
was no uniform. Some were dressed,
capa y espada
, and
some had little more, than a
chemise
and
culottes
. Most
of them were arrayed in a costume of motley, and shaggy
character, and the whole had more the aspect of banditti,
than the array of a regular military force.
In a few minutes the soldier came back, accompanied
by M. de Benvelt. He had seen me, twice or three
times only at the palace, but he knew my estimation there,
and especially for the confidence which his daughters
reposed
in me, he pronounced me a true man, as honest as
a German. I give mein Gott, said he, a tousand
tanks, that you are come. You shall stay with me, and
my dear girls will be so happy. This man, said he, is
one very good American, and has been treated very bad
by de Conde himself; and he has come, as he says, to
join the good cause, and fight for de liberties. I was
welcomed by Morelos, the commander in chief, with great
courtesy. After conversing with me a few moments, and
22*
giving me some outlines of the present state of things, he
assigned a time, in which we would deliberate together,
what position and rank I should fill in the army, and I
went on with M. de Benvelt. As we proceeded, he gave
me some of the details of his proscription, which seemed
to have been ill advised, and to have precipitated his
purpose
.
I inferred from his account of the matter, that in
the warmth of his frank and honest heart, he had dropt
some expressions, intimating good wishes to the Patriots.
They reached the ears of Colonel Arredondo and Don
Pedro
,
and he was at once proscribed. But, said he, I
tank mein Gott, I have been in Old England, and learned
to speak English almost so good, as a native, and I got
the start of the tamned Dons, for I had sent all my monies
there, as soon as I saw these tamned times coming. And
now, my poy, my son, we will pay them back in their
own coin. We'll punish those vile hypocrites, the priests
too, and will have the settling of the land. Not that I
want their tamned mines, neider. I have monies enough,
I tank mein Gott. But, it's the liberties, my prave poy,
it's the liberties we want. There's never a true
Tuchman
on the globe but what loves de liberties, ay, better
than sour krout. Come on, my poy, we'll at them
togeder
.
How I shall make my girls hearts leap mit dis
sight of you. 'Tis a tamned tark hole under de side of
the mountain, where we stay. But never mind. We'll
beat them, and then have just such housen as we like.
He led the way, and I followed, through the tents,
advancing
towards a perpendicular wall of native lime-stone,
which towered from one extremity of the prairie, a
thousand
feet into the air. Under this wall, there was a
capacious cavern, whose front opened with an elevation,
just sufficient to admit us without stooping. Having
entered
,
I found myself in a vast vaulted apartment, scooped
out by the hand of nature, of many hundred yards in extent,
and the dome springing up to such a height, as only to be
faintly illumined by the candles, and torches within.
Huge natural columns, and colossal pillars of solid blue
limestone, sprung up in different points to the roof. The
whole had the appearance, thus dimly lighted, of a vast
Gothic interior of a temple, of such a grandeur as no words
could reach. It answered a great many purposes at
once. It was immense, and sufficient to furnish shelter
to an army. The air was, at once, cool and dry.
Here were the head quarters of the Patriot officers.
Here were lodged all the female parts of their
establishment
.
The lines of demarcation, between the ladies and
suites
of different families, were blankets, or silken
curtains
,
or verdant branches, or palmetto stalks. As far as
the eye could penetrate, in the rear of the cavern, were
natural apertures, through the cliffs of the mountains,
and here in blazing lines were the cooking fires of the
camp. The range of nature could not have presented,
a place more favorable to every thing, that could be
sought under such circumstances. There was perfect
shelter from the elements, and impregnable security;
and, as though nothing, that the bounty of nature could
furnish, should be wanting, in one corner of this immense
grotto, trickled along, a spring of pure, and cool water
amply sufficient for all the exigencies of the whole camp.
There were children, servants, negroes, mulattoes,
samboes
,
Indians, domestics, and wives, of all nations and
colours
.
In one point leaned the stately Spanish dame,
glittering with gems, and invested with the rich and
splendid
mantilla, and beside her glared the white eyes of a fat
negro wench. In one compartment, the Patriot officer,
with his immense hat and feathers, was snatching his
repast
from a table rudely made of planks. In another,
there was a family group, with children of all ages, taking
their chocolate together. The clatter of plates, chimed
in with the roasting of beef, and the hissing of boiling
vessels
in the rear. The united sound of voices through the
whole establishment, was not unlike that of a numerous
flock of blackbirds at the North, when perching on a tree.
Some were singing canzonettes, not unlike our catches.
Others were roaring patriotic songs, many of which were
produced in the camp every day. Some were scraping
the violin, others were thrumming the guitar. But the
whole medley of sounds was that, in which reckless gaiety
was the key note. Between the parlour and kitchin
subdivisions
,
there was an open promenade, from one end to
the other, and along this walk were seen moving slowly,
backward and forward, as if in deep meditation, the tall,
dark, and whiskered Solons and Solomons of the rising,
revolving the fate of empires in their bosoms, and,
perhaps
,
regarding with complacency the gigantic shadows,
and the immense feathers, and long swords, which the
tapers gave them, on the huge rampart, as they moved
along.
Nothing could be more cheerful or affectionate, than the
welcome which the Misses Benvelt gave me. They gaily
told me, that, as any hope of making any deeper
impression
upon a heart, so preoccupied, was out of the question,
they would content themselves with calling me brother,
and claiming only the attention and affection due to
sisters. I found them the same round faces, and
bright complexions, and happy countenances, that I had
them at the palace. There was never a more striking
contrast, than that of these happy and beautiful faces,
vieing with the lily and the rose, these mantillas of the
richest silks, and crapes clasped with diamonds, and
sparkling
with gems, with the shapeless and awful grandeur of
the cavern, under the superincumbent piles of snow topt
mountains, and the moving groups of ugly servants, fat
wenches with their white and sauey eyes, and all the
singular
gradations of tinged skin, from the copper colour of
the native Indian, to the jet black of the Congo African.
Now, mein dear girls, said M. de Benvelt, I hope
you will scold mit me no more, for bringing you to this
tamned tark place. Here is your yankee master, come
to stay mit you, and to teach you de English, and fight de
Dons mit me. Thank you father, said the elder, Thank
you, added the younger, and they cordially shook me by
the hand, bidding me call them sisters, and that they would
call me nothing but brother. We told father, said the
elder, (her name was Wilhelmina) that what with the
smoke, and the horrid ugly faces here, we were all losing
our eyesight. Even the young fellows of Durango were
not so superlatively ugly, as these officers. Virgin Mary!
I had no idea, that all the Patriots were such ugly fellows,
or they never would have made a Patriot of me. Sophia,
the second Miss Benvelt, was called by the family, Sophy
the Sage, as the youngest was, Annette the Meck. Sophy
eagerly questioned me, if it was a fact, that all the Yankees
were handsome to a man; for, she whispered, it was
confidently reported in the camp, that the Yankees at St.
Antonio, were marching to join them here. Oh! how
sad and grave you look. I pity you, indeed, and so we
do Martha; but since it cannot be helped, we must try to
cheer you. Never mind, said Annette. The want
of a heart does not show upon the face. At any rate, we
have a likely fellow to walk about with us, and keep off the
dogs. And what is more, we confide in our brother as
honest, and this, among this bandit-looking people, is
no small matter. When you want to read, and sit still,
you shall shake your head, as you used to do at the
palace
,
and we will all run to our books, and be as quiet as
kittens.
Every thing with this amiable group wore the air of
being
en famille
. Their father represented them to have
been gloomy. My coming among them seemed to be the
signal for the renewal of their innocent and uncontrolled
gaiety. Bryan, too, received from the father a proper
welcome, and to the duties of a servant was to add those of
a soldier. The omen attending my introduction among the
patriots thus far seemed auspicious. In a little while, we
were seated at a smoking sirloin, sweet potatoes,
tortillas
,
or Spanish corn cakes, a
gisado
, coffee and chocolate,
bananas
,
melons, and fruits of all sorts, the plunder of the
fields in the vallies below. There was no want of
Parso
for me, and the squeezing of the native, as Bryan called
it, that is to say,
aqua ardiente
, for him. For the rest,
they made liberal use of an intoxicating drink, called
vino
mezcal
. With these appliances of natural and artificial
gaiety, there was no want of merriment among us.
After supper, the father remarked to his daughters, that
they must cease their clatter for a while, and give us time
to discuss the graver matters in hand. He drew me apart,
and communicated the present state of things, the plans
and prospects of the leaders of the insurrection, and the
omens of ultimate success. He was himself rather a
cabinet
agent, than a general. Nevertheless he declared, that
whenever an opportunity offered, he intended to fight.
They shall hear of their tamned proscription of me, said
he. They shall repent driving me and my sweet girls into
this tamned hole. There was one point of his
information
,
in which I felt a lively interest. There was an actual
rising in Texas, and many young men of respectability
and standing from the United States were actually united
with them in the ranks. This position was admirably chosen
for defence, and for levying contributions on the
adjacent
country. It was, also, nearly midway between
Mexico, the capital, and St. Antonio, where the other
rising was. Many of the Patriot chiefs advised to remain
here, and erect impregnable fortifications, institute a press
for a gazette, and open a point of union for all in the
provincias
internas
, who were disaffected with the royal
cause. Others advised, to descend from this mountain,
and force their way to St. Antonio, and form a junction
with the forces there, making much calculation on aid
from the United States. A single glance at things was
sufficient to show me the disadvantages, under which the
cause labored here. Very few of the leaders had any
system
,
or matured plan. Very few of them were
acquainted
with history, or politics, and the leaders were generally
much better instructed to noose a wild horse, than to
manage such ignorant, timid, and yet ferocious people,
as made up the mass of the party. Their plans were
shortsighted, having respect rather to momentary
advantages
,
than to distant, matured, and ultimate success.
Even the question, whether to remain, and strengthen
themselves here, and wait for accessions to the cause, or
sally from the mountain, and march to St. Antonio, became
the watchword of party. The question proposed to me,
as soon as I was domesticated among them, was, Are you
for staying, or going? My associates would assort with me,
according to my answer. And as happens in such cases,
the more trifling the difference was between us, the more
bitter was the spirit of difference. What the advocates
wanted in wisdom and capacity to deliberate, they made
up in long-winded speeches, in zeal, and fierceness.
I could see, too, that the motives, that brought them here,
were as various, as the appearance of the individuals. The
very same cause which thickened adherents round the
standard of King David, had its influence here also. There
were people in debt, spendthrifts, outlaws, people, who
come here through envy, and wishing for plunder and
revenge
,
people, who held nothing to lose, and who might
find booty during the general conflagration. Every
sordid
,
every base principle, every malignant passion had had
its recruiting efficacy, and had brought over more than one
partizan to the Patriot standard. Among the servants, who
wanted to be rid of masters, among the bankrupts, who
wanted in this way to liquidate their debts, among the
profligate
,
who wished to plunder the rich, among the ignoble,
whose envy induced them to wish to set their foot on the
neck of the great men of the country, among the many,
who had congregated here from base and sinister motives,
there were no doubt not a few of those pure and noble minds,
that appear from time to time in small numbers on our orb,
who calmly look down the current of the future, and with
singleness of heart, and that sublime benevolence, which
contemplates no selfish ends, arrange their plans, with a
kind of abstract and angelic calculus, for the good of the
generations to come. No doubt, but we had our
miniature
Washingtons and Bolivars. There were a few fine
young men, whose eye kindled, as they dilated upon the
indescribable grandeur of their great country, written
great by the finger of Nature, its inexhaustible
natural
and moral resources, the intrinsically generous
character
of its simple and oppressed people, and the
abomination
of the thought that such a vast and beautiful country
should continue to be the plaything bauble of a stupid
tyrant
,
embroidering petticoats for the Virgin, and living at
the distance of two thousand leagues.
Among those, who had joined the cause without any
alloy
of sinister, or selfish feeling was M. de Benvelt. He
was a man of amiable, simple, and unsuspicious character,
who had accumulated an immense fortune by a continued
succession of fortunate events, which seems to crown the
efforts of some favored individuals with success, whether
they seek for it, or not. He had had the forecast to convert
his fortune into cash, and deposite it in the British funds.
But he had committed his own personal ease and safety,
and that of his three beautiful, and inexperienced
daughters
,
on the issue of this dubious stake, merely from a
philosophic
regard to the great and sacred cause of genuine
freedom. Too amiable, and too little ambitious to be
stirred
up to the contest by envy or aspiring thoughts, he had
come to the cause in the simple feeling of well-wishing to
mankind. He remarked himself, that no one could
suspect
him of calculating upon more ease, honor, or wealth,
by any change, that a revolution could bring. His honest
and unsuspicious mind had led him to think well of me
from the first, because his daughters did; and he had
become
attached to me in the same proportion, as they had.
He had seen enough of the ignorance and presumption of
most of the leaders here, as already to have become
disgusted
with them. My adhesion to the cause inspired him
with renewed confidence. His vast wealth, and his
established
character gave him no small influence among the
Patriot leaders. In fact, though nominally subordinate, he
had more real influence than any other man. He would
not hear of my having a commission under that of Colonel.
VOL. I. 23
As it respected the question at issue, he and I differed from
Morelos, he being for sallying forth, and joining the rising
at St. Antonio. I had no faith in the opinion, that the
United States would commit themselves in the contest, and
that all, that we could reasonably expect from that quarter
was occasional accessions of adventurous young men, who
would come from the impulse of feeling. We thought it
best, therefore, to fortify ourselves, and make this place a
depot, head quarters, and a rallying point for the Patriots.
It would be a
point d'appui
for the countenance and
encouragement
of the wavering and the disaffected, and it
would tend to divert the Royal commander from
concentrating
his whole force against either point. It would
harass
and dishearten their forces. These disputes with the
chiefs, who differed from us on this point, were always
managed on our part with perfect good temper.
Sometimes
the daughters gave their opinions too. They
averred
,
that from this delightful place, where they could look
down upon the world, with a brother to teach them
English
,
and beautiful groves, in which to walk, and all
manner
of whimsical characters, with which to amuse
themselves
,
and a few faces, on which they might look, without
injuring their eyes, with plenty of fruits, and water, and
such a large and substantial mansion for shelter, and a
place of such strength and safety, it would be folly to go
away. They asserted, that we could do no better than to
remain here, and they privately whispered me, that if I
would behave well, they would have a detachment sent out,
to bring in the Condesa and Martha, and make me happy;
and that mount Mixtpal should be the seat of their
government
.
The sage Sophy, however, was for marching to St.
Antonio, that she might study Yankee faces, insisting, that
one beau to three ladies was a proportion altogether too
scanty.
The first days of my abode here were devoted partly to
the study of tactics, and in part to learning the practical
branch of military duty by actual training. For this
purpose
,
I interested myself to form a volunteer corps, which
should study tactics, and drill together. We spent some
hours every day in our exercises. I now spoke Spanish
with entire fluency, and had no difficulty in becoming
acquainted
with the chiefs. It was a matter of no small
difficulty
,
as well as delicacy, to manage my intercourse with the
married ladies of the establishment. As they had little to
do, and were addicted to those courses at home, and were
here much more in society than they were accustomed to
be, intrigues, and
tracasseries
, and squabbles, and frequent
changes of their
cortejos
, were occurring daily. On this
subject a considerable quantity of gunpowder was
harmlessly
burned in duels.
The most considerable of the Patriots, and the man, who
held the present command among them, was Morelos. He
was a native ecclesiastic, of the order of deacons. I may
remark, that there seems to be an instinctive feeling,
antecedent
to reason, which causes, that every human being,
born in our hemisphere inherits a feeling of independence,
and a love of liberty, as his birthright. The clergy of the
higher orders were generally European Spanish, and it is
well known, that between them, and the natives of Spanish
blood, born in the new world, there has existed a kind of
hereditary antipathy. European priests were of course for
the most part unrelenting Royalists. The native priests, on
the contrary, generally leaned towards the independence of
their country. This man possessed the silent and
contemplative
appearance, which long training in the peculiar rites,
usages, and habits of the Romish church generally imposes.
So much restraint, and observance, and watching of public
opinion, in bad men, fosters hypocrisy in the heart. On
the faces of others, it imprints a musing and melancholy
character. In him this impress was peculiarly visible. The
dreadful fate, which had attended his compatriot and
brother
,
the father Hidalgo, the patriarch, and the first
conspicuous
victim of insurrection against Ferdinand, had
added
to this general expression an unalterable thoughtfulness
and gloom. He was a man not of uncommon powers, but of
considerable reading and reflection, and, as I judged,
mainly
actuated by an innate regard to freedom in joining the
cause. He was a man of undoubted courage and
firmness
.
No ways terrified by the terrible catastrophe, which
befell the father Hidalgo, he seemed to have derived from
it more elevation of feeling, and more unshaken
perseverance
in the cause. He often passed his evenings with the
family of M. de Benvelt, and attached himself to me from
the first moments of our acquaintance. He knew the whole
thread of events, throughout the whole Mexican empire,
from the first dawning of the spirit of independence. His
local acquaintance with this vast country, and the
character
and influence of its inhabitants, was to me a matter of
astonishment. You could point to no village or city on
the map, with the whole of whose private history he did
not seem perfectly acquainted. He often passed the
evening
in giving us details of the insurrection, generally gloomy
and terrible, up to this time.
The third evening of my residence in the family, during
a most furious tempest of rain, wind, and thunder, while
the lightning flashed into our subterranean dwelling, and the
wind and thunder roared awfully among the mountains, he
formed one of the circle, which the uproar of the elements
abroad was contracting in a closer sitting, and gave us a
succinct narrative of all, that he had seen, done, and
suffered
,
since he had exchanged his functions of priest for those
of the patriot soldier, quque ipse miserrima vidi, et
quorum
pars magna fui, said he, quoting the great Roman poet.
These details, in such a place, in such an evening, and by
a man of countenance, so unalterably solemn and
melancholy
,
with a head, whose baldness at the centre marked
that the razor had passed over it, and whose deep thoughts
seemed to hold communion with torture and with death,
communicated to us the shivering chill of intense feeling.
I select from the details of that narrative the account of
the fate of the father Hidalgo.
When I joined him, said he, the alarm of
insurrection
in our country had just sounded from sea to sea.
With a holy feeling of devotion to the people of this
oppressed
country, he had left his quiet and safe duties of
priest, and had girt himself with the sword of patriotism.
The people clustered about him, like the gathering of
birds when preparing for their arial excursions. He was
flushed with hope and confidence, and at the head of forty
thousand men. Although his object was to deliver the
country forever from the dominion of the parent country,
the watch-word was, `Ferdinand the seventh, and the
Virgin
of Guadaloupe.' You will suppose, that our
communion
was sweet, for our hearts were alike devoted to this
cause. We were both creoles of the country. Both had
renounced the clerical functions, and were equally exposed
to the deepest anathemas of the dignitaries of our church.
Ours was a holier, and more intimate tie of brotherhood,
cemented still firmer by community of disgrace and
exposure
.
He advanced upon Guanaxuato, a city of
considerable
importance, and was joined by Aldama, Allende,
23 *
and other distinguished Patriot partizans. He captured
that city and Valladolid, and was advancing in triumph
and in full march upon Mexico. Here he experienced the
terrible efficacy of the spiritual armor of our warfare, in
a region of so much ignorance and bigotry, as this. He
was excommunicated and denounced by the priesthood,
as an abandoned heretic and infidel. His accumulating
followers, viewing him, as the enemy of God and all good
men, terrified and awed, melted away from his path, like
snow in the sunbeams. He changed his advance to
retreat
,
and fled from one town to another, struggling with
superstition, but with his face towards the foe. At
Guadalaxara he was beseiged by the Royalist chief,
Callejo
.
Defeated, and compelled to retreat, he fled,
successively
,
from Zacatecas to San Luis Potosi. His
object was to advance towards the American frontier,
where the germ of republicanism had been long in
vegetation
.
Velas, a perfidious wretch, who had by the
fawning
semblance of implicit deference gained over him the
ascendancy of a flatterer, and succeeded in winning his
confidence
,
imparted to him under injunctions of the most
profound secrecy, that Colonel Arredondo, who commanded
the royal troops under the Conde, was himself in heart a
republican, and wished to join the patriots. He projected
an interview between them. The unsuspecting father was
thus entrapped into an ambush, and was seized, and made
a prisoner. I was in another quarter, when all this
happened
.
But I obtained the most exact information of his
fate. He was immediately conducted to Chihuahua, the
metropolis of the
provincias internas
. A council of war
was convened, over which General Salcedo presided,
subject
to the ultimate revision of its sentence by the Conde.
He was well known, at that time, to have been disposed to
merciful counsels. At least, he would have spared the
unhappy victim insult and torture. But the smooth and
plausible, yet stern and vindictive father Josephus
interposed
his counsels with so much effect, that it was decided
that he should first endure the torture, and then die.
He was a venerable old man, and had been a dignitary
of the church. He was arrayed with the customary
habiliments of his sacerdotal office, in order to be degraded
and deposed with more solemnity. He was then brought
out by a file of soldiers, and delivered over to a consistory
of priests, and they adjudged the nature and extent of
his torture. It was adjudged, that as he had grasped the
sword of heresy and rebellion, with the same hand with
which he had been used to raise the consecrated host,
the thumb and fingers of should be rasped down to the
first joint. The dreadful sentence that was read to him
was, that he should first suffer this operation, then be shot,
and then delivered over to the power of Satan and hell.
He was ordered to prepare for its immediate execution.
His right arm was immovably bound by cords to a postern,
just admitting the thumb and fingers above the end of the
postern, and they were secured to iron rods. A brazier
produced a coarse kind of file, and began the horrible
operation. He evinced the unshaken spirit of a martyr.
The feverish flush of agony was indeed visible in his
brown and furrowed cheek, and the first filling of the file
with the skin and the quick fibre produced a manifest
spasmodic
quivering over the whole frame. It was the claim
of the frail physical and suffering nature. The ascendancy
of the higher intellectual principle, sitting on a throne
which the agonies of mortality could not touch, vindicated
the second triumph. They who came with the horrid
purpose to exult in his groans, and see him subdued, and
expiring under the agony and dismay, went away with far
other impressions. He waved the hand that was not
manacled. `I die,' said he, `a believer and a servant
of Him, who endured worse than this, without shrinking.
He, who was nailed to the tree, will sustain me. This
soul is beyond your power, and it exults in the sacredness
of the cause for which I die. Think not, when you have
murdered an old and a most unworthy priest, that the
cause will expire with him. The groans of the oppressed
will raise up other deliverers. If there be present a single
person, who is a patriot in his heart, and who is restrained
by fear, let him learn that there are holy principles, that cast
out fear; and let him see, how a patriot and a Christian
can die.' He continued in this way, with a firm
countenance
and an unfaltering voice, to express his devotion to the
cause, until the savage operation was accomplished. They
then unbound him, and led him to execution. Even here
he was equally undismayed. Before he kneeled down,
he exhorted the assembled multitude to arise in their
strength, and break their chains, and cast them in the face
of their oppressors. He expressed, with the prophetic
confidence of a dying man, his conviction that the cause
of liberty would prevail, and that the whole hemisphere
would be completely emancipated; and that, though he
was not to be spared to see it, he should learn of it in a
better country, and in `the abodes of more than mortal
freedom.' He would not allow them to cover his head.
He kneeled down, and held up his hand, as a signal for the
soldiers to fire, and received his death with undaunted
composure. Thus, said Morelos, died my noble and
unshaken compatriot and friend, and if I am to suffer in
the same cause, `may my last end be like his.'
The winds still mustered in their fury. The rains
poured, and the Egyptian darkness was only illumined by
the glare of lightning. The story, the countenance of
Morelos, and the scene, were all in keeping. The roses
gradually yielded to the lilies in the countenances of the
daughters, as the story advanced. On De Benvelt's sat
the undisguised expression of indignation and terror.
Ah! he exclaimed, these Creoles are a tamned set
of asses. It makes me think of the servile war in old
Rome. The army that went against them, armed itself
with scourges and whips. The miserable wretches fled
from the sight of the lash. Only place before these
ignorant
fools an excommunication, and they would desert
the Saviour himself. We are engaged in one pretty
business
,
to expose ourselves to such an end as this, to give
de liberties to these tamned cowards, who will run away
even from an invisible danger.
Upon the Misses Benvelt the story had the effect to turn
their thoughts to the possible issue of their undertaking,
and to reflect that their father was now obnoxious to the
same fate, which fell so terribly on the head of the father
Hidalgo. Gay and thoughtless as they generally were,
they were not without deep feeling. The bare
supposition
of such a catastrophe, suspended over a father so
beloved, fixed on their pale and fair faces a deep gloom,
succeeded by starting tears. As soon as Morelos had
retired, they began to agitate the question, if there was no
escape from the position in which they were now placed,
and to intreat their father and me, to devise some way in
which we might all fly together to the United States. But
another theme, adroitly introduced, had the effect to turn
their thoughts in another direction. Stories of another
cast circulated, and another train of images was introduced.
Their tears gave place to gaiety, and before we separated
for the night, father Hidalgo, and the possible issue of our
cause, were alike forgotten.
I made all the progress that I could desire, in becoming
acquainted with our associates in the camp, and with the
ladies I had more popularity than I could have desired;
for they took occasion to tell me, that so sober a man,
and so little addicted to gallantry, they feared, would not
know how to fight. Every new view of the men gave
me more disheartening apprehensions of the issue of a
cause, depending upon such leaders. Had they listened
to Morelos, they would have had subordination, discipline,
system, economy, and sufficient supplies of provisions for
a siege. But there was no compulsion, and no
subordination
.
The resources of a month were wasted in the
riot of a week. The camp rung with patriotic songs,
and the reckless gaiety of young men, who felt
themselves
far from all restraint; and presented an aspect of
frolic and mirth, that was peculiarly fascinating to such a
people. Even under the massive dome of our quarters,
new stories of intrigues were constantly getting air, and
their intrigues, and their pride, and their parties, and
their heart-burnings, furnished ample materials for the
thousand and one narratives of scandal. Almost every
night brought its ball and fandango, which the Misses
Benvelt
and myself, however reluctantly, were compelled to
attend. The country for twenty leagues round was put in
requisition, to furnish the requisite good cheer. The poor
plundered peasants had no other redress, than to imprecate
curses, equally, on the heads of Royalists and Patriots.
There was so much riot and dissipation, so much
abundance
and idleness, such barbarian affectation of glare and
splendor, that I doubt not a considerable number of these
patriots, male and female, would have been glad to
terminate
the campaign and the revolution with only this
reservation
for themselves, that they should take up their final
residence in this abode of pleasure and plenty. For my
part, I felt myself in such demand with the dames and
sisters of the officers, that I was rapidly getting rid of
that bashfulness, that creates such a barrier between the
people of different nations. If I were disposed to go
into the annals of female intrigue, I could easily fill a
volume with the adventures which occurred while I was
here. I turned from such novel manners with
indifference
;
and were it not an assumption not to be expected
at my years, I might say, with loathing.
The only real satisfaction which I experienced, apart
from my reading and studies, was in the delightful family
circle of M. de Benvelt. On this charming table plain,
I could have enjoyed solitude in the scenery and the
contemplation
of nature. But the incessant activity and bustle
gave it the air of a paltry, crowded village, neither town
nor country, neither solitude nor society, although, besides
fandangoes, we had our parties, dignified by the grand
Spanish designation,
tertulias
. Escaped from the
chattering
ignorance of these affairs, there was a
navet
, an
infantine frankness, mixed with feeling and good sense, in
this affectionate family, that made all the hours which we
could have to ourselves, pass most pleasantly. Every
returning day gave me higher views of them. Their
simplicity
I found to be that singleness of mind and of heart,
which I have always considered the highest endowment
of the best minds. Amidst all their gaiety, there was
the fearless deportment of conscious rectitude, and
self-respect
.
The father had been originally a Lutheran
protestant, and the assumption of respect for Catholic rites
and usages, had been made out of a decent regard to the
customs and prejudices of the people among whom he
lived. As we became more closely and intimately
acquainted
,
I found a thousand points of mental union, as
though we had been brought up together. Struck with
this, De Benvelt often questioned me, if I could not speak
a little Dutch, and if I was sure there was no Saxon blood
in my veins. The manners, morals, and pursuits of this
assemblage of mountain banditti, were as abhorrent to their
feelings as to mine. But, with the happy and sunshiny
temperament of joyous and innocent natures, they rather
drew from the whole scene food for mirth and amusement,
than for dissatisfaction and harsh remark. We never took a
walk, or made the circuit of the camp, or took our part
in a review, or returned from a fandango, but what they
brought away an amusing anecdote, or became acquainted
with some incident that furnished us with conversation
and diversion. Above all, they managed with a good
sense, modesty, and propriety, altogether unaccountable,
from their limited acquaintance and experience with human
nature, the numerous professions of admiration and proffers
of love, from the young heroes of our camp. They were
the undisputed belles and beauties of the whole circle,
and yet they were not pursued by envy. In this amiable
family, I was in a few days as entirely domesticated, as if
I had been, what I was invariably called, a son and a
brother. I hoped that the bustle and agitation of this new
scene, and the duties of a colonel in a regiment of
ignorant
and refractory recruits of another nation, and the air
of quiet and home in the family, would banish that deep
feeling of painful remembrance, which was causing my
thoughts every day to wander back to the sycamores of the
Conde's palace. In this hope I was disappointed. Like
an evil conscience, this feeling not only followed me, but,
instead of being alleviated, was embittered by time.
De Benvelt often observed, as we separated for the
evening, that with a competent supply of the good things
of life, and one or two more agreeable families, as
neighbours
,
he should be satisfied to live and to die in that
place. The very mention of leaving the mountain, was
sufficient to bring paleness to the cheeks of the daughters.
But the question, whether to go or to stay, which had
been so much discussed, was now to be settled by
circumstances
,
over which we had no control. We had just
formed our family circle for the evening, and De Benvelt
had just remarked, that he had recovered the flesh he had
lost when he first fled to Mixtpal, when a despatch was
handed us from Morelos, who had, upon a rumour of an
approaching force, descended with the
lite
of his forces
to the subjacent plains. It informed us, that the Conde
had arrived at the foot of the mountain, with a large force,
partly regular troops under Colonel Arredondo, and of
Creole troops under Illissondo; that his horse had
scattered
themselves in all the region; that a number of our
little parties, which we were obliged to baptize by the
name of foraging parties, but which were, in fact,
plundering
detachments, had been captured; that no quarters had
been given, and that they had been subjected to
promiscuous
military execution. He stated all the difficulties of
our cause; that all his remonstrances about the necessity
of laying in a supply of provisions for a siege, had been
utterly unavailing; that we had provisions for no more than
a week, and that our only course was to beat the enemy,
and drive them from the country, that we might
continue
to find supplies; or to evade them by stratagem; or to
break through their array, and take up our march for
St. Antonio, where report represented the Patriots as
successful
.
He wished an immediate descent with all our
VOL. I. 24
forces, to join him before the morning. For me, the
volunteer regiment was assigned as my command, and
my commission, as its colonel, was made out by the
provisional junta, with all the formalities. This, at least,
put an end to doubting and disputation, as to our course.
All now admitted the wisdom of remonstrance against
our folly, in not laying in provisions. Had we had them,
we might now have defied all the forces of Mexico.
Each threw the fault upon others, and admitted, that
now we had nothing to do, but to fight. The Misses
Benvelt, in tears and in agonies of terror, clung alternately
to their father and to me. The dames, the young ladies,
the servants, the soldiers, all crowded together about us,
while we read the orders, that every man among us, who
could bear arms, should be ready to descend to the plain,
fully equipped, in an hour. Our glees, and catches, and
patriotic songs, were all at once changed to mourning.
Nothing was seen in faces, that could be blanched, but
paleness, and nothing was heard, but the language of
consternation
and dismay. Those of our young heroes who
had been loudest in their windy fierceness, while the foe
was neither heard nor seen, were now as mute and pale
as the rest.
Having issued the orders, which were peremptory,
and admitted no exceptions, De Benvelt, the general, and
myself, the colonel, retired to our military wardrobe.
His short and round figure, was soon accommodated with
the gaudy regimentals of a general of brigade. The
glitter of a profusion of lace, was in good keeping with a
face as round and as ruddy, as a full moon. Mein
Gott! said he, now this looks like Dresden. Do I
look prave now? Ah! my poor girls, it is a tamned
pusiness
after all, this of fighting for de liberties. In turn,
he assisted me in arranging my official costume. I
confess
,
that I felt sufficiently awkward, and sufficiently
ridiculous
,
with my heavy lace epaulets, and a sword of as
formidable
dimensions, as that shown by Bonaparte to
the Mamalukes. You may laugh, if you choose; but I
thought of myself, preceded by the thick Saxon, who
seemed
in his new habiliments, as stiff as a poker, and was
surrounded
by brawny and vapouring Creoles; and of myself,
but poorly qualified, in my own estimation, for any thing
but peaceful pursuits, in the ridiculous comparison, which
forced itself upon me in a moment. You have seen a
New England pig, recently garnished about the neck, with
a fine new yoke. You have remarked, that he will raise
his fore legs some inches higher than he was wont to do, in
order to hit his knees every step upon his yoke. Our
gait in our new armour, struck me as an exact parallel of
this.
The young ladies clung to their father and to me, to the
last moment, and in voices, scarcely articulate for sobbing,
begged us to take care of ourselves, and they gave me
the most solemn charges, to bring their father back again
safe. The tears chased one another over the cheeks of
the Saxon father. Mein Gott, said he, my tear girls,
you will break your father's heart. Now, as daughters of
a Tuch general, you ought not to cry at all, at all. I felt
it necessary, to give the parting an air of gaiety, and I
begged a lock of the blond tresses of each of their heads,
and told them, that they ought to send us away, as the
French ladies used to do their
preux chevaliers
, with
smiles and with kisses. These are the omens, to give a
stout heart for battle. I promise you, my fair sisters to
come back no more wounded, than just enough, to render
us interesting, and with a whole volume of exploits, to be
related by nobody but ourselves, and, furthermore, pledge
you my word, to escort you safe and sound, to the
Yankee
camp at St. Antonio.
In calling over our muster-roll, we found no small
number
of our young enthusiasts for liberty, reported as too
ill for marching. Most of these young men had been the
night before at the fandango, and had been seized with
this disqualifying sickness, since that time. But we were
a very considerable body, who were assembled to march.
We moved on, as Milton says, darkling, and treading
on each other's heels, and stumbling upon the rocks in the
darkness. Of course, we had some Spanish curses,
followed
,
however, by the sign of the cross, and a prayer to
the patron saint for forgiveness. We were dimly lighted
on our way by torches. It was midnight when we reached
the plain, and united ourselves with Morelos. At the
distance
of half a league over the plain, were seen complete
ranges of fires, one extremity of which touched the base
of the mountain on our right, and the other on our left;
so that we were completely hemmed in by a semicircle.
We were immediately ushered into a council of war. As
usual, we had discordant opinions, and almost as many
plans as there were individuals. But in a storm at sea, I
have remarked, when the cause labors, and the ship and
crew are in equal danger, there is a common feeling in the
ignorant and timid, to remit their usual self-sufficiency.
The real helmsman is no longer kept back by envy, but
is called for by the general opinion, to come forward, to take
his proper place. Our opinion was in entire coincidence
with the determined counsels of Morelos, that we should
place in advance, a great number of scouts, or sentinels, who
should give us an alarm, if there were any advance of the
foe, that our troops might take as much repose, as
consisted
with sleeping on our arms, and that with the first
dawn of the morning, we should attack them with our
whole force, and cut our passage through their centre.
I had scarcely retired to the tent assigned me, before
Bryan, who, I should have remarked, was a serjeant in my
regiment, brought me a couple of letters. They had
come with other dispatches by a flag of truce. Among
these despatches, was a proclamation offering a general
amnesty to all, that would lay down their arms, and
surrender
themselves to the Royal commander. They had
excepted from this pardon a few cases, among which were
Morelos, De Benvelt, and myself. The first letter was
from my former pupil Dorothea. It was in indifferent
English, and was long and rather difficult to decypher.
The purport of it was, that her father and she were yet
willing to forgive my indifference, if I would even now
see things in the light of my true interest. She declared
in strong terms her continued regard for me, and that her
father had so much influence with the government, that he
could yet procure me a pardon; that our cause was known
to be utterly hopeless; that if I persisted, I could expect
nothing better, than a military execution; that I could have
no hope from any supposed influence over the heart of
Doa Martha, for that it was a fixed affair, that she was
to be united to Colonel Pedro, at the close of the campaign,
which, from appearances, was likely to be very short; that
her father would even be willing to interpose in behalf of
De Benvelt, provided there were no truth in the report,
that I was to marry Wilhemine; that she trusted to my
good sense, to choose between a fortune, liberty, and
an affectionate wife, and an immediate and ignominious
death; that the least notice to colonel Aradondo, that I was
disposeb to accept of her hand and fortune she had been
24*
assured, would extend to me a full pardon among the
rest.
The other was from Doa Martha, and contained only
the following words.
Blessed Virgin! do I live to hear that you are a
rebel officer, in arms against my father, and proclaimed a
spy, and a traitor? While these terrible denunciations are
issued against you here, you are making the mountain ring
with your revelries, living in riot on the plunder of the
poor peasants, solacing yourself with the smiles of the
easy Wilhelmine, and, like a butterfly, wantoning from
flower to flower, when tired of her. Well, you will now
have a chance to meet Don Pedro, as you have wished.
I am sure of one thing, that harshly as I have met all his
advances, he regards me more, and would have
remembered
me longer than you have done. Would to God, I
had met with nothing, to seduce my affections from the
tranquil tenor of my duty. I might then have been a
wife, tranquil, if indifferent, and an obedient child, making
my worn and harassed father happy. As it is, you will
live on, and take your pleasure, and amuse yourself with
Wilhemine; and for me, let events turn as they may, there
is no escape from this intolerable pressure at my heart.
For me there is no resource but to die. But rebel, or
royalist, vanquished, or victorious, you ought to be dear
to me and you are so. Remind Wilhelmine, that she too
once professed to be my friend.
From the tenor of these letters, I discovered clearly,
what I had more than suspected before, that our
movements
were all reported at Durango, that we were
surrounded
by invisible dangers, and had traitors in our
camp. I discovered too, that the character of my
affectionate
reception in De Benvelt's family, and my brotherly
attentions to his daughters were grossly mirepresented,
and misinterpreted. Indeed, I had received insinuations
of this sort, from the ladies in the camp. I saw but too
much reason to believe, that the natural impulses of
human
feeling, united with pride, resentment, a sense of
duty, and the spiritual representations of the father, would
actually, and speedily bring about the desired union of
Martha
with Don Pedro. I had never distinctly allowed to
myself
,
that I had any hopes there. But shadowy visions,
against myself, would play about my imagination,
anticipations
,
so blissful, and so exquisitely dear, that without
definition or outline, they still looked to a different issue.
But they are not quite sure, thought I, that the
campaign
is to terminate so soon, and so successfully for Don
Pedro. At least, if he is to be married when he returns,
I will strive to detain him here as long as may be. I
found, that meditating on the probable event of our being
beaten in the morning, and my suffering immediate
military
execution, in case I survived, and his returning to
claim and receive his bride, was an excellent preparative
for intrepidity, and determination, to fall on the field in
case of defeat. I will either conquer, I thought, or
I will die. If the former is not reserved for me, the
latter will be the consummation to be wished. I felt, that I
had not philosophy enough, to be willing to live, after I
knew Martha to be in the possession of another, much
less of Don Pedro; and with that reflection I went to sleep.
I was just taking the comfort of a tranquil dream,
in which I supposed myself in New England, on a fine
summer's morn, and sitting down to our customary rural
breakfast, at my father's house. I heard the boblincolns
chattering in the meadow, and I saw the dear and well
remembered face of my mother, and she was telling me,
with tender apprehensions, that I looked ill, and as though
I had not slept. In the midst of this dream, the bugles
in all directions, broke in on the stillness of morning
twilight
,
and awakened me from this delightful dream, to the
thrilling and contrasted consciousness of my actual
position
.
I had made all the little arrangements, that
circumstances
would allow, in preparation for whatever might be
the issue of the encounter. I had so provided, that in
case of my decease, none but Bryan would know, where
were my effects, and if he survived, as, not being
obnoxious
to the government, there was a greater probability,
that he might, he was directed, and he promised me that
he would attempt to make his way to Boston, and remit
my property, the gift of the Condesa and Martha, to my
parents. I also left a short letter for them, and another
for Martha. I hope, it will not be inferred, that I was
more timid, or would fight the less hard, because I had
not yet worn off the impressions of a religious education.
I made a short, but fervent surrender of my hopes and
fears, my will and my wishes, the interest of my dying and
immortal nature, to the Great Disposer of events. I
examined
my motives, and on the whole my heart did not
misgive me. A calm, I might almost hope, a holy
serenity
,
came over me. Never did morning dawn upon me
in a state of so much exultation of feeling. Our army, if
a vast mass of Indian, mulatto, and creole rabble, could
be called by such a respectable name, was in a few
minutes in order, or rather disorder, of battle. The
advantage
of our assiduous trainings on the mountain was
now conspicuous in my regiment. It was something more
uniform and regular, than the rest of the host, and was
drawn up with something more of order, and martial
array
,
inspiring confidence in themselves, and infusing it into
the rest. The centre was voluntarily assigned to me and
my regiment. I remarked, that my poor fellows looked
yellow and pale, as the full array of the opposing army,
opened upon us with the increasing brightness of the
morning
.
We had no music of excitement, or defiance, but
the sound of monstrous wooden bugle-horns, the neighing
of our horses, and the braying of our donkies. In the
centre of the royal army, was the splendid Cadiz
regiment
,
with an uncommonly fine band, a gay uniform,
and boasting to be one of the best disciplined regiments
in Europe. The Conde with his aids, among whom was
Colonel Pedro, mounted on fine Andalusian chargers, were
seen at the head of this regiment. The army was drawn
up in a line, whose wings were a little inclined towards
the mountains. A deep serpentine gully, called
Rio Seco
was between us and them. We were, perhaps, as
numerous
as our foe; but it was easy to see, that their more
martial, regular, and uniform appearance, struck a
thrilling
sensation through our disorderly multitudes. Each
army waited for the other to cross the Rio Seco, that they
might attack the other while clambering up the banks.
Every demonstration of defiance, to provoke this advance
was made by either party. Our bugles pealed a
deafening
clamor. The Cadiz regiment replied by a slow
and grand national air on the full band. Each army
slowly approached the gully, and was now so near the
other, as that mutual terms of reviling, in which the
Spanish
is wonderfully rich, could be distinctly heard. Every
opprobrious term of crimination and recrimination, which
the language could furnish, was exhausted, and while
defiances
and execrations were thus bandying backward and
forward, our troops foamed with rage. I was delighted
to witness this, for I was fully persuaded, that our troops
would fight, only from one of two impulses, confidence or
rage. It was sufficiently obvious that we had not the first,
and our enemy was grateitously furnishing us with the
latter. We remained in this position, looking at each
other
,
uttering flourishes of musical defiances, and when they
paused, abusing each other, until the sun arose, and a
slight breeze arising with it, dispelled, as by enchantment,
dense banks of mist, that concealed parts of the opposite
armies from each other. I had expected every moment
that they would open upon us discharges of artillery.
But it seems, that their pieces had but just arrived with the
rising sun. We had not a single cannon. The moment
their artillery came up, they opened upon us a sweeping
and deadly discharge, and the thrilling cries of the
wounded
and the dying, in the intermission of their terrible
crash, first rung in my ears.
I comprehended at once, that for our raw and untrained
rabble, many of whom had never been in at any thing
more than the killing of a deer or a buffalo, to stand and
receive these sweeping discharges, without the possibility
of revenge or annoyance in their turn, would be instant
and total rout. I requested Morelos to allow me to cross
the ravine with my regiment, and see if we could make
no impression upon the foe. It was granted me. I
harangued
my men for a moment. I put them in mind of
the estimation thay bore in the army; that this was the
first time, we had had a chance to acquire glory, and
show our devotion to our cause. Let us avenge,
said I, the charges of cowardice, that they have thrown
upon us. Follow me, and we conquer or die. They
answered me by
vivas
, and shouts, and requests to be led
on; and we started in quick step for the bank. Such is
the effect of sympathy, that the same multitude, who would
not have received two more discharges of artillery,
without
running, instantly caught the enthusiasm of my
regiment
,
and with a terrible and unanimous shout, that made
the very mountains ring, started almost at a run. We
were in the ravine, and out of exposure in a moment.
We halted there a minute, to take breath, and by the same
simultaneous impulse we sprung for the summit of the
opposite bank. Those of more strength and agility than
the rest, reached the summit with a bound, and had our
foe had the wisdom to charge us here with the bayonet,
at this place would have been an end of us, and the
battle
.
But, as if panic-struck with our electric impulse,
they remained in their ranks, and renewed the fire of their
cannon, and gave us the fire of their small arms by
platoons
.
We were, as I should have remarked, all on foot,
and armed with carabines and spears. We returned them
one deadly discharge with our carabines, and rushed upon
them with our spears. It was at once a perfect
mele
, a
rencontre of man with man, and in which, in many
instances
,
the opposite parties were acquainted. Of course
personal malice came in for its share of influence in the
fury of the combat. It furnished just the field in which
these men would be most likely to have experience. It
was an army of duellists, of personal struggles for mutual
assassination. Our spears stood us in excellent stead
against their horse. They became disordered, and
recoiled
back upon their own disordered ranks. They
evidently
had the disadvantage in this first tug of battle.
Had we possessed any discipline, it would have been an
entire rout to them. But the commanders saw their
disadvantage
,
sounded a retreat, and their troops separated
from the
mele
in good order. Our eagerness, as they
undoubtedly foresaw, had well nigh ruined us. We strove
to stem the current of pursuit, but we were carried along
by it, instead of being able to arrest it. We lost every
thing that resembled a front, and became a furious, rushing
crowd. Our enemy retreated, until he saw irregular
masses of our men in advance of the rest. He faced,
and attacked us in his turn, in firm column, and in good
order. A change of things, so unexpected, staggered the
advance. In a moment it began to fall back, producing
in the rear confusion worse confounded. In this
dreadful
moment, their horse dashed in upon us, and shrieks,
and groans, and rout, ensued on every side. The ground
was covered with bodies, and was slippery with blood.
Morelos, De Benvelt, and myself, together with a few more
undismayed spirits, placed ourselves between the fighting
and the retreating. We assured them, that to be forced
to the bank was inevitable destruction, and as no quarter
was expected, not a man could escape. Partly by these
considerations, and partly by shame and threats, we
persuaded
them to face the foe again. We arranged them in
a kind of form, and to sustain ourselves against the charge
of the horse, we planted our spears on the ground, at an
angle of forty-five degrees, and received the horses with
the spear in their breasts. This manuvre produced
another recoil of the foe, and there was again an interval
between us and them. The action was renewed, by
discharges
of musquetry along the whole line of either army.
Here we should have had the advantage again, but for the
terrible havoc inflicted by their artillery, which, at every
discharge
,
swept a clear path through our whole depth of line.
Morelos utttered his fierce cry for another charge, and we
attacked them again with fixed spears. In this
mele
,
accident confronted me for the first time with Don Pedro.
I cried to him in Spanish, Dismount, Sir, and we can
now meet on equal terms. But whether he disdained
to attack a rebel colonel, or whether he was unwilling to
fight on foot, or whether he reserved himself for a more
fortunate opportunity, I cannot say. His first motion was
as if towards me; but he instantly wheeled his horse,
and rode away. In this charge, we fairly pierced our
way through the centre, and the celebrated Cadiz
regiment
and their army, as if by consent, parted towards
either wing, allowing us an almost unmolested passage
through. We blew our bugles, for forming our line in
their rear. We had experienced too bitterly our want of
discipline, to be in haste to attack them again; and they
had suffered too severely, and had too well proved our
manhood, to think of molesting us. The strange spectacle
was seen, of two armies retiring from heaps of slaughter,
and from each other, as if by mutual consent. The
enemy
sent us a flag of truce, and proposed a parley. We
consented, and it was arranged, that we should have an
armistice. The terms were settled directly, They were,
that each army should bury their dead, and aid their
wounded unmolested; that then we should be allowed to
march from the mountain in the direction of St. Antonio,
or in any other direction we should choose, undisturbed;
and they were not to be assaulted by us, in retiring, as
they agreed to do, upon San Pueblo, a small village at
the distance of a league and a half.
These terms were settled on both sides, and troops
speaking the same language, that were but an hour before
engaged in mortal struggle with each other, were now
mournfully occupied in searching for their dead and
wounded. The losses on the two sides were nearly equal.
It has been observed in all ages, that the most deadly foes
mingle in this sad business, apparently laying aside
personal
VOL. I. 25
animosity and bitterness. Such was apparently the
case now. Bryan, who had fought like Achilles, found
and recognised among the dead, a member of the Conde's
household, who had been a fellow-servant with him. The
tears ran down his cheeks, and he raised the Irish howl
of mourning. Mutual aid was given in burying the dead,
and aiding the wounded. The priests performed funeral
rites for the one army or the other, indiscriminately. The
melancholy and thrilling chant,
De profundis
, mingled
with the low and faint groans of the wounded and the
dying. Having made these arrangements, and attended
to our wounded, we prepared to return to the mountain,
to carry into effect the article in our armistice, which
bound us, as soon as possible, to depart for St. Antonio.
In returning, I walked on in company with Morelos and
De Benvelt, so near the Conde, who was on horseback in
the midst of his troops, attending to the same duties
which we had been discharging, as to see Don Pedro, and
be recognised by him again. I beg you, Sir, I cried
to him, as I passed, to have the goodness to inform Doa
Martha, when next you see her, that you have, on this
occasion, declined my courtesy, as on a former occasion
I declined yours.
There can be no scene more tender, than the return of
warriors from the uproar of battle, and the strife of blood,
safe and unwounded to their friends. You may be certain,
that we claimed the victory, as sure and unquestionable.
In fact, the very circumstances of the armistice warranted
us in the claim. The battle had indeed assured to us the
fruits of a victory, and, all that we could have asked, an
unmolested march to St. Antonio. I was amused, as we
were met by the women and children, many of whom had
come down the mountain to get the first tidings of the
battle, to see how immediately after the first burst of tears,
rapture, and congratulations, each one of our warriors, in
the relation of his personal exploits, was transformed into
an Alexander. I almost envied the reception of De
Benvelt
by his daughters. For the first time they seemed
selfish, not being willing to receive an equal proportion of
embraces. Broken exclamations, mingled prayers and
thanksgivings, filled up an interval of some moments.
Morelos, who had performed the noblest duties of a patriot
soldier, and who seemed raised above the sympathies of
humanity, even he melted at this scene, and let fall natural
tears down his furrowed cheeks. I return my humble
thanksgivings to the God of battles, my dear children,
said he, that your father and this young man have been
returned safe to you, and both covered with glory. I
thank God, too, in witnessing this scene, that I have no
children. The issue of this great struggle can personally
affect only me. The sympathy which I feel for this great
and oppressed community, leaves me but too much surface
in which to be exposed to suffering and agony. The ruddy
face of the Saxon was bathed in tears of parental affection,
and he could not refrain from sobbing. In battle he had
been unshrinking in its hottest forefront. Now he wept like
a child. After he had become a little composed, he
embraced
me, and presented me to his daughters, as one
who had done much, he was pleased to say, in producing
the success of the action, which Morelos confirmed in
terms, improper for me to repeat. Even Bryan received
his share of compliment, which he repaid by extolling the
heroism of my crossing the ravine, Rio Seco, to the clouds.
In short, we liberally praised one another backwards and
forwards. The Saxon was delighted with this joyous
commencement of our warfare, and was sanguine in his
auguries of its termination. Mein Gott, said he, we
will see the country free and happy yet, and we will beat
the liberties out of the tamned Dons, and they will wish
they had not proscribed the honest Tuchman yet. The
timid welcome of the girls to me was sufficiently
affectionate
.
Less would have been out of keeping with their
frank and tender natures. More would have violated
their nice sense of decorum. Their glistening eyes
said to me as many kind and impressive things, as any
words or embraces could have done. For the first hour
of our return, we were perhaps the happiest people in the
world.
I pass over the scene of packing, and arranging, and
preparing for a march, which we were now compelled to
make. It was perhaps, softened by the circumstance that
we were all in one predicament, and were all to go together.
The ladies were for the most part pleased with the
prospect
.
Their range would be extended, and their
amusements
diversified. For me, I have a very particular
aversion
to
moving
. The very naming of the thing applies oil of
vitriol to every nerve. Every thing, that the camp could
furnish, in the form of horse, mule, or ass, was put in
requisition
,
and was either loaded with a pack or harnessed.
The line of carts and loaded mules, when formed at the
foot of the mountain, made a range of a mile in extent.
We took our last sleep under the vault of the cavern of
Mixtpal, and commenced our descent from the mountain
on the dawn of the morning, after the battle. The day
before had so abundantly drawn upon the sources of
feeling that I hoped we should this day have passed
away from this singular and romantic residence without
emotion. Bur to some it was identified with the idea of
security, to others associated with the remembrance of
balls and fandangoes; to others with the thought of
feasting
and good cheer. All seemed to go away with the
painful feeling of leaving home. The countenances of
the Misses Benvelt were overcast with apprehension and
anxiety. They had been perfectly satisfied with things, as
they were, and to leave this place was as the departure of
our first parents from paradise. The very circumstance,
that the world was all before them, was appalling.
Sensitive
and affectionate natures, as theirs were, cling to privacy,
quiet, and domestic joys, and that dear ark, the home.
They had been quiet, and retired here in the midst of all
the bustle. The scene before us, as we descended, was
sublimely impressive. The mists were rolling away from
the sides of the mountains, and the sun was pouring his
rising radiance upon their hoary cliffs. The battle field
was distinctly visible to us, and seemed spread directly
under
our feet. A few people, here and there, apparently
mourning over their dead, and at that distance only visible as
moving atoms, were seen on the field. Wilhelmine
pointed
them out to us, and supposed them engaged in the pious
office of taking a farewell look at the spot, where friends,
left on the field of honor, were taking their final repose for
the resurrection; and Oh! she added, you cannot
conceive, with what oppressive throbbing of the heart, we
yesterday morning looked upon the mingled conflict of this
same field. We could distinctly hear the shouts, the
feebler crash of small arms, and the more terrible
explosion
of artillery, so much the more awful, as we knew, it
was the discharge of the enemy. I almost conceited, that
I could feel the air of the balls whistling by me. I turned
away my eyes for fear, that by intense looking, I should be
able to discriminate my dear father and you in the midst
of the struggle, falling and trampled under foot. No view,
25 *
no reasoning could afford us any clue to determine which
party was victorious. Oh! that I had words, to explain to
you our agony of suspense, from the time, when the firing
ceased, to that joyous moment of your arrival. We were
clasped in each other's arms, in earnest prayer, afraid to
look forward, to see the messenger with his tidings, and
yet anxious beyond description, to obtain intelligence.
Now, when we are going away in health and safety, I
have forebodings, and an oppression of heart, that I
cannot
account for. It is a charming place, and we have been
happy, tranquil, secure. Never shall I pass as pleasant
days again, as I have spent in that vaulted cavern, in view
of this beautiful world, outstretched below me, kindied up
with the glories of the morning, or gilded with the fading
and mellow splendors of the setting sun. Then,
added
Sophy, there are more battles, more of these
heartrending
suspenses to encounter. Foolish girl! when the
proscription came, and we fled, I felt an idle satisfaction,
in fancying pleasant adventures and gratified curiosity. I
see, it will be a sad business, and we cannot always
expect
,
those we love, to come off, as yesterday. Now,
my tear son, said the Saxon, stop your ears, when my
weak girls talk this way. Girls, you are not fit to be
children
of a soldier. You ought not to say a word to him,
that will not tend to harden his heart and make him a
true soldier. You would make us both have hearts of
butter
.
For my part, I am right glad to leave this tamned
hole in the rocks. Give me a good stone house, and no
more fightings for de liberties. I attempted to raise the
spirits of our young ladies by talking of the pleasure, I
should have, in showing them complete specimens of the
young men of Yankee land, that they had expressed so
much desire to see, and that Sophy and Annette had
forgotten
,
how very lately a greater field for beaus, and a
better opportunity for the study of Yankee faces had been
considered the only want, of which they had complained.
We were now about to supply that want, without losing
any of the good things, that we had here, that I should be
the only loser, for that among so many fine young men, as
they would meet there, I foresaw, that I should be
overlooked
.
To all this, Annette thoughtfully replied, that the
times were getting too sober for jesting, that she should be
well satisfied with the society she had had, so that she
could be sure it would be continued to her. The women
about us generally consoled themselves with the prospect
of a new range for fandangoes, and the probability of
seeing
something more of the world. Some stumbled over
the stones by themselves. Others leaned on the arms of
their
cortejos
or husbands. The dogs barked. The
children cried. The servants and
cargadores
were loaded
with baggage, and in this way we descended to the plain,
where the servants had previously arranged our horses, and
the heavier part of our baggage. We continued to walk
on, until the procession had crossed the Rio Seco, and on
the opposite bank we passed directly through those
points of the battle field, where the greatest destruction
had occurred. The eyes of the young ladies were filled,
as they surveyed the traces of the havoc, the ground
drenched
,
and still reeking with blood, the soil ploughed up by
the wheels of the enemy's artillery, and the fresh graves
arranged in lines, which made the number of the tenants
seem even greater than it was. De Benvelt, who had
fought the day before, like a hero, sickened and turned
pale, as he surveyed this prodigal effusion of human blood,
which yesterday had flowed in veins, as warm as ours.
Morelos walked thoughtfully over the field with the same
tranquil and unalterable expression of melancholy. It
took up no small time, to get our women, servants, and
children on horseback, in carts and carriages, or on
asses and mules. Every tenant of the mountain was
somehow provided for in this way. The slightly
wounded
were in the baggage wagons. Those, who could
not bear removal, were sent with a flag to San Puebla, and
recommended to the mercy of the enemy. In a couple
of hours, this straggling procession, that seemed to cover
the plain, took up the line of march.
At another time I should have expected to find an
intense interest in this journey. Nature was just as
varied, and beautiful, as though she had been arrayed for
the contemplation of a single, thoughtful, and solitary
traveller
.
But the hurry of a march, the distraction of
thoughts which ensues, from finding yourself participating
in the same toils, pleasures, and events with such a
multitude
,
naturally turn the eye and the mind from the
contemplation
of nature to the concerns, and the little passions
of your fellow beings. The difficulty of finding food and
water, indispensable things, for such a multitude, in a
country so little inhabited, was a formidable impediment to
that reckless tranquillity, necessary for the pleasantness of
a journey. Quarrels and petty vexations, the giving out
of horses and the breaking down of carriages, the
screaming
of children, and other such miseries were frequently
occurring. I had often been struck with the romantic
beauty of the scene of our encampments, when my small
party was journeying to this country. The encampment
of an army, attended by women and children, furnished a
view still more picturesque and imposing. The army halts
on the banks of a running stream. The beasts are
unharnessed
.
A thousand hatchets attack the groves, to furnish
fuel for preparing supper, and fires for the night. The
oblong ranges of tents whiten in the fading light of
the day. A cheerful and bustling city springs up as by
enchantment. Visits and parties are projected. The dogs
bay. The chanticleer salutes the parting light, with his
cheering and domestic cry. The confused murmur of a
thousand voices is heard. The soldier whistles, as his
supper
is preparing, and there is always some scraping of the
violin, and thrumming of the guitar. The kindling of the
ranges of fires furnishes another source of beauty. The
dry and combustible wood is sought, and by its bright
blaze, every thing in the camp is still more visible, than by
the light of day.
The only remark, that occurred to me in relation to our
grand object was, that the people all were, or feigned to be,
true patriots, and we were welcomed, as deliverers by
people
,
who would have gladly seen us all in the Red Sea. We
took them at their word, and caressed them for the forced
patriotism, which brought to us all that their means could
well furnish. As soon as we approached a village, a
settlement
,
or a town, the domestic animals and the fowls all
seemed to understand, that we were carnivorous animals.
The cattle and pigs fled from our path, and the fowls flew
screaming away. In fact, like the grasshoppers of Egypt,
we cleared every thing that was eatable out of our way.
We passed two or three considerable towns, among them
Lanedo, and they were so occupied and fortified by the
royal troops, that we deemed it expedient to pass to the
right of them without attempting an attack. At each
place we sent in a flag, proposing to pass the town
unmolested
,
on condition, that certain stipulated supplies should
be furnished us, for which we were to pay a fair price, and
that no annoyance should be attempted on either side. At
the Passo del Norte some companies of royal provincial
troops made a night assault upon our camp, which
produced
a great deal of consternation, and in which some of
our young men behaved badly. But we soon found out
the strength and position of our foe, and easily drove him
away. The mutual criminations and charges of
cowardice
,
during this attack, resulted in producing two duels in
the morning, in one of which, one of the parties was slain,
and the other dangerously wounded. We did not much
regret the slain, for he had been quarrelsome and
mischievous
on the mountain and in the camp, and although he
fell in a duel, had been a notorious coward.
The first news we got of the Royal army was here. The
Conde's forces were much better mounted, than we were.
They had marched from San Puebla by a shorter route,
and at the time, we were crossing the Rio del Norte,
they had probably arrived at St. Antonio. It appeared,
that the Conde intended to make his permanent head
quarters
there, for he had passed with his whole household
establishment
.
The whole intelligence went to convince us,
that we should have an efficient campaign and plenty of
fighting.
The Patriots with their allies from the United States had
been engaged in the siege of St. Antonio, which place was
on the eve of capitulating, when the Conde arrived with
his forces, and raised the seige. The united forces of the
Patriots, awed by the imposing force which the Conde
brought, retired five miles from the town, and entrenched
themselves behind the beautiful little river, which waters it.
We sent forward messengers to advertise them of our
approach
,
and the exhilaration of our men may be imagined,
when, after such a long march from Mixtpal, we at length
saw the white tents of our allies. They received us with
a
feu de joie
, discharges of cannon, beating of drums,
and every possible demonstration of welcome.
Congratulations
in English and Spanish were exchanged, the
usual eager questions asked, and it seemed the meeting of
a band of brothers. For myself, no one can tell my
feelings
,
when in one part of the camp I saw the stars and
stripes fluttering in the breeze, and viewed the well
remembered
countenances and costumes, and heard the
language
of my own dear country. The first glance among
the troops from the United States convinced me, that they
were men of standing and character. My astonishment
and joy may be imagined, when I ascertained, that one of
the first officers of this establishment was a graduate from
my own
Alma Mater
. My communion with him of course
was sweet. I had the pleasure of introducing this young
gentleman, as well, as a number of other respectable young
men from the United States, to our chief Morelos, and
to De Benvelt, and his fair daughters. The delight of both
parties was visible, of our chiefs to see high-minded and
educated young men united to their cause, and of my young
compatriots, to be introduced to such beautiful girls, whose
deportment and the richness of whose dress evinced so
much rank and fashion; while they, in their turn, found
all their anticipations more than realized, in these fine
young men. The solemn face of Morelos relaxed for a
moment. De Benvelt capered for a joy, that he could not
conceal. Now, mein Gott said he, if dis be not
Sharmony itself. Can't you speak Tuch, young
gentlemen
?
Oh! it is such men, that is de ting to beat de
liberties
out of de Dons. When we were left to ourselves,
even the sage Sophy, and the meek Annette, as they were
respectively called, congratulated me in high glee, that now
they had hopes, they should not fail of finding a beau for
each, and that I should now be in less danger of being
dismembered
,
for the sake of an equal partition. Bryan's
head, too, swam with joy; for there was not only an ample
supply of whiskey in the camp, but English was spoken
there; there were also a number of his compatriots from
the green island, and who spoke with the knowing brogue.
END OF VOLUME I.